


A. J. AVER 






• • L A N G U 



AGE 



T 



RUTH AND 



L 



O GIC 





t 



• • 




i ME CLASSIC TEXT WHICH 
FOUNDED LOGICAL POSI- 
TIVISM - AND MODERN 
BRITISH PHILOSOPHY 




: 
I 



pelican books 



i 



LANGUAGE, TRUTH AND LOGIC 



Sir Alfred Ayerwas bom in 1910 and educated as a King s 
Scholar at Eton and as a classical scholar at Christ Church. 
Oxford. After spending a short period at the University of 
Vienna, he became Lecturer in Philosophy at Christ Church 
»n 1933. «w* Research Student in 1935. In 1940* he joined 
the Welsh Ouards. but was employed for mosG of the War in 
Miliary Intelligence. He returned to Oxford in 1945 as 
Fellow and Dean of Wadham College, Front 1946 to 1 9$9 
he was Grotc Professor of the Philosophy of Mind and Logic 
in the University of Loudon. He was Wykeham Professor of 
Logic In the University of Oxford, and was a Fellow of New 
College. Oxford, from 19.59 until 197&. From 1978 to 1983 
he was a Fellow of Wolfoon College, Oxford- In addition he 
is a Fellow of the British Academy, an Honorary Fellow of 
Wadham College and New College, Oxford, and University 
College, London, an Honorary Student of Christ Church find 
an Honorary Member of the American Academy of Arts 
and Scicntesi he holds an honorary de&ree from the univer- 
sities of East Anglla, London and Durham, as well as Trent 
in Ontario and Bard College In the U.S.A. His principal pub- 
lications arc The Foundations of Empirical Knowledge*, Philo- 
sophical Essays: The Problem of Knowledge (Pelican): The 
Concept of a Person; The Origins of Pragmatism; Metaphysics 
and Common Semr. Russell and Moore: The Analytical 
Heritage Vie Central Questions of Philosophy (Pelican); Prvbt- 
bilitu and EtHenoe, Philosophy in the Twentieth Century; Rus- 
sell; Hume: Freedom and Morality; Ludwra WUlgenstcin 
(Pelican) and WtouVe. He has also published two volumes of 
autobiography and contributed articles to philosophical and 
Uterary journals- Sir Alfred was knighted in 1070 and is a 
Chevalier <ie la Legion d'Honneur. 



LANGUAGE, 
TRUTH AND LOGIC 

A. J, AYER 




PENGUIN BOOKS 



PRNCIMN &0OKS 

Publbhcd by the Penguin Croup 
±j Wrights i**nc. London -wS ^ra, fr$tand 

Viking Penguin inc.. 4<» West 2ird Street, Nwv Yort.NewYurfc 10010. IftA 

Penguin Books Ausualia U-d. ititicmxid. Victoria. Auaralta 

iv 1 ::> :!-i Hooks Canada LU* iBai M«i Street. Mark hum. Ontario, ^iirrada lju 104 

ftniEuUi Boois CN2) i id 182-J90 Wairau Xral Auckland 10. New Zealand 
Penguin Hooka Ud. RcgUtared Offlws: HunnostdBwailti. V Hi ! J !■-■■ .: Enghind 

j'irit (whiirttcd It victor Cdhmct ?^3fr 
Publfthed to PeUwn Boo&s rgjr 
13 is 17 19 £& IS 16 14 12 

Copyright 19*6* *94* I* A, J. Aycr 
All rights reserved 

Printed and bound in Grt:r. Britain fry 

Richard Claf ( ^ 1kiragay\ Suffolk 



TO RA. 



B*wpe In the United States of AOMrttA 

dittbookhsokl 5ut*xt to rtic comflncn 

rluit it du*ll *wc. fcy way orf trade or ■.= m ■> i .■.■;.:-. 

be knt. rcvsyW* hired out. ot nt hem-to circulated 

Nlth&ui liK puMteticT's prfrK can sent Ui any form or 

binding ocmvrc other fh*n that In tvhvh 4t Is 

published and without a similar condition 

Including this condition being Imposed 

on die subwqutiiUpurL'ha^r 









■■ 



CONTENTS 

Preface *> 

i . The Elimination of Metaphysics 1 3 

.p. 1 3 : What is the purpose and method of philosophy? Rejec- 
tion of the metaphysical thesis that philosophy affords us 
knowledge of a transcendent reality. 14: Kant also rejected 
metaphysics In this sense, but whereas he accused meta- 
physicians of ignoring the limits of the human understanding 
we accuse them of disobeying the rules which govern the 
significant use of language. 16: Adoption of verifiablllty as- u 
criterion for testing the significance of putative statements of 
fact. 16: Distinction between conclusive and partial verifi- 
cation. No propositions can be conclusively verified, »g: Or 
conclusively confuted- 20: For a statement of fact to be genu- 
ine some possible observations must be relevant to the deter- 
mination of its truth or falsehood- *x: Examples of the kinds 
of assertions, familiar to philosophers, which are ruled out by 
our criterion- 34- Metaphysical sentences defined as (sen- 
tences which express neither tautologies nor empirical hypo- 
theses. 24: Linguistic confusions the prime sources of meta- 
physics- 271 Metaphysics and Poetry. 

2. The Function of Philosophy ."J" 

p. 30: Philosophy is not a search, for first principles. 30: Bar- 
renness of DescaTtes' procedure. 33: The function of philo- 
sophy ts wholly critical. But this does not mean that It can 
give an a priori Justification of out scientific or common-sense 
assumptions. 341 There Is no genuine problem of induction, 
as ordinarily conceived, 36', Philosophising Is an activity of 
analysis. 37: Most of those who are commonly thought to 
havG been great philosophers were philosophers in our sense, 
rather than metaphysicians. 38: Locke, Berkeley, Hume as 
analysts. 39: We adopt Berkeley's phenomenalism without 
his tficism. 40'. And take a Humean view of causation. 43: 
Philosophy in our sense is wholly independent of meta- 
physics. We are not committed to any doctrine of atomism. 
44', The philosopher as an analyst is not concerned with the 



physical properties of things, but wjy with the way in which 
we speak about (hem. 45: Linguistic propositions <|$£Utad2D 
factual terminology. 46: Philosophy i&suas trt definitions. 

The Nature of Philosophical Analysis 48 

p. 48: Philosophy provides not explicit definitions, such as are 
given in dictionaries, but definitions in use. Explanation of 
this distinction. 49: Russell's 'theory of descriptions* as an 
example of philosophical analysis. 52: Definition of an am- 
biguous symbol. 53: Definition of a logical construction. 54: 
Material things are logical constructions oat of sense- 
contents* 54: By defining the notion of a material thing in 
terms of sense-contents we solve the so-called problem of per- 
ception. 55; A solution of this problem outlined as a further 
exampfe of philosophical analysis* 59: Utility of such an- 
alyses, 59: Danger of saying that philosophy Is concerned 
with meaning, 621 Th* propositions of philosophy arc not 
empirical proposition? concerning the way In which people 
actually to words* Hicy arc concerned with ihc logical con- 
sequences of linguistic conventions, 63; Rejection of the view 
that 'every language has a structure concerning which in the 
langirtye nothing can be said 1 . 

The A Priori 64 

p. -64! As empiricists, we must deny that any general propo- 
sition concerning a matter of fact «*tt b* know* certainly to 
be valid. 64: How then are we to deal with the proportions of 
formal lojjic and mathematics?, 6?i Rejection of Mill's view 
that these propositions are inductive geti-erali&ations, 72: 
They are necessarily true because they are analytic. 721: 
Kanf-s definitions of analytic and synthetic judgement. 73; 
Emendation of Kant's definitions. 74* Analytic propositions 
axe tautological; fhey say nothing concerning any matter of 
facL 74: But they give us new knowledge, inasmuch -as they 
bring to light the implications of our linguistic usages. 76: 
I^jgi-c dots not describe 'the laws of thought'. 77: Nor geome- 
try the properties of physical space. 80: Our account of a 
priori truths undermines Kant's transcendental system. Si: 
Uqw, if they are tautological* can there be fcn mathematics 
and logic the possibility of invention -and discovery? 



5- Truth and Probability 84 

p. 84'. What is truth? S$t Definition af a praposiiioit. 85: The 

words tftl£ f atld 'fols*' filrtCti&tt iit the sentence simply as 

assertion and negation signs- -87: The 'problem of truth* re* 
duced to the qufiBttHL Hmv are propositions validated? 881 
The criterion of the validity of empirical propositions is not 
purely formal. Sg: No empirical propositions are certain not 
even those which refer to immediate experience, ^31 Obser- 
vation confirms or discredits not Just a single hypothesis but 
a system of hypotheses. 94: The 'fciels of experience' can 
never compel us to abandon a hypothesis. 96: Danger of mis- 
taking synthetic for analytic propositions. 97: Hypotheses as 
rules which govern our expectation of future experience. 
cor: Definition of rationality, 102: Definition of probability in 
terms of rationality. 102: Propositions referring to the past 



; 






: 



6-. Critique of Ethics and Theology 104 

p. z 04; How does an empiricist deal with assertions of value? 
105; Distinction between various types of ethical enquiry. 
196: Utilitarian and subjectivtat theories of ethics consistent 
with empiricism. iqj\ But unacceptable on other grounds* 
t08\ Distinction between normative and descriptive ethical 
symbols. 109: Rejection of intuitionism, no: Assertions of 
value are not scientific but 'emotive'. j i<): They are r \u:.rr\\ in: 

neither ttue nor ftjsfc "r; TVy ere partly expressions of 
feeli u g, partly comma rub. 1 1 3 : Distinction between ex- 
pr«sions and assertions of feeling. 113! Objection that this 
view makes it impossible to dispute about questions of value. 
t 1 4: Actually, we new do dispute about cjuestions of value, 
but always about questions of fact. 1 1 &: Ethics as a branch of 
knowledge comprehended ii» the social sciences, 1181 The 
same applies to aesthetics. 119: Impossibility of demonstrat- 
ing the existence of a transcendent god. 120: Or even ofprov- 
ing it probable. 120: That a transcendent god exists 3s a 
metaphysical assertion, and therefore not literally significant 
Saying this does not make us atheists or agnostics in the 
ordinary sense. 122: The belief Unit men have immortal souls 
Is also metaphysical. iz% : There is no logical ground for con- 
flict between religion and science. 124: Our views supported 
by Che statements of thciste themselves. 125: Refutation of 
the argument from religious experience. 






7. Th* Self and the Common World 127 

. p. 127: The baslsof knowledge, 129; Sen^wnKats as parts, 
n™ than objects, of wn«-«|?erieare& rjo; Scnsc- 
contetits neither menial nor physical 130; Distinction bc^ 
lw££d the mental and the physical applies only Co- logical 
constructions, 1321 The existence of cptstcmological and 
causal connections between minds and material things open 
to no a priori objections- 133: Analysis of the self la tevms of 
sense^experleiices. rjj: A scnsc-cxperlcnoe caMiot belong to 
the sease-history of more than one sell 134: The substantive 
ego a fictitious metaphysical entity. 135: Hume's definition of 
ihe self. 1 36: That the empirical self survives the dissolution 
of the body is 3 sell-contradtctory proposition. 136: Does our 
phenomenalism Involve solipsism? ij£: Our knowledge of 
other people. 142; How is mutual understanding possible? 

8. Solutions of Outstanding Philosophical Disputes 144 
p. 144; The nature: of philosophy docs n«i warrant the 
existence af efcAflictirtg philosophical 'parties'. 145: The oml- 
likl between rationalists and empiricists. 147: Oux own log- 
ical em ptrirism to be distinguished from positivism. 14S; We 
reject Hume's psychological, as opposed to his logical, doc- 
trines* 150: Realism and Idealism. 151: To say that a thing 
exists is not to say thai it is actually being perceived. 154: 
Things as permanent possibilities of sensation. 155: What is 
perceived is not necessarily mental i$8z What exists need 
not necessarily be thought of. 158: Nor what is thought of 
exist 159: Empirical grounds for supposing that things may 
exist unperceived, 161: Monism and Pluralism. 161: Mon- 
istic fallacy that all a thing's properties arc constitutive of Ls 
nature* 164; Illustrates the danger of expressing linguistic 
proportions in factual terminology* 165: Causality not a 
logical relation, 267: Empirical evidence ?£-ain$t the mQnkt's 
view that every ev^nt is causally omnecfaxl with every other- 
l£St Titt tlrtily of science. 1 />8: Philosophy as the logic of 
science. 

Appendix 171 

■index 200 



8 



PREFACE TO FrRST EDITION 

The views which are pue forward in this treatise derive 
from the doctrines of Bertrand Russell and Wittgenstein, 
which are themselves the logical outcome of the empiri- 
cism of Berkeley and David Hume. Like Hume, I divide all 
genuine proposttions into two classes: those which, in his 
terminology, concern 'relations of ideas", and those which 
concern 'matters of fact'. The former class comprises 
the a priori propositions of logic and pure mathematics, 
and these I allow to be necessary and certain only "because 
they are analytic. That is, I maintain that the reason why 
these propositions cannot be confuted in experience is 
that they do not make any assertion about the empirical 
world, but simply record our determination to use symbols 
in a certain fashion. Propositions concerning empirical 
matters of fact, on the other hand, I hold to be hypotheses. 
which can be probable but never certain. And in giving an 
account of the method of their validation I claim also to 
have explained the nature of truth. 

To test whether a sentence expresses a genuine empiri- 
cal hypothesis, I adopt what may be called a modified 
verification principle. For I require of an empirical hypothe- 
sis, not indeed that it should be conclusively verifiable, 
but that some possible sense-experience should be rele- 
vant to the determination of its truth or falsehood. If a 
putative propositipn fails tp satisfy this principle, and is 
not a tautology, then I hold that it is metaphysical, and 
that, being metaphysical, it is neither true nor false but 
literally senseless. It will be found that much of what or- 
dinarily passes for philosophy is metaphysical according 

9 



to this criterion, and. In particular, that it can not be sig- 
nificantly asserted that there is a non-empirical world of 
values, or that men have immortal souls, or that there is a 
transcendent God. 

As for the propositions of philosophy themselves, they 
are held to be linguistically necessary, and so analytic. 
And with regard to the relationship of pliilosophy and em- 
pirical science, it is, shown that the philosopher is not in a 
position to furnish speculative truths, which would, as it 
were, compete with the hypotheses of science, nor yet to 
pass a priori judgements upon the validity of scientific 
theories, but that his function is to clarify the proposi- 
tions of science, by exhibiting their logical relationships, 
and by defining the symbols which occur in them. Con- 
sequently I maintain that there is nothing in the nature of 
philosophy to warrant the existence of conflicting philo- 
sophical 'schools*. And 1 attempt to substantiate this by 
providing a definitive solution of the problems which have 
been the chief sources of controversy between phUoso- 
phcrsinthepast. 

The view that philosophizing is an activity of analysis 
is associated in England with the work of G. E Moore and 
his disciples. But while I have learned a great deal from 
Professor Moore, I have reason to believe that he and his 
followers are not prepared to adopt such a thoroughgoing 
phenomenalism as I do, and that they take a rather dif- 
ferent view of the nature of philosophical analysis. The 
philosophers with whom I am in the closest agreement 
are those who compose the •Viennese circle', under the 
leadership of Moritr Schlick, and are commonly known 
as logical positivists. And of these I owe most to Rudolf 
Carnap, Further, I wish to acknowledge my indebtedness 
to Gilbert Kyle, my original tutor in philosophy, and to 
Isaiah Berlin, who have discussed with me every point in 
the argument of this treatise, and made many valuable sug- 

10 



gestions, although they both disagree with much of what 
I assert. And I must also express my thanks to J. R. M. 
Willis for his correction of the proofs. 

A, J. AYER 

ii Foubert's Place. London 
July 1335 



ir 



CHAPTER r 
THE ELIMINATION OF METAPHYSICS 

The traditional disputes of philosophers are, for the most 
part, as unwarranted as they are unfruitful. The surest way 
to end them is to establish beyond quest ion "what should be 
the purpose and method of a philosophical inquiry. And 
this is by no means so difficult a task as the history of 
philosophy would lead one to suppose. For if there are any 
questions which science leaves it to philosophy to answer, 
a straightforward process of elimination must lead to their 
discovery. 

We may begin by criticizing the metaphysical thesis 
that philosophy affords us knowledge of a reality trans- 
cending the world of science and common sense. Later 
on, when we come to define metaphysics and account for 
its existence, we shall find that it is possible to be a meta- 
physician without believing in a transcendent reality; for 
we shall see that many metaphysical utterances are due to 
the commission of logical errors, rather than to a con- 
scious desire on the part of their authors to go beyond the 
Limits of experience. But it is convenient for us to take 
the case of those who believe that at is possible to have 
knowledge of a transcendent reality as a starting-point for 
our discussion. The arguments which wc use to refute 
them will subsequently be found to apply to the whole of 
metaphysics. 

One way of attacking a metaphysician who claimed to 
have knowledge of a reality which transcended the pheno- 
menal world would be to inquire front what premises his 
propositions were deduced. Must he not begin, as other 
men do, with the evidence of his senses ? And if so, what 
valid process of reasoning can possibly lead him to the 

I 

13 



conception of a transcendent reality? Surely from empiri- 
cal premises nothing whatsoever concerning the proper- 
ties, or even the existence, of anything super-empirical 
can legitimately be inferred. But this objection would be 
met by a denial on the part of the metaphysician that his 
assertions were ultimately based on the evidence of his 
senses. He would say that he was endowed with a faculty 
Of intellectual intuition which enabled him to know facts 
that could not be kaown through senseocperience. And 
even if it could be shown that he was relying on empiri- 
cal premises, and that his venture into a non-empirical 
world; was therefore logically unjustified, it would not fol- 
low that the assertions which he made concerning this 
non-empirical world could not be true. Tor the fact that a 
conclusion does not follow from its putative premise is 
not sufficient to show that it is false. Consequently one 
cannot overthrow a system of transcendent metaphysics 
merely by criticizing the way in which it comes into be- 
ing. What is required is rather a criticism of the nature 
of the actual statements which comprise it. And this is 
the line of argument which w« shall, in fact,. pursue. For 
we shall maintain that no statement which refers to a 
'reality' transcending the limits of all possible sense- 
experience Call possibly have any literal significance; from 
which it must follow that the labours of those who have 
striven to' describe such a reality have all been devoted 
W the production of nonsense. 

It may be suggested that this is a proposition which has 
already been proved by Kant But although Kant also con- 
demned transcendent metaphysics, he did so on different 
grounds. For he said that the human understanding was so 
constituted that it lost itself in contradictions when it 
ventured out beyond the limits of possible experience and 
attempted to deal with things in themselves. And thus he 
made the impossibility of a transcendent metaphysk not, 

"4 



as we do. a matter of logic, but a ma-tter of fact. He as- 
serted, not that our minds could not conceivably have 
bad the power of penetrating beyond the phenomenal 
world, but merely that they were in fact devoid of it. And 
this leads the critic to ask how, if it is possible to know 
only what lies within the bounds of sense-experience, the 
author can be justified in asserting that real things do exist 
beyond, and how he can tell what are the boundaries be- 
yond which the human understanding way not venture, 
unless he succeeds in passing them himself. As Wittgen- 
stein says, 'in order to draw a limit to thinking, we should 
have to think both sides of this limit', 1 a truth to which 
Bradley gives a special twist in maintaining that the man 
who is ready to prove that metaphysics is impossible is a 
brother metaphysician with a rival theory of his own.* 
Whatever force these objections may have against the 
Kantian doctrine, they have none whatsoever against the 
thesis that lam about to set forth. It cannot here be saEd 
that the author is himself overstepping the barrier he 
maintains to be impassable. For the fruitlessness of at- 
tempting to transcend the limits of possible sense^xperi- 
ence will be deduced, not from a psychological hypothesis 
concerning the actual constitution of the human mind, 
but from the rule whkh determines the literal significance 
of language. Our charge against the metaphysician is 
not that he attempts to employ the understanding in a field 
where it cannot profitably venture, but that he produces 
sentences which fail to conform to the conditions under 
which alone a sentence can he literally significant. Nor 
are we ourselves obliged to talk nonsense in order to show 
that all sentences of a certain type are necessarily devoid 
of literal significance. We need only formulate the 
criterion which enables us to test whether a sentence 

j. TrwtQtus L08K&-PhihsQphfcur , Preface. 

2. Bradley, Appearance ontf Reality, utd cd. p. z. 

15 



■■ 
■ 



J 
i 






expresses a genuine proposition about a matter of fact, and 
thtti point Out that the sentences Under Consideration fail 
to satisfy it. And this we shall now proceed to do. We 
shall first of all formulate the criterion in somewhat vague 
terms, and then give the explanations which are necessary 
to render it precise. 

The criterion which we use to test the genuineness of 
apparent statements of fact is the criterion of verifiability. 
We say that a sentence is factually significant to any 
given person, if, and only if, he knows how to verify the 
proposition which it purports to express - that is, if he 
knows what observations would lead him, under certain 
conditions, to accept the proposition as being true, or re- 
ject it as "being false. If, on the other hand, the putative 
proposition is of such a character that the assumption of 
its truth, or falsehood, is consistent with any assumption 
whatsoever concerning the nature o£ his future experi- 
ence, then, as far as he is concerned, it is, if not a tauto- 
logy, a mere pseudo-proposition. The sentence expressing 
it may be emotionally significant to him; but it is not 
literally significant. And with regard to questions the pro- 
cedure is the same. We inquire in every case what obser- 
vations would lead us to answer the question, one way or 
the other; and, if none can be discovered, we must con- 
clude that the sentence under consideration does not, as 
£ar as we arc concerned, express a genuine question, how- 
ever strongly its grammatical appearance may suggest that 
it does. 

As the adoption of this procedure is an essential factor in 
the argument of this book, it needs to be examined in detail. 

In the first place, it is necessary to draw a distinction 
between practical verifiability. and verifiability in prin- 
ciple. Plainly we all understand, in many cases believe, 
propositions which we have not in fact taken steps to 
verify. Many of These are propositions which we could 

16 



r 



: 



verify if we took enough trouble. But there remain a num- 
ber of significant propositions, concerning matters of fact, 
which wc could not verify even if we chose; simply be- 
cause we lack the practical means of placing ourselves in 
the situation where the relevant observations could be 
made. A simple and familiar example of such a proposition 
is the proposition that there are mountains on the farther 
side of the moon-' No rocket has yet been invented which 
would enable me to go- and look at the farther side of the 
moon, so that I am unable to decide the matter by actual 
observation. But I do know what observations would de- 
cide it for me, if, as is theoretically conceivable. 1 were 
once in a position to make them. And therefore I say that 

the proposition is verifiable in principle, if not Ui practice, 

and is accordingly significant. On the other hand, such a 
metaphysical pseudo-proposition as 'the Absolute enters 
into, but is itself incapable of, evolution and progress', 1 
is not even In principle verifiable. For one cannot con- 
ceive of an observation which would cnabl* one to deter- 
mine whether the Absolute did, or did not, enter into 
evolution and progress. Of course it is possible that the 
author of such a remark is using English words in a way 
in which they are not commonly used by English-speaking 
people, and that he does, in fact, intend to assert some- 
thing which could be empirically verified. But until he 
makes us understand how the proposition that he wishes 
to expressVould be verified, he fails to communicate any- 
thing to us. And if he admits, as I think the author of the 
remark in question would have admitted, that his words 
were not intended to express either a tautology or a pro- 
position which was capable, at least in principle, of being 

5. This example has been used by Professor Schlick 10 illustrate 
the same point 

4. A remark taken at random from Appearance and Reality, by 
F. R Bradley, 

17 






: 

'l I 

■ 
■ 



verified, then it follows that he has made an utterance 
which has no literal significance even for himself. 

A further distinction which we must make is the dis- 
tinction between the 'strong* and the 'weak' sense of the 
term 'verifiable'. A proposition is said to be verifiable, in 
the strong sense of the term, if. and. only if, its truth could 
be conclusively established in experience. But it is veri- 
fiable, in the weak sense, if it is possible for experience to 
render it probable. In which sense are we using the term 
When we say that a putative proposition is genuine only 
if it is verifiable? 

It seems to me that if w * adopt conclusive verinability 
as our criterion of significance, as some positivists have 
proposed, 1 our argument will prove too much. Consider, 
for example, the case of general propositions of law - such 
propositions, namely, as 'arsenic is poisonous*; 'all men 
are mortal'; 'a body tends to expand when it is heated'. 
It is of the very nature of these propositions that their 
truth cannot be established with certainty by any finite 
series of observations. But if it is recognized that such 
general propositions of law are designed to cover an in- 
finite number of cases, then it must be admitted that they 
cannot, even in principle, bo verified conclusively. And 
then, if we adopt conclusive verifiability as our criterion 
of significance, we are logically obliged to treat these .gen- 
eral propositions of law in the same fashion as we treat 
the statements of the metaphysician. 

In face of this difficulty, some positivists* have adopted 
the heroic course of saying that these general propositions 
are indeed pieces of nonsense, albeit an essentially impor- 

$. tg- M. Schiick, ' Pasitmsmus und Rcalismus", Erktnntnis, VoL 
I. ijjo. F. Waismann, 'Logischc Analyse des Warschcinlichkettsbe- 
griffs*. Erkeantms, Vol. 1, 1930. 

<. e.g. M Schliek. 'Die Kausalitat in der £cgciiw£rtf£cq Physifc", 
Naturwksenschatt, Vol. 19, 1931. 



tant type of nonsense. But here the introduction of the 
terra 'important' is simply an attempt to hedge. It serves 
only to mark the authors' recognition that their view is 
somewhat too paradoxical, without in any way removing 
the paradox. Besides, the difficulty is not confined to the 
case of general propositions of law, though it is there re- 
vealed most plainly. It is hardly less obvious in the case 
of propositions about the remote past. For it must surely 
be admitted that, however strong the evidence in favour 
of historical statements may "be, their truth can never be- 
come more than highly probable. And to maintain that 
they also constituted an important, or unimportant, type 
of nonsense would be unplausible, to say the very least. 
Indeed, it will be our contention that no proposition, other 
than a tautology, can possibly be anything more than a 
probable hypothesis. And if this is correct, the principle 
that a sentence can be factually significant Only if it ex- 
presses what is conclusively verifiable is self-stultifying as 

a Criterion of sigm&CanCe. For it leads to the conclusion 

that it is impossible to make a significant statement of 
fact at all. 

Nor can we accept the suggestion that a sentence should 
be allowed to be factually significant if, and only if, it 
expresses something which is definitely confutable by 
experience.' Those who adopt this course assume that, 
although no finite scries of observations is ever sufficient to 
establish the truth of a hypothesis beyond all possibility 
of doubt, there are crucial cases in which a single obser- 
vation, or scries of observations, can definitely confute 
it. But, as we shall show later on, this assumption is false. 
A hypothesis cannot be conclusively confuted any more 
than it can be conclusively verified. For when we take the 
occurrence of certain observations as proof that a given 

7. This has bc*n pioposcd by Karl Popper in his Log'ik der For- 

19 






* 



hypothesis is false, we presuppose the existence of cer- 
tain conditions, And though, in any given case, it may 
be extremely improbable that this assumption is false, it 
is not logically impossible. We shall see that there need 
be no self-contradiction In holding that some of the rele- 
vant circumstances are other than we have taken them 

to be. and consequently that the hypothesis has not realty 

broken down. And if it is not the case that any hypothesis 
can be definitely confuted, we cannot hold that the 
genuineness of a proposition depends on the possibility of 
its definite confutation. 

Accordingly, we fall back on the weaker sense of veri- 
fication. We say that the question that must be asked about 
any putative statement of fact is not, Would any observa- 
tions make its truth or falsehood logically certain ? but 
simply. Would any observations be relevant to the de- 
termination of its truth or falsehood? And it is only if a 

negative answer is given to this second question that we 
conclude that the statement under consideration is non- 
sensical. 

To make our position clearer, we may formulate it in 
another way. Let us call a proposition which records an 
actual or possible observation an experiential proposition. 
Then we may say that it is the mark of a genuine factual 
proposition, not that it should be equivalent to an experien- 
tial proposition, or any finite number of experiential pro- 
positions, but simply that some experiential propositions 
can be deduced from it in conjunction with certain other 
premises without being deducible from those other pre- 
mises alone, 8 

This criterion seems liberal enough. In contrast to the 
principle of conclusive verifiabibty. it clearly does not 

ft. "TCus is an over-simplified statement, which is not literally cor- 
rect. 1 give what 1 believe to be the correct formulation in the 
Introduction, p. 16 

20 



deny significance to general propositions or to proposi- 
tions about the past. Let us see what kinds of assertion, it 
rules out. 

A good example of the kind of utterance that is con- 
demned by our criterion as being not even false but 
nonsensical would be the assertion that the world of sense- 
experience was altogetner- unreal. It must, of course, be 
admitted that our senses do sometimes deceive US. We 
may. as the result of having certain sensations, expect cer- 
tain other sensations to be obtainable which are, in fact, 
not obtainable. But, in all such cases. It is further sense- 
experience that informs us of the mistakes that arise out 
of scnsc-cxperience. We s&y that the senses sometimes de- 
ceive us, just because the expectations to which our sense- 
experiences give rise do not always accord with what we 
subsequently experience. That is, we rely on our senses to 
substantiate or confute the judgements which are based 
on our sensations. And therefore the fact that our percep- 
tual judgements are sometimes found to be erroneous has 
not the slightest tendency to show that the world of sense- 
experience Is unreal. And, indeed, it is plain that no con- 
ceivable observation, or series of observations, could have 
any tendency to show that the world revealed to us by 
sense-experience was unreal. Consequently, anyone who 
condemns the sensible world as a world of mere appear- 
ance, as opposed to reality, is saying something which, 
according to our criterion of significance, is literally non- 
sensical. 

An. example of a -controversy which the application of 
our criterion obliges us to condemn as fictitious is pro- 
vided by those who dispute concerning the number of sub- 
stances that there are in the world. For it is admitted both 
by monists. who maintain that reality is one substance, 
aad by pluralism, who maintain that reality is many, that 
it is impossible to imagine any empirical situation which 

2.1 



would be relevant to the solution of their dispute. But if 
we art told that no po&iblc observation could give any 
probability cither to the assertion that reality was one 
substance or to the assertion that it was many, then we 
muse conclude that neither assertion is significant. We 
shall see later on* that there are genuine logical and em- 
pirical questions involved in the dispute between raonists 
and pluralists. But the metaphysical question concerning 
'substance' is ruled out by our criterion as spurious. 

A similar treatment must be accorded to the controversy 
between realists and idealists, in its metaphysical aspect. 
A simple illustration , which I have made use of in a simi- 
lar argument elsewhere,* will help to demonstrate this. 
Let us suppose that a picture is discovered and the suggestion 
made that it was painted by Goya, There is a definite 
procedure for dealing with such a question. The experts 
examine the picture to see in what way it resembles the 
accredited works of Goya, and to see if it bears any marks 
which are characteristic of a forgery; they look up con- 
temporary records for evidence of the existence of such 
a picture, and so on. In the end, they may still disagree, 
but each one lenows what empirical, evidence would go 
to confirm or discredit his opinion. Suppose, now, that 
these men have studied philosophy, and some of them pro- 
ceed to maintain that this picture is a set of ideas in the 
perceiver's mind, or in God's mind, others that at is ob- 
jectively real. What possible experience could any of them 
have which would be relevant to the solution of this dis- 
pute one way or the other? in the ordinary sense of the 
term 'real', in which it is opposed to 'illusory', the reality 
of the picture is not in doubt. The disputants have satis- 
fied themselves that the picture is real, in this sense, by 

9, In Chapter VfflL 

10. Vide 'Demonstration of the Impossibility of Metaphysics', 
Mind, 1934 p. 339, 

22 



obtaining a correlated series of sensations of sight and 
sensations of touch. Is there any similar process by which. 
they could discover whether the picture was real in. the 
sense in which the term 'real' is opposed to 'ideal'? 
Clearly there k none. But, if that is so, the problem is ficti- 
tious according to our criterion. This docs not mean that 
the realist-idealist controversy may be dismissed without 
further ado. For it can legitimately be regarded as a dis- 
pute concerning the analysis of existential propositions 
and so as involving a logical problem which, as we shall 
sec, can be definitively solved. 11 What we have just shown 
is that the question at issue between idealists and realists 
becomes fictitious when, as is often the <ase, ft is given a 
metaphysical interpretation. 

There is no need for us to give further examples of the 
operation of our criterion of significance. For our object 
is merely to show that philosophy, as a genuine branch 
of knowledge, must be distinguished from metaphysics. 
We are not now concerned with the historical question 
how much of what has traditionally passed for philosophy 
is actually metaphysical. We shall, however, point out 
later on that the majority of the 'great philosophers' of 
the past were not essentially metaphysicians, and thus re- 
assure those who would otherwise be prevented from 
adopting our criterion by considerations of piety. 

As to the validity of the verification principle, in the 
form in which we have stated it, a demonstration will be 
given in the course of this book. For it will be shown that 
all propositions which have factual content arc empirical 
hypotheses; and that the function of an empirical hypo- 
thesis is to provide a rule for the anticipation of experi- 
ence. 11 And this means that every empirical hypothesis 
must be relevant to some actual, or possible, experience, so 
that a statement which is not relevant to any experience 

1 1. Vide Cha p t er A' III- ia. Vide Chapter V. 

23 



is not an empirical hypothesis, and accordingly has no 
factual content. But this is precisely what the principle of 
verifiability asserts, 

It should be mentioned here that the fact that the utter- 
ances of the metaphysician are nonsensical does not fol- 
low Simply from the fact that they are devoid of factual 
content. It follows from that fact, together with the fact 
that they are not a priori propositions. And in assuming 
that they are not a priori propositions, we arc once again 
anticipating the conclusions of a later chapter in this 
book, 11 For it will be shown there that a priori proposi- 
tions, which have always been Attractive to philosophers 
on account of their certainty, owe this certainty to the 
fact that they are tautologies. We may. accordingly define 
a metaphysical sentence as a sentence which purports to 
express a genuine proposition, but docs, in fact, express 
neither a tautology nor an empirical hypothesis. And as 
tautologies and empirical hypotheses form the entire class 
of significant propositions, we are justified in concluding 
that all metaphysical assertions are nonsensical, Our 
next task is to show how they come to be made. 

TTie use of the term 'substance', to which we have al- 
ready referred, provides us with a good example of the 
way in which metaphysics mostly comes to be written. It 
happens to be the case that we cannot, in our language, 
refer to the sensible properties of a thing without intro- 
ducing a word or phrase which appears to stand for the 
thing itself as opposed to anything which may be said 
about it. And, as a result of this, those who are infected 
by the primitive superstition that to every name a single 
real entity must correspond assume that it is necessary to 
distinguish logically between the thing itself and any, or 
all, of its sensible properties. And so they employ the term 
'substance* to refer to the thing itself. Bat from the fact 

13. Chapwr ry. 

24 



that we happen to employ a single word to xefer to a thing, 
and make that word the grammatical subject of the sen- 
tences in which we refer to the sensible appearances of 
the thing, it does not by any means follow that the thing 
itself is a •simple entity', or tha-t it cannot be defined in 
terms of the totality of its appearances. It is true that m 
talking of "its' appearances we appear to distinguish the 
thing from the appearances, but that is simply an accident 
of linguistic usage. Logical analysis shows that what 
makes these 'appearances' the 'appearances of* the same 
thing is not their relationship to an entity other than them- 
selves, but their relationship to one another. The meta- 
physicia n fails to see this because he is misled by a superficial 
grammatical featureof his language. 

A simpler and clearer instance of the way in which a 
consideration of grammar leads to metaphysics is the case 
of the metaphysical concept of Being, The origin of our 
temptation to raise questions about Being, which no con- 
ceivable experience would enable us to answer, lies in the 
fact that, in our language, sentences which express exis- 
tential propositions and sentences which express attribu- 
tive propositions may be of the same grammatical form. 
For instance, the sentences 'Martyrs exist' and 'Martyrs 
suffer' both consist of a noun followed by an intransitive 
verb, and the fact that they have grammatically the same 
appearance leads one to assume that they are of the same 
logical type. It is seen that in the proposition 'Martyrs 
suffer', the members of a certain species are credited with 
a certain attribute, and it is sometimes assumed that the 
same thing is true of such a proposition as 'Martyrs exist*. 
If this were actually the case, it would, indeed, be as legiti- 
mate to speculate about the Being of martyrs as it is to 
speculate about their suffering. But. as Kant pointed out, 11 

14. Vide The Critique ol Pure Reason, 'Transcendental Dialectic*. 
Book Ik Chapter tii, section 4- 

25 



; 



existence is not an attribute. For, when we ascribe an at- 
tribute to a thing, we covertly assert that it exists : so that 
if existence were itself an attribute, it would follow that 
all positive existential propositions were tautologies, and 
all negative existential propositions self-contradictory; 
and this fa not the case." So that those who raise questions 
about Being which are based on the assumption that exis- 
tence is an attribute are guilty of following grammar "be- 
yond the boundaries of sense. 

A similar mistake has been made in connexion with 
such propositions as 'Unicorns are fictitious'. Here again 
the fact that there is a superficial grammatical resemhlance 
between the English sentences 'Dogs are faithful' and 
'Unicorns are fictitious*, and between the corresponding 
sentences in other languages, creates the assumption, that 
they sae of the same logical type. Dogs must exist in or- 
der to have the property of being faithful, and so it is held 
that unless unicorns in some way existed they could not 
have the property of being fictitious. But, as it is plainly 
self-contradictory to say that fictitious objects exist, the 
device is adopted of saying that they are real in some non- 
empirical sense - that they have a mode of real Being 
which is different from the mode of being of existent 
things. But since there is no way of testing whether an 
object is real in this sense, as there is for testing whether 
it is real in the ordinary sense, the assertion that fictitious 
objects have a special non-empirical mode of real being is 
devoid of all literal significance. It comes to be made as a 
result of the assumption that being fictitious is an attri- 
bute. And this is a fallacy of the same order as the fallacy 
of supposing that existence is an attribute, and it can be 
exposed in the same way. 

In general, the postulation of real non-existent entities 

i j. This argument is well stated by Job.11 'Wisdom, l&tetptet&tiOB 
and Analyst , pp. 6 1, -'.3 . 

26 






results from the superstition, just now referred to, that, 
to every word or phrase that can be the grammatical sub- 
ject of a sentence, there must somewhere be a real entity 
corresponding. For as there is no place in the empirical 
world for many of these 'entities', a special non-empirical 
world is invoked to house them. To this error must be 
attributed, not only the utterances of a Heidegger, who 
bases his metaphysics on the assumption that 'Nothing' 
is a name which is used to denote something peculiarly 
mysterious,* but also the prevalence of such problems as 
those concerning the reality of propositions and univer- 
sal whose senselessness, though less obvious, is no less 
complete. 

These few examples afford a sufficient indication of the 
way in which most metaphysical assertions come to be 
formulated. They show how easy it is to write sentences 
which are literally nonsensical without seeing that they 
are nonsensical. And thus we see that the view that a num- 
ber of the traditional 'problems of philosophy' are meta- 
physical, and consequently fictitious, does not involvi any 
incredible assumptions about the psychology of philoso- 
phers. 

Among those who recognize that if philosophy is to be 
accounted a genuine branch of knowledge it must be de- 
fined in such a way as to distinguish it from metaphysics. 
it is fashionable to speak of the metaphysician as a kind of 
misplaced poet. As his statements have no literal meaning. 
they are not subject to any criteria of truth or falsehood : 
but they may still serve to express, or arouse, emotion, 
and thus be subject to ethical or aesthetic standards, And 
it is suggested that they may have considerable value, as 
means of mora! inspiration, or even as works of art. In 

16. Vide Was ist Metapbysik. l>y Heidegger: criticized by Rudolf 
Catnap in his ' Uberwindung der Metaphyn.lt durch togische Analyse 
4ft Spfacfae'i Efkenatais, Vol. II, 1932, 

27 






! 



this way, an attempt is made to compensate the metaphy- 
sician for his extrusion from philosophy. 

I am afraid that this compensation is hardly in accord- 
ance with his deserts. The view that the metaphysician is 
to be reckoned among the poets appears to rest on the as- 
sumption that both talk nonsense. But this assumption is 
false. In the vast majority of cases the sentences which are 
produced by poets do have literal meaning. The difference 
between the man who uses language scientifically and the 
man who uses it emotively is not that the one produces 
sentences which are incapable of arousing emotion, and 
the other sentences whirfi have no sense, hut that the one 
is primarily concerned with the expression of true proposi- 
tions, the other with the creation of a work of art. Thus, if 
a work of science contains true and important proposi- 
tions, its value as a work of science will hardly be dimin- 
ished by the fact that they are inelegantly expressed. And 
simiJarly, a work of art is not necessarily the worse for 
the fact that all the propositions comprising it are literally 
false. But to say that many literary works are largely com- 
posed of falsehoods, is not to say that they are composed 
of pseudo-propositions, It is, in fact, very rare for a 
literary artist to produce sentences which have no literal 
meaning. And where this does occur, the sentences are 
carefully chosen for their rhythm and! balance. If the au- 
thor writes nonsense, it is because he considers it most 
suitable for bringing about the effects for which his writ- 
ing is designed. 

The metaphysician, on the other hand, does not Intend 
to write nonsense. He lapses into it through being deceived 
by grammar, or through committing errors of reasoning, 
such as that which lead 1 : to the view that the sensible 

17, for a discussion of this point, see also C A. Mace, 'Representa- 
tion and Expression', Analysis, Vol I. No. 33 ; and 'Metaphysics and 
tmodvc Language', Analysis, Vol. ll.Nos. 1 aod a. 

28 



world is unreal. But it is not the mark of a poet samply to 

make mistakes of this sort. There are some, indeed, who 
would see in the fact that the metaphysician's utterances 
are senseless a reason against the view that they have aes- 
thetic value. And, without going so far as this, wc may 
safely say that it does not constitute a reason for it. 

It is true, however, that although the greater part of 
metaphysics is merely the embodiment of humdrum er- 
rors, there remain a number of metaphysical passages 
which are the work of genuine mystical feeling; and they 
may more plausibly he held to have moral or aesthetic 
value. But, as far as we are concerned, the distinction be- 
tween the kind of metaphysics that is produced by a philo- 
sopher who has been duped by grammar, and the kind that 
is produced by a mystic who is trying to express the in- 
expressible, is of no great importance: what is important 
to us is to realize that even the utterances of the meta- 
physician who is attempting to expound a vision are literally 
senseless; so that henceforth we may pursue our philosophi- 
cal researches with as little regard for them as for the more 
inglorious kind of metaphysics which comes from a failure 
to understand the workings of our language. 



z? 



CHAPTER 2 

THE FUNCTION OF PHILOSOPHY 

-. 

Among the superstitions from which we are freed by the 
abandonment of metaphysics is the view that it is the busi- 
ness of the philosopher to construct a deductive system. 
In rejecting this view wc are not, of course, suggesting 
that the philosopher can dispense with deductive reasoning. 
We are simply contesting his right to posit certain first 
principles, and then offer them with their consequences as 
a complete picture of reality. To discredit this procedure, 
one has only to show that there can be no Jlrst principles 
of the kind it requires. 

As it is the function of these first principles to provide a 
certain "basis for our knowledge, it is clear that they are not 
to be found among the so-called laws of nature. For we 
.shall see that the 'laws of nature', if they are not mere 
definitions, are simply hypotheses which may be confuted 
by experience. And, indeed, it has never been the practice 
of the system-builders in philosophy to choose inductive 
generalizations for their premises. Rightly regarding such 
generalizations as being merely probable, they subordin- 
ate them to principles which they believe to be logically 
certain. 

This is illustrated most clearly in the system of 
Descartes. It is commonly said that Descartes attempted 
to derive all human knowledge from premises whose truth 
was intuitively certain : but this interpretation puts an un- 
due stress on the element of psychology in his system. I 
think he realized well enough that a mere appeal to intui- 
tion was insufficient for his purpose, since men are not all 
equally credulous, and that what he was really trying to 
do was to base all our knowledge on propositions which 

30 






it would be self-contradictory to deny. He thought he had 
found such a proposition ia 'cogito', -which must not here 
be understood in its ordinary sense of 'I think'* but rather 
as meaning 'there is a thought now'. In fact he was wrong, 
because "non cogito' would be self-contradictory only if it 
negated itself; and this no significant proposition can do. 
But even if it were true that such a proposition as 'there is 
a thought now' "was logically certain, it still would not 
serve Descartes's purpose. For if 'cogito' is taken in this 
sense, his initial principle, 'cogito ergo sum', is false. "1 
exist' -docs not follow from 'there is a thought now'. The 
fact that a thought occurs at a given moment does not 
entail that any other thought has occurred at any other 
moment, still less that there has occurred a serks of 
thoughts sufficient to constitute a single self. As Hume 
conclusively showed, no one event intrinsically points to 
any other. We infer the existence of events which we are 
not actually observing, with the help of .general principles. 
But these principles must be obtained inductively. By mere 
deduction from what is immediately given we cannot ad- 
vance a single step beyond. And, consequently, any at- 
tempt to base a deductive system on propositions which 
describe what is immediately given is bound to be a failure. 
The only other course open to one who wished to de- 
duce all our knowledge from 'first principles', without 
indulging in metaphysics, would be to take for his pre- 
mises a set of a priori truths. But, as we have already 
mentioned, and shall later show, an a priori truth is a 
tautology. And from a set of tautologies, taken by them- 
selves, only further tautologies can be validly deduced. 
But it would be absurd to put forward a system of tauto- 
logies as constituting the whole truth about the universe. 
And thus we may conclude that it is not possible to deduce 
all our knowledge from 'first principles'; so that those 
who hold that it is the function of philosophy to carry 

3i 



out such a deduction are denying its claim to be a 
genuine branch of knowledge. 

The belief that it is the business of the philosopher to 
search for first principles is bound up with the familiar 
conception of philosophy as the study of reality as a 
whole. And this conception is one which it is difficult to 
criticize, because it is so vague. If it is taken to imply, as 
it sometimes is, that the philosopher somehow projects 
himself outside the world, and takes a bird's-eye view of 
it- then it is plainly a metaphysical conception. And it is 
also metaphysical to assert, as some do, that 'reality as a 
v/hole' is somehow generically different from the reality 
which is investigated piecemeal by the special sciences. 
But if the assertion that philosophy studies reality as a 
whole is understood to imply merely that the philosopher 
b equally concerned with the content of every Sciencej 
then we may accept it, not indeed as an adequate defini- 
tion of philosophy, but as a truth about it. For we shall 
find, when we come to discuss the relationship of philo- 
sophy to science, that it is not, in principle, related to any 
one science more closely than to any other. 

In saying that philosophy is concerned with each of 
the sciences, in a manner which we shall indicate, 1 we 
mean also to rule out the supposition that philosophy can 
be ranged alongside the existing sciences, as a special de- 
partment of speculative knowledge. Those who make this 
supposition cherish the belief thai there are some things in 
the world which are possible objects of speculative know- 
ledge and yet lie beyond the scope of empirical science. 
But this belief is a delusion. There is no field of experience 
which cannot, in principle, be brought under some form 
of scientific law. and no type of speculative knowledge 
About the world which it is, in principle, beyond the power 
of science to give. Wc have already gone some way to sub- 

• r . Vide Chapter 111 and Chapter VIII. 

32 



■ 



■ 

■ 

stantiate this proposition by -demolishing metaphysics; 
and we shall justify it to the full in the course of this book. 

With this we complete the over throw of speculative 
philosophy. We arc now in a position to see that the func- 
tion of philosophy is wholly critical. In what exactly does 
its critical activity consist? 

One way of answering this question is to say that it is 
the philosopher's business to test the validity of our scien- 
tific hypotheses and everyday assumptions. But this view, 
though very widely held, is mistaken. If a man chooses to 
doubt the troth of all the propositions he ordinarily be- 
Sieves, it is not in the power of philosophy to reassure him. 
The most that philosophy can do, apart from seeing 
whether his beliefs are self-consistent, is to show what are 
the criteria which are used to determine the truth of false- 
hood of any given proposition • and then, when the sceptic 
realizes that certain observations would verify his proposi- 
tions, he may also realize that he could make those 
observations, and so consider his original beliefs to be 
justified. But in such a case one cannot say that it is philo- 
sophy which justifies his beliefs. Philosophy merely shows 
him that experience can justify them. We may look to 
the philosopher to show us what we accept as constitut- 
ing sufficient evidence for the truth of any given empiri- 
cal proposition. But whether the evidence is forthcoming 
or not is in every case a purely empirical question. 

If anyone thinks that we are here taking too much for 
granted, let him refer to the chapter on 'Truth and Pro- 
bability*, in which we discuss how the validity of syn- 
thetic propositions is determined. He will see there that 
the only sort of justification that is necessary or possible 
for self-consistent empirical propositions is empirical veri- 
fication. And this applies just as much to the laws of 
science as to the maxims of common Xtist* Indeed there 
is no diiference in kind between them. The superiority of 

33 



the scientific hypothesis consists merely in its being more 
abstract, more precise, and more fruitful. And although 
scientific objects such as atoms and electrons seem to be 
fictitious in a way that chairs and tables are not, here, too, 
the distinction is only a distinction of degree. For both 
these lunds of objects arc known only by their sensible 
manifestations and are definable in terms of them. 

It is time, therefore, to abandon the supersition that 
natural science cannot be regarded as logically respectable 
until philosophers have solved the problem of induction. 
The problem of induction is, roughly speaking, the prob- 
lem of finding a way to prove that certain empirical gen- 
eralizations which are derived from past experience will 
hold good also in the future. There are only two ways of 
approaching this problem on the assumption that It is a 
genuine problem, and it is easy to see that neither of them 
can lead to its solution. One may attempt to deduce the 
proposition which one is required to prove either from a 
purely formal principle or from an empirical principle. In 
the former case one commits the error of supposing that 
from a tautology it is possible to deduce a proposition 
about a matter of fact; in the latter case one simply as- 
sumes what one is setting out to prove, For example, it is 
often said that we can justify induction by invoking the 
uniformity of nature, or by postulating a "principle of 
limited independent variety'.* But, in fact, the principle 
of the uniformity of nature merely states, in a misleading 
fashion, the assumption that past experience is a reliable 
guide to the future; while the principle of limited indepen- 
dent variety presupposes it. And it is plain that any other 
empirical principle which was put forward as a Justifica- 
tion of induction would beg the question in the same way. 
For the only grounds which one could have for believing 
such a principle would be inductive grounds. 

*, rf, J. M. Keynes, A Treatise on rrobabillty, Part i II, 

34 



Thus it appears that there is no possible way of solving 

the problem of induction, as it is ordinarily conceived. 
And this means that it is a fictitious problem, since all 
genuine problems arc at least theoretically capable of be- 
ing solved: and the credit of natural science is not im- 
paired by the fact that some philosophers continue to be 
puzzled by it. Actually, we shall see that the only test to 
whkh a form of scientific procedure which satisfies the 
necessary condition of self -consistency is subject, is the 
test of its success in. practice. Wc are entitled to have faith 
in our procedure just so long as it does the work which it 
is designed to do - that is, enables us to predict future 
experience, and so to control our environment. Of course,, 
the fact that a certain form of procedure has always been 
successful in practice affords no logical guarantee that 
it will continue to be so. But then it is a mistake to demand 
a guarantee where it is logically impossible to obtain one. 
This does not mean that it is irrational to expect future 
experience to conform to the past. For when we come to 
define 'rationality' we shall find that for us 'being rational" 
entails being guided in a particular fashion by past ex- 
perience. 

The task of defining rationality is precisely the sort of 
task that it Is the business of philosophy to undertake. But 
in achieving this it does not justify scientific procedure. 
What justifies scientific procedure, to the extent to which 
it is capable of being justified, is the success of the predic 
tions to which it gives rise: and this can be determined 
only in actual experience. By itself, the analysis of a syn- 
thetic principle tells us nothing whatsoever about its 
truth. 

Unhappily, this fact is generally disregarded by philo- 
sophers who concern themselves with the so-called theory 
of knowledge. Thus it is common for writers on the sub- 
ject of perception to assume that, unless one can give a 

35 






■ ■ 



satisfactory analysis of perceptual situation?, one is hot 
entitled to believe in the existence of material things. But 
this is a complete mistake. What gives one the right to "be- 
lieve in the existence of a certain material thing is simply 
the fact that one has certain sensations ; for, whether one 
realizes it or not, to say that the thing exists is equivalent 
to saying that such sensations are obtainable. It is the 
philosopher's business to give a correct definition of ma- 
terial things in terms of sensations. But his success of fail- 
ure in this task has no bearing whatsoever on the validity 
of our perceptual judgements. That depends wholly on 
actual sense-experience. 

It follows that the philosopher has no right to despise 
the beliefs of common sense. If he does so, he merely dis- 
plays his ignorance of the true purpose of his inquiries. 
What he is entitled to despise is the unreflecting analysis 
of those beliefs, which takes the grammatical structure of 
the sentence as a trustworthy guide to its meaning. Thus. 
many of the mistakes made in connexion with the problem 
of perception can he accounted for by the fact, already 
referred to in connexion with the metaphysical notion of 
'substance', that it happens to be Impossible in an ordinary 
European language to mention a thing without appearing 

to distinguish it genericalfy from its qualities and states. 

But from the fact that the common-sense analysis of a 
proposition is mistaken it by no means follows that the 
proposition is not true. The philosopher may be able to 
show us that the propositions wc believe arc far more com- 
plex than we suppose; hut it does not follow from this that 
we have no right to believe them. 

It should now be sufficiently clear that if the philoso- 
pher is to uphold his claim to make a special contribu- 
tion to the stock of our knowledge, he must not attempt to 
formulate speculative truths, or to look for first principles, 
or to make a priori judgements about the validity of our 

36 



empirical beliefs. He must, in fact, confine himself to 
works of clarification and analysis of a sort which we 
shall presently describe. 

In saying that the activity of philosophizing is essen- 
tially analytic, we are not, of course, maintaining that all 
those who are commonly called philosophers have actu- 
ally been engaged in carrying out analyses. On the con- 
trary, we have been at pains to show that a great deal of 
what is commonly called philosophy is metaphysical in 
character. What we have been in search of, in inquiring 
into the function of philosophy, is a definition of philo- 
sophy which should accord to some extent with the prac- 
tice of those who are commonly called philosophers, and 
at the same time be consistent with the common assump- 
tion that philosophy is a special branch of knowledge. It 
is because metaphysics fails to satisfy this second condi- 
tion that we distinguish it from philosophy, in spite of the 
fact that it is commonly referred to as philosophy. And 
our justification for making this distinction is that it is 
necessitated by our original postulate that philosophy is 
a special branch of knowledge, and our demonstration 

that Metaphysics is not. 

Although this procedure is logically unassailable, it will 
perhaps be attacked on the ground that it is inexpedient. 
It will be said that the 'history of philosophy' is, almost 
entirely, a history of metaphysics; and, consequently, that 
although there is no actual fallacy involved in our using 
the word "phj^o ( soph^y , in the sense in which philosophy 
is incompatible with metaphysics, it is dangerously mis- 
leading. For all our care in defining the term will not pre- 
vent people from confusing the activities which we call 
philosophical with the metaphysical activities of those 
whom they have been taught to regard as philosophers. 
And therefore it would surely be advisable for us to aban- 
don the term 'philosophy' altogether, as a name for a 

37 



distinctive branch of Tenowledge. and invent some new 
description for the activity which we were minded to call 
the activity of philosophizing. 

Our answer to this is that it is not the case that the 'his- 
tory of philosophy' is almost entirely a history of meta- 
physics. That it contains some metaphysics is undeniable. 
But I think it can he shown that the majority of those 
who are commonly supposed to have been great philoso- 
phers were primariLy not metaphysicians but analysts. For 
example, I do not see how anyone who follows the ac- 
count which we shall give of the nature of philosophical 
analysis and them turns to Locke's Essay Concerning Hu- 
man Understanding can foil to conclude that it is essen- 
tially an analytic work. Locke is generally regarded as 
being one who, like G. E. Moore at the present time, puts 
forward a philosophy of common scnse. , But he does not 
any more than Moore, attempt to give an a priori justi- 
fication of our ■common-sense beliefs. Rather does he ap- 
pear to have seen that tt was not his business as a philo- 
sopher to affirm or deny the validity of any empirical 
propositions, but only to analyse them. For he is content, 
in his own words, 'to be employed as an uDder4abourer in 
clearing the ground a little, and removing some of the 
rubbish that lies in the way of knowledge'; and so de- 
votes himself to the purely analytic tasks of defining 
knowledge, and classifying propositions, and displaying 
the nature of material things. And the smalt portion of 
his work which is not philosophical, in our sense, is not 
given over to metaphysics, but to psychology. 

Nor is it fair to regard Berkeley as a metaphysician. For v 
he did not, in fact, deny the reality of material things, as 
we are. still too commonly told. What he denied was the 
adequacy of Locke's analysis of the notion of a material 

3. Vide C. E Moore, 'A I>cfcnce of Common Sense', Contemporary 
British MaioM|*r,VoL II, 

38 



thing. He maintained that to say of various 'ideas of sen- 
sation* that they belonged to a single material thing was 
not, as 1/kIcc thought, to say that they were related to a 
single unobservahle underlying 'somewhat ''. but rather 
that they stood in certain relations to one another. And in 
this he was: right. Admittedly he made the mistake of sup- 
posing that what was immediately given in sensation, was 
necessarily mental; and the use. by him and by Locke, of 
the word 'idea' to denote an element in that which is 
sejisibly given is objectionable, because it suggests this 
false view. Accordingly we replace the word 'idea' in this 
usage by the neutral word "sense-content', which we shalL 
use to refer to the immediate data not merely of 'outer' 
but also of ' introspective' sensation, and say that what 
Berkeley discovered was that material things must be de- 
finable in terms of sense-contents. We shall see, when we 
come finally to settle the conflict between idealism and 
realism, that his actual conception of the relationship be- 
tween material things and sense-contents was not alto- 
gether accurate. It led Mm to some notoriously paradoxi- 
cal conclusions, which a slight emendation will enable us 
to avoid. But the fact that he failed to give a completely 
correct account of the way in which material things are 
constituted out of sense-contents does not invalidate his 
contention that they are so constituted. On the contrary, 
we know that it must be possible to define material things 
in terms of sense-contents, because it is only by the occur- 
rence of certain sense-contents that the existence of any 
material thing can ever be in the least degree verified. And 
thus we see that we have not to inquire whether a pheno- 
menalist 'theory of perception* or some other sort of 
theory is correct, but only what form of phenomenahst 
theory is correct For the fact that all causal and repre- 
sentative theories of perception treat material things as if 
they were unobservable entities entitles us, as Berkeley saw, 

39 



to rule them out a priori. The unfortunate thing Is that, in 
spite of this, he found it necessary to postulate Cod as an 
unobservable cause of our 'ideas'; and he must be criti- 
cized also for falling to See that the argument which he 
uses to dispose of Locke's analysis of a material thing is 
fatal to his own conception of the nature of the self, a 
point which was effectively seized upon by Hume, 

Of Hume we may say not merely that he was not tn 
practice a metaphysician, but that he explicitly rejected 
metaphysics. We find the strongest evidence of this in the 
passage with which he concludes his Enquiry Concerning 
Human Understanding. *K V he says, 'we take in our hand 
*oy volume; of divinity, or school metaphysics, for in- 
stance; let us ask. Does it contain any abstract reasoning 
concerning quantity or number ? No. Does it contain any 
experimental reasoning concerning matter of fact and 
existence? No. Commit it then to the flames. For it can 
contain nothing but sophistry and illusion.' What is this 
but a rhetorical version of our own thesis that a sentence 
which does not express either a formally true proposition 
or an empirical hypothesis is devoid of literal significance? 
It is true that Hume does not, so far as I know, actually 
put forward any view concerning the nature of philoso- 
phical propositions themselves, but those of his works 
which are commonly accounted philosophical are> apart 
from certain passages which deal with Questions of psy- 
chology, works of analysts, if this is not universally con- 
ceded, it is because his treatment of causation, which is 
the main feature of his philosophical work, is often mis- 
interpreted. He has bceu accused of denying causation, 
whereas in fact he was concerned only with defining it. 
So far is he from asserting that no causal propositions 
are true that he is himself at pains to give rules for judg- 
ing of the existence of causes and effects.* He realized well 

*. Vide A Tteatiii ©I Human Nature, Book. I, Pan III, section 15. 

40 



enough that the question whether a given causal proposi- 
tion was true or false was not one that could be settled a 
priori, and accordingly confined himself to discussing the 
analytic question, What is it that we are asserting when 
we assert that one event is causally connected with an- 
other ? And in answering this question he showed, I think, 

conclusively, first that the relation of cause and effect was 
not logical in character, since any proposition asserting a 
casual connexion could be denied without self-contra- 
diction, secondly that causal laws were not analytically 
derived from experience, since they were not deducible 
from any finite number of experiential propositions, and. 
thirdly, that it was a mistake to analyse propositions as- 
serting causal connexions in terms of a relation of neces- 
sitation which held between particular events, since it was 
impossible to conceive of any observations which would 
have the slightest tendency to establish the existence of 
such a relation. He thus laid the way open for the view, 
which we adopt, that every assertion of a particular causal 
connexion involves the assertion of a causal law, and that 
every general proposition of the form 'C causes E' is 
equivalent to a proposition of the form 'whenever C then 
E\ where the symbol 'whenever' must be taken to refer* 
not to a finite number of actual instances of C. but to the 
infinite number of possible instances. He himself defines 
a cause as 'an object, followed by another, and where all 
the objects similar to the first are followed by objects simi- 
lar to the second', or, alternatively, as 'an object followed 
by another, and whose appearance always conveys the 
thought to that other'; 1 but neither of these definitions is 
acceptable as it stands. For, even if it is true that we should 
not, according to our standards of rationality, have good 
reason to believe that an event C was the cause of an event 
E unless we had observed a constant conjunction of events 

J. An Enquiry CoiKtfrdiiy Humaa Understanding:, section jr. 

41 



*;; 



like C with events like E, still there is no self-contradiction 
involved in asserting the proposition *C is the cause of E' 
and at the same time denying that any events like C or 
like E ever have been observed: and this would be self- 
contradictory if the first of the definitions quoted was eor- 
rcct. Nor is it inconceivable, as the second definition im- 
plies, that there should be causal laws which have never 
yet been thought of. But although we are obliged, for these 
reasons, to reject Hume's actual definitions of a cause, our 
view of the nature of causation remains substantially the 
same as his. And we agree with him that there can be no 
other justification for inductive reasoning than its success 
in practice, while insisting more strongly than be did that 
no better justification is required. For it is his failure to 
make this second point clear that has given his views the 
air of paradox which has caused them to be so much 
undervalued and misunderstood. 

When we consider, also, that Hobbes and Bentham were 
chiefly occupied in giving definitions, and that the best 
part of John Stuart Mill's work consists in a development 
of the analyses carried out by Hume, we may fairly claim 
that in holding that the activity of philosophizing is es- 
sentially analytic we are adopting a standpoint which has 
always been implicit in English empiricism. Not that the 
practice of philosophical analysis has been confined to 
members of this school- But it is with them that we have 
the closest historical affinity. 

Jf I refrain from discussing these questions in detail, 
and make no attempt to furnish a complete list of all the 
'great philosophers' whose work is predominantly analy- 
tic - a list which would certainly include Plato and 
Aristotle and Kant - it is because the point to which this 
discussion is relevant is one of minor importance in our 
inquiry. Wc have been maintaining that much of 'tradi- 
tional philosophy* is genuinely philosophical, by out 

42 



standards, in order to defend ourselves against the charge 
that our retention of the word 'philosophy* is misleading. 
But even if it were the case that none of those who are 
commonly called philosophers had ever been engaged in 
what we call the activity of philosophizing, it would not 
follow that our definition of philosophy was erroneous, 
given our initial postulates. We may admit that our re- 
tention of the word 'philosophy' is causally dependent 
on our belief in the historical propositions set forth a Dove. 
But the validity of these historical propositions has no 
logical bearing on the validity of our definition of philo- 
sophy, nor on the validity of the distinction between 
philosophy, in our sense, and metaphysics. 

It is advisable to stress the point that philosophy, as we 
understand it, is wholly independent of metaphysics, in- 
asmuch as the analytic method is commonly supposed by 
its critics to have a metaphysical basis. Being misled by 
the associations of the word 'analysis', they assume that 
philosophical analysis is an activity of dissection; that it 
consists in "breaking up' objects into their constituent 
parts, until the whole universe is ultimately exhibited as 
an aggregate of 'bare particulars', united by external rela- 
tions. If this were really so, the most effective way of 
attacking the method would be to show that Its basic pre- 
supposition was nonsensical. For to say that the universe 
was an aggregate of bare particulars would be as senseless 
as to say that it was Fire or Water or Experience. It is 
plain that no possible observation would enable one to 
verify such an assertion. But, so far as I know, this line 
of criticism is in fact never adopted. The critics content 
themselves with pointing out that few, if any, of the com- 
plex objects in the world are simply the sum of their parts. 
They have a structure, art organic unity, which distin- 
guishes them, as genuine wholes, from mere aggregates. 
Rut the analyst, so it is said, is obliged by his atomistic 

43 



metaphysics to regard an object consisting of parts a, h, c, 
and d, in a distinctive configuration as being simply a-¥b 
+c+d. and thus gives an entirely false account of lis 
nature. 

If we follow the Gestalt psychologists, who of all men 
talk most constantly about genuine wholes, in defining 
such a whole as one in which the properties of every pari 
depend to some extent on its position in the whole, then 
we may accept it as an empirical fact that there exist gen- 
uine, or organic, wholes. And if the analytic method in- 
volved a denial of this fact, it would indeed be a faulty 
method. But, actually, the validity of the analytic method 
is not dependent on any empirical, much Jess any meta- 
physical, presupposition about the nature of things. For 
the philosopher, as an analyst, is not directly concerned 
with the physical properties of things. He Is concerned 
only with the way in which we speak about them. 

In other words, the propositions of philosophy are not 
factual, but linguistic in character - that is, they do not 
describe the behaviour of physical, or even mental, ob- 
jects; they express definitions, or the formal consequences 
of definitions. Accordingly, we may say that philosophy 
is a department of logic. For we shall see that the charac- 
teristic mark of a purely logical inquiry is that it is con- 
cerned with the formal consequences of our definitions 
and not with questions of empirical fact 

It follows that philosophy does not in any way compete 
with science. The difference in type between philosophical 
-and scientific propositions Is such that they cannot con- 
ceivably contradict one another. And this makes it clear 
that the possibility of philosophical analysis is independent 
of any empirical assumptions. That it is independent of 
any metaphysical assumptions should be even more 
obvious still. For it is absurd to suppose that the provision 
of definitions, and the study of their formal consequences, 

44 



involves the nonsensical assertion that the world is com- 
posed ol bare particulars, or any other metaphysical dog- 
ma. 

What has contributed as much as anything to The pre- 
valent misunderstanding of the nature of philosophical 
analysts is the fact that propositions and questions which 
are really linguistic arc often expressed in such a way that 
they appear to be factual.- 4 A striking instance of this is 
provided by The proposition that a material thing cannot 
be in two places at once. This looks like an empirical pro- 
position, and is constantly invoked by those who desire 
to prove that it is possible for an empirical proposition to 
be logically certain. &ut 3 more critical inspection shows 
that it is not empirical at all. but linguistic. It simply re- 
cords the fact that, as a result of certain verbal conven- 
tions, the proposition, that two sense-contents occur in 
the same visual or tactual sense-field is incompatible with 
the proposition that they belong to the same material 
thing, 7 And this is indeed a necessary fact. But it has not 
the least tendency to show that we have certain know- 
ledge about the empirical properties of objects. For it is 
necessary only because we happen 10 use the relevant 
words in a particular way. There is no logical reason why 
we should not so alter our definitions that the sentence 'A 
thing cannot be in two places at once' comes to express 
a self-contradiction instead of a necessary truth, 

Another good example of linguistically necessary pro- 
position which appears to be a record of empirical fact 
is the proposition, 'Relations are not particulars, but 

4. Canup has stressed this point. Where we speak of 'linguistic* 
propositions expressed in Tactual" or 'pseudo-factual' language he 
speaks of 'Pseudo-Qbjekis&tze' or ^uasi-synutaische SStze' as being 
expressed in the 'InhaltlicTw*, as opposed to the 'Formale Rctfe- 
weise'. Vide Lo$ische Syntax da Spraeh*. Par* V- 

7. cf. my article 'Oft Particulars and Univcrsals', Proceedings of 
the Aristotelian Society. rsJJ-4. pp. 5-4. 55. 

45 



unlversals.' One might suppose that this was a proposition 
of the same order as, 'Armenians are not Mohammedans, 
but Christians' : but one would be mistaken. For. where- 
as the tatter proposition is an empirical hypothesis relat- 
ing to the religious practices of a certain group of people, 
the former is not a proposition about 'things' at all, but 
simply about words. It records the fact that relatjon- 
symbok belong by definition to the class of symbols for 
characters, and not to the class of symbols for things. 

The assertion that relations are unlversals provokes the 
question, 'What is a universal ?'; and this question is not, 
as it has traditionally been regarded, a question about the 
character of certain real objects, but a request for a defini- 
tion of 2 certain term. Philosophy, as it is written, is fall 
of questions like this, which seem to be factual but are 
not. Thus, to ask what is the nature of a material object 
is to ask for a definition of 'material object', and this, as 
wc shall shortly see, is to ask how propositions about ma- 
terial objects are to be translated into propositions about 
sense-contents. Similarly, to ask what is a number is to 
ask some such question as whether it is possible to trans- 
late propositions about the natural numbers into proposi- 
tions about classes." And the same thing applies to all the 
philosophical questions of the form, 'What is an x?' or, 
'What is the nature of x2 ' They are all requests for defini- 
tions, and, as we shall see, for definitions of a peculiar 
sort. 

Although it, is misleading to write about linguistic ques- 
tions in 'factual' language, it is often convenient for the 
sake of brevity. And wc shall not always avoid doing it 
ourselves. But it is important that no one should be de- 
ceived by this practice into supposing that the philosopher 
is engaged on an empirical or a metaphysical Inquiry. We 

8. cf. Rudolf Camap, bjg'achc Syntax der Sprache, Fart V, 79B, 
and 84. 

46 



may speak loosely of him as analysing facts, or notions, or 
even things. But we must make it clear that these are sim- 
ply way? of saying that he is concerned with the ctefini- 

tion of the corresponding words. 



47 



CHAPTER 3 

THE NATURE OF PHILOSOPHICAL 
ANALYSIS 

From out assertion that philosophy provides definitions, 
it must not be inferred that it is the function of the philo- 
sopher to compile a dictionary, in the ordinary sense. 
For the definitions which philosophy is required to pro- 
vide are of a different kind from those which we expect to 
find in dictionaries. In a dictionary we look mainly for 
what may be called explicit definitions; in philosophy, for 
definitions in vse~ A brief explanation should suffice to 
make the nature of this distinction clear. 

We define a symbol explicitly when we put forward 
another symbol, or symbolic expression which is synony- 
mous with it. And the word 'synonymous 9 is here used in 
such a way that two symbols belonging to the same lan- 
guage can be said to be synonymous 3f, and only if, the 
simple substitution of one symbol for the other, in any 
sentence in which cither can significantly occur, always 
yields a new sentence which is equivalent to the old. And 
we say that two sentences of the same language are equiva« 
lent if, and only if, every sentence which is entailed by 
any given group of sentences in conjunction with owe of 
them is entailed by the same group in conjunction with 
the other. And, in this usage of the word "entail', a sen- 
tence s is said to entail a sentence t when the proposition 
expressed by t is deduciblc from the proposition expressed 
by s; while a proposition p is said to be deducible from, 
or to follow from, a proposition q when the denial of p 
contradicts the assertion of q , 

The provision of these criteria enables us to see that the 

48 



vast majority of the definitions which are given in ordin- 
ary discourse are explicit definitions. In particular, ic is 
worth remarking that the process of defining per genus et 
different iam, to which Aristotelian logicians devote so 
much attention, always yields definitions which are ex- 
plicit in the foregoing sense. Thus, when we define an 
oculist as an eye-doctor, what we are asserting is that, in 
the English language, the two symbols 'oculist* and 'eye- 
doctor* axe synonymous. And, generally speaking, all the 
questions that are discussed by logicians in connexion with 
this mode of definition are concerned with the possible 
ways <ti finding synonyms in a given language for any given 
term. We shall not enter into these questions ourselves, 
because they are irrelevant to our present purpose, which 
is to expound the method of philosophy. For the philoso- 
pher, as we have already said, is primarily concerned with 
the provision, not of explicit definitions, but of definitions 
in ttff? 

We define a symbol in use, not by saying that it is 
synonymous with some other symbol, but by showing 
how the sentences in which it significantly occurs can be 
translated into equivalent sentences, which contain neither 
the definiendum itself, nor any of its synonyms. A good 
illustration of this process is provided by Bertrand Rus- 
sell's recalled theory of definite descriptions, which is 
not a theory at all in the ordinary sense, but an indication 
of the way in which all phrases of the form 'the so-and- 
so' are to be defined. 3 It proclaims that every sentence 
which contains a symbolic expression of this form can 
be translated into a sentence which does not contain any 
Such expression, but does contain a sub-sentence asserting 

i. That this statera-ent needs to be qualified is shown in the 
Introduction, pp. jotf. 

2. Vide Trincipia Mathematica, Introduction. Chapter UU and 
Introduction to Mathematical fbUcsophy, Chapter xvt 

49 









that one, and only one. object possesses a certain property, 
or else that no one object possesses a certain property* 
Thus, the sentence The round square cannot exist' is 
equivalent to 'No one thing can he both square and 
round'; and the sentence 'The author of Waverfcy was 
Scotch' is equivalent to 'One person, and one person only, 
wrote Waveiley, and that person was Scotch. '* The first of 
these examples provides us with a typical illustration of 
the way in which any definite descriptive phrase which 
occurs as the subject of a negative existential sentence can 
be eliminated; and the second, with a typical iflustratMra 
of the way tn which any definite descriptive phrase which 
occurs anywhere in any other type of sentence can be 
eliminated. Together, therefore, they show us how to ex- 
press what is expressed by any sentence which contains a 
definite descriptive phrase without employing 4ny such 
phrase. And thus they furnish us with a definition of these 
phrases in use. 

The effect of this definition of descriptive phrases, as of 
all good definitions, is to increase our understanding of 
certain sentences. And this is a benefit which the author 
of such a definition confers not only on others, but also 
Oh himself. It might be objected that be must already un- 
derstand the sentences in order to be able to define the 
symbols which occur in them. But this initial understand- 
ing need not amount to anything more than an ability 
to tell, in practice, what sort of situations verify the 
propositions they express. Such a R understanding of sen- 
tences containing definite descriptive phrases may be pos- 
sessed even by those who believe that there are subsistent 
entities, such as the round square, or the present King of 
France. But the fact that they do maintain this shows 
that their understanding of these sentences is imperfect. 
For their lapse into metaphysics is the outcome of the 
S3. This is not quite accurate, vide Introduction, pp. 28-30. 

50 



naive assumption thai definite descriptive phrases are 
demonstrative symbols. And in the light of the clearer un- 
derstanding which is afforded by Russell's definition, we 
see that this assumption is false. Nor could this end have 
been achieved by an explicit definition of any descriptive 
phrase. What was required was a translation of sentences 
containing such phrases which would reveal what may be 
called their logical complexity. In general, we may say that 
it is the purpose of a philosophical definition to dispel 
those confusions which arise from our imperfect under- 
standing of certain types of sentence in our language, 
where the need cannot be met by the provision Of a 
synonym for any symbol, either because there is no 
synonym, or else because the available synonyms are un- 
clear in the same fashion as the symbol to which the con- 
fusion is due. 

A complete philosophical elucidation of any language 
would consist, first, in enumerating the types of sentence 

that were significant in thqt language, and then in display- 
ing the relations of equivalence that held between sen- 
tences of various types. And here it may be explained 
that two sentences are said to be of the same type when 
they can be correlated in such a way that to each symbol 
in one sentence there corresponds a symbol of the Same 
type in the other; and that two symbols arc said to be of 
the same type when, it is always possible to substitute one 
for the other without changing a significant sentence into 
a piece of nonsense. Such a system of definitions in use 
would reveal what may be called the structure of the lan- 
guage in question. And thus we may regard any particu- 
lar philosophical 'theory', such as Russell's 'theory of 

definite descriptions', as a revelation of part of the struc- 
ture of a given language. In Russell's case, the language is 
the everyday English language; and any other language, 
such as French or German, which has the same structure 

51 



■ I 



■ 



as English* And, in this context, it is not necessary to 
draw a distinction between the spoken and the written 
language. As far as the validity of a philosophical defini- 
tion is concerned, it does not matter whether we regard 
the symbol defined as being constituted by visible marks 
or by sounds. 

A factor which Complicates the structure of a language 
such as English is the prevalence of ambiguous symbols. 
A symbol is said to be ambiguous when it is constituted by 
signs which are identical in their sensible form, not only 
with one another, but also with signs which are elements 
of some Other symbol. For what makes two signs elements 
of the same symbol is not merely an identity of form, but 
also an identity of usa^e. Thus, if we were guided merely 
by the form of the sign, we should assume that the 'is' 
which occurs in the sentence 'He is the author of that 
book' Was the same symbol as the 'is' which occurs in 
the sentence 'A cat is a mammal'. But, when we come to 
translate the sentences, we find that the first is equivalent 
to 'He, and no one else, wrote that book", and the second 
to "The class of mammals contains the class of cats'- And 
this shows that, in this instance, each 'is ' is an ambiguous 
symbol which must not be confused with the other, norwith 
the ambiguous symbols of existence, and class-membership, 
and identity, and entailment, which are also constituted 
by signs of the form 'is'. 

To say that a symbol is constituted by signs which are 
identical with one another in their sensibJe form, and in 
their significance, and that a sign is a sense-content, or a 
series of sense-contents, which is used to convey literal 
meaning, is not to say that a symbol is a collection, or 
system, of sense-contents, for when we speak of certain 

4- This must not be takes to ■Triply that all English-speaking 

people actually employ a single precise system of symbols. Vide 
pp. 92-4 

52 



objects, b, «, d . . . as being elements of an object e. and 
of e as being constituted by 6* c, d . . . we are not saying 
that they form part of e, in the sense in which my arm is 
a part of my body, or a particular set of books on my shelf 
is pan of my collection of books. What we are saying is 
that all the sentences in -which the symbol e occurs can 
be translated into sentences which do not contain e it- 
self, or any symbol which is synonymous with e, but do 

contain symbols b, c, d In such a ease we say that e 

is a logical construction out of b, c, d. . . t And, in general, 
we may explain the nature of logical constructions by 
saying that the introduction of symbols which denote 
logical constructions is a device which enables us to state 
complicated propositions atout the elements of these con- 
structions in a relatively simple form. 
- What one must not say is that logical constructions arc 
fictitious objects. For while it is true that the English State, 
for example, is a logical construction out of individual 
people, and that the table at which I am writing is a logi- 
cal construction out of sense-contents, it is not true that 
either the English State or this table is fictitious, in the 
sense in which Hamlet or a mirage is fictitious, Indeed, the 
assertion that tables are logical constructions out of sense- 
contents is not a factual assertion at all, in the sense in 
which the assertion that tables were fictitious objects 
would be a factual assertion, albeit a false one. It is, as our 

explanation of the notion of a logical construction should 

have made clear, a linguistic assertion, to the effect that 
the symbol "table' is definable in terms of certain sym- 
bols which stand for sense-contents, not explicitly, but in 
use. And this, as we have seen, is tantamount to saying 
that sentences which contain the symbol 'table', or the 
corresponding symbol in any language which has the same 
structure as English, can all be translated into sentences 

of the same language which do not contain that symbol, 

S3 



nor any of its synonyms, but do contain certain symbols 
which stand for sense-contents; a fact which may be 
loosely expressed by saying that to say anything about a 
table is always to say something about sense-contents. This 
does not, of course, imply that to say something about a 
table is ever to say the same thing about the relevant sense- 
contents. For example, the sentence. 'I am now sitting In 
front of a tabic" can, in principle, be translated into a 
sentence which does not mention tables, but only sense- 
contents. But this does not mean that wc can simply sub- 
stitute a sense-content symbol for the symbol "table 1, to 
the origina] sentence. If we do this, our new sentence, so 
far from being equivalent to the old. will be a mere piece 
of nonsense. To obtain a sentence whkh is equivalent to 
the sentence about the table,, but refers to sense-concents 
instead, the whole of the original sentence has to be al- 
tered. And this, indeed, is implied by the fact that to say 
that tables are logical constructions out of sense-contents 
is to say, not that the symbol 'table' can be explicitly de- 
fined in terms of symbols which stand for sense-contents. 
but only that it can be so defined in use. For, as we have 
seen, the function of a definition in use is not to provide 
us with a synonym for any symbol, but to enable us to 
translate sentences of a certain type. 

The problem of giving an actual rule for translating 
Sentences about a material thing into sentences about 
sense-contents. which may be called the problem of the 
'reduction • of material things to sense-contents, is the 
main phUosophfcal part of the traditional problem off per- 
ception. It is true that writers on perception who set out to 
describe 'the nature of a material thing' believe them- 
selves to be discussing a factual question. But, as we have 
already pointed out, this is a mistake. The question, 'What 
is the nature of a material thing?' is, like any other ques- 
tion of that form, a linguistic question, being a demand 

54 



for a definition. And the propositions which art set forth 
in answer to it are linguistic propositions, even though 
they may be expressed in such a way that they seem to 
be factual. They are propositions about the relationship 
of symbols, and not about the properties of the things 
which the symbols denote. 

It is necessary to emphasize this point In connexion 
with the 'problem of perception', since the fact that we 
are unable, in our everyday language, to describe the pro- 
perties of sense-contents with any great precision, for lack 
of the requisite symbols, mate ft convenient to give the 
solution of this problem in factual t<amroology. We express 
the fact that to speak about material things is, for each of 
•us, a way of speaking about sense-contents by saying that 
each of us 'constructs* material things out of sense- 
contents ; and we reveal the relationship "between: the two 
sorts of symbols by showing what are the principles of 
this 'construction', In other words, one answers the ques- 
tion, 'What is the nature of a material thing t ' by indicating, 
in general terms, what are the relations that muse hold be 
tween any two of one's sfinsc-conttnts for them to be 
elements of the same material thing. The difficulty, which 
here seems to arise, of reconciling the subjectivity of sense- 
contents with the objectivity of material things will be 
dealt with in alater chapter of this book.* 

The solution which we shall now give of this 'problem 
of perception* will serve as a further illustration of the 
method of philosophical analysis. To simplify the ques- 
tion, we introduce the following definitions. We say that 
two sense-contents directly resemble one another when 
there Is either w> difference, or only an infinitesimal dif- 
ference, of quality between them; and that they resemble 
one another indirectly when they are linked by a series 
of direct resemblances, but are not themselves dirtily 

S. Chapter 7. 
55 



i 



! 



resemblant, a relationship whose possibility depends on 
the fact that the relative product 8 of infinitesimal differ- 
ences in quality is an appreciable difference in quality. 
And we say that two visual, or tactual, sense-contents are 
directly continuous when they belong to successive mem- 
bers of a series of actual, or possible sense-fields, and there 
is no difference, or only an infinitesimal difference, be- 
tween them, with respect to the position of each in its 
own sense-field; and that they are indirectly continuous 
when they are related by an actual, or possible, series of 
such direct continuities. And here it should be explained 
that to say of a sense-experience, or a sense-field which is a 
part of a sense-experience, or a sense-content which is a 
part of a sense- field, that it is possible, as opposed to actual, 
is to say, not that it ever has occurred or will occur in fact, 
but that it would occur if certain specifiable conditions 
were fulfilled. So when it is said that a materia] thing is 
constituted by both actual and possible sense-contents, all 
that is being asserted is that the sentences referring to 
sense-contents, which are the translations of the senten- 
ces referring to any material thing, are both categorical 
and hypothetical. And thus the notion of a possible sense- 
content, or sense^xperience, is as unobjectionable as the 
familiar notion of a hypothetical statement. 

Relying on these preliminary definitions, one may as- 
sert with regard to any two of one's visual sense-contents, 
or with regard to any two of one's tactual sense-contents, 
that they are elements of the same material thing if, and 
only if. they are related to one another by a relation of 
direct, or indirect, resemblance in certain respects, and 
by a relation of direct, or indirect, continuity. And as each 

6. 'The rdativi- product of two relations R and £ is the relation 
which holds between x and z when there is an Intermediate term 
y such that x has the relation R to y and y has the relation S to S.' 
Princijia MaifieaMikfl, /jinroduetion. Chapter I. 

56 



of these relations is symmetrical - that is to say, a rela- 
tion which cannot hold between any terms A and B with- 
out also holding between B and A - and also transitive - 
that is, a relation which cannot hold between a term A 
and another term ft, and between B and another term C, 
without holding between A and C - it follows that the 
groups of visual and (.actual sense-contents which are con- 
stituted by means of these relations cannot have any mem- 
bers in common. And this means that no visual, or tactual, 
sense-content can be an element of more than one material 
thing. 

The next step in the analysis of the notion of a material 
thing is to show how these separate groups of visual and 
tactual sense-contents are correlated. And this may be ef- 
fected by saying that any two of one's visual and tactual 
groups belong to the same material thing when every ele- 
ment of the visual group which is of minimal visual depth 
forms part of the same sense-experience as an element of 
the tactual group which is of minimal tactual depth. 
We cannot here define visual or tactual depth otherwise 
than ostensively. The depth of a visual or tactual sense- 
content is as much a sensible property of it as its length 
or breadth. 7 But we may describe it by saying that one 
visual or tactual sense-content has a greater depth than 
another when it is farther from the observer's body, pro- 
vided that we make it clear that this is not intended to be 
a definition. Tor it would clearly vitiate any 'reduction' of 
material things to sense-contents if the defining sentences 
contained references to human bodies, which axe them- 
selves material things. We, however, are obliged to men- 
tion, material things when vve wish to describe certain 
sense-con tents, because the poverty of our language is such 
that we have no other verbal means of explaining what 
their properties are. 

y-See H. R Price, Peiception, p. 2*8. 

57 



As for the sense-contents of taste, or sound, or smell, 
which are assigned to particular material things, they may 
be classified by reference to their association with tactual 
sense-contents. Thus, we assign sense-contents of taste to 
the same material things as the simultaneously occurring 
sense«>ji tents of touch which are experienced hy the 
palate, or the tongue. And b assigning an auditory or 
olfactory sense-content to a material thing, we remark 
that it is a member of a possible series of temporarily con- 
tinuous sounds, or smells, of uniform quality but gradu- 
ally increasing intensity; the series, namely, which One 
would ordinarily he said to experience in the course of 
moving towards the place from which the sound, or the 
smell, came; and we assign it to the same material thing 
as the tactual sense-content which Is experienced at the 
same time as the sound, or the smell, of maximum inten- 
sity in the series. 

What is next required of us, who are attempting to 
analyse the notion of a material thin.g, is the provision of 
a rule for translating sentences which refer to the 'real' 
qualities of material things. Our answer is that to say of a 
certain quality that it is the real quality of a given material 
thing is to say that it characterizes those elements of the 
thing which are the most conveniently measured of all the 
elements which possess qualities of the kind in question. 
Thus, when 1 look at a coin and assert that it is really 
round in shape, I am not asserting that the shape of the 
sense-content, which is the element of the coin that I am 
actually observing, is round, still less that the shape of all 
the visual, or tactual, elements of the coin is round; what I 
am asserting is that roundness of shape characterizes those 
elements of the coin which are experienced from the 
point of view from which measurements of shape are most 
conveniently carried out. And similarly I assert that the 

58 



real collour of the paper on which I am writing is white. 
even though it may not always appear to be white, because 
whiteness of cotour characterizes those visual elements of 
the paper which are experienced in the conditions in which 
the greatest discrimination of colours is possible. And, 
finally, we define relations of quality, ot position, between 
material things En terms of the relations of quality, or posi- 
tion, which obtain between such 'priviliged' elements. 

This definition, or, rather, this outline of a definition, of 
symbols which stand for material things is intended to 
have the same sort of effect as the definition of descrip- 
tive phrases which we gave as our original example of 
the process of philosophical analysis. It serves to increase 
our understanding of the sentences in which we refer to 
material things. Fn this case also, there is, of course, a 
sense in which we already understand such sentences. 
Those who use the English language have no difficulty, in 
practice, in identifying the situations which determine the 
truth or falsehood of such simple statements as 'This is 
a table', or 'Pennies are round'. But they may very well 
he unaware of the hidden logical complexity of such state- 
ments which our analysis of the notion of a material thing 
has just brought to light. And, as a result, they may be led 
to adopt some metaphysical belief, such as the belief in the 
existence of material substances or invisible substrata, 
which is a source of confusion in all their speculative 
thought. And the utility of the philosophical definition 
which dispels such confusions is not to be measured by the 
apparent triviality of the sentences whichit translates. 

It is sometimes said that the purpose of such philoso- 
phical definitions is to reveal the meaning of certain sym- 
bols, or combinations of symbols. The objection to this 
way of speaking is that it docs not give an unequivocal 
description of the philosopher's practice, because it em- 

59 



ploys, in 'meaning', a highly ambiguous symbol. It is for 
this reason that we defined the relation of equivalence 
between sentences, without referring to 'meaning'. And, 
indeed, I doubt whether all the sentences which are equiva- 
lent, according to our definition, would ordinarily be said 
to have the same meaning. For I think that although a 
complex sign of the form 'the sentences s and t have the 
same meaning' is sometimes used, or taken, to express 
what we express by saying 'the sentences s and t are 
equivalent', this is not the way in which such a sign is 
most commonly used or interpreted. I think that if we are 
to use the sign 'meaning' in the way in which it is most 
commonly used, we must not say that two sentences have 
the same meaning for anyone, unless the occurrence of 
one always has the same effect on his thoughts and ac- 
tions as the occurrence of the other- And, clearly, it is 
possible for two sentences to be equivalent, by our cri- 
terion, without having the same effect on anyone who 
employs the language. For instance, 'p is a law of nature' 
is equivalent to 'p is a general hypothesis which can al- 
ways be relied on'; but the associations of the symbol 
'law' arc such that the former sentence tends to produce 
a very different psychological effect from its equivalent. 
It gives rise to a belief in the orderliness of nature, and 
even in the existence of a power 'behind' that orderliness, 
which is not evoked by the equivalent sentence, and has. 
indeed, no rational warrant. Thus there arc many people 
for whom these sentences do, in this common sense of 
'meaning', have different meanings. And this, I suspect, 
accounts for the widespread reluctance to admit that the 
laws of nature are merely hypotheses, just as the failure of 
some philosophers to recognize that material things are 
reducible to sense-con tents is very largely due to the fact 
that no sentence which refers to sense<ontents ever has 
tie same psychological effect on them as a sentence which 

60 



refers to a material thing. But, as we have seen, this is not 
a valid ground for denying that any two such sentences 
are equivalent. 

Accordingly, one should avoid saying that philosophy 
is concerned with the meaning of symbols, because the 
ambiguity of 'meaning' leads the undiscermng critic to 
judge the result of a philosophical inquiry by a criterion 
which is not applicable to it, but only TO an empirical in- 
quiry concerning the psychological effect which the oc- 
currence of certain symbols has on a certain group of 
people. Such empirical inquiries are, indeed, an important 
element in sociology and in the scientific study of a lan- 
guage; but they are quite distinct from the logical inquiries 
which constitute philosophy. 

It is misleading, also, to say, as some do, that philo- 
sophy tells us how certain symbols are actually used. For 
this suggests that the propositions of philosophy arc fac- 
tual propositions concerning the behaviour of a certain 
group of people; and this is not the case. The philosopher 
who asserts that, in the English language, the sentence 
'The author of Waverley was Scotch' is equivalent to 
'One person, and one person only, wrote Waverley, and 
that person was Scotch' is not asserting that all. Or most, 
English-speaking people use these sentences interchange- 
ably. What he is asserting is that, in virtue of certain rules 

of entailment, namely those which are characteristic of 
'correct* English, every sentence which Ls entailed by 
'The author of Wavertey was Scotch", in conjunction 
with any given group of sentences, is entailed also by that 
group, in conjunction with 'One person, and one person 
only, wrote WaverJey, and that person was Scotch." That 
English-speaking people should employ the verbal conven- 
tions that they do is, indeed, an empirical fact. But the 
deduction of relations of equivalence from the rules of 
entailment which characterize the English, or any other, 

61 



language Is a purely logical activity; and it Is in thk logical 

activity, and not in any empirical study of the linguistic 
habits of any group of people, that philosophical analysis 
consists.* 

Thus, in specifying the language to which he intends his 
definitions to apply, the philosopher is simply describing 
th* convention? from which his definitions are deduced; 
and the validity of the definitions depends solely on their 
compatibility with these conventions. In most cases, in- 
deed, the definitions are obtained from conventions which 
do, in fact, correspond to the conventions which are ac- 
tually observed by some group qE peopJe, And it is a neces- 
sary condition of the utility of the definitions, as a means 
of clarification, that this should be so. But it is a mistake 
to suppose that the existence of such a correspondence is 
ever part of what the definitions actually assert.' 

It is to be remarked that the process of analysing a lan- 
guage is facilitated if it is possible to use for the classifica- 
tion of its forms an artificial system of symbols whose 
structure is known. The best-known example of such a 
symbolism is the sooEled system of logistic which was 
employed by Russell and Whitehead in their Vrjncipia 
Mathematics But it is not necessary that the language in 
which analysis is carried out should be different from the 

8. There is a ground for saying that the philosopher is always 
concerned with an artificial language. For the conventions which we 

follow in our actual usage of words ate not altogether systematic 
and precise. 

9, Thus if I wish to refute a philosophical opponent I do trot 
argue about people's linguistic habits. I try to prove that his deani- 
dons involve a contradiction. Suppose, for example, that he is 
maintaining that 'A is a free agent' is equivalent to "A's actions are 
uncaused'. Then I refute htm by getting hhn to admit that *A is a 
free agent' is entailed by 'A is morally responsible for his actions' 

wbewaa 'A'* actions arc uncaused' entails 'A is not morally re- 
SpcnsiMe ft* his actions'. 

62 



language analysed. If it were, we should be obliged to sup- 
pose, as Russell once suggested, 'that every language has a 
structure concerning which, in the language, nothing can 
be said, but that there may be another language dealing 
with the structure of the first language, and having itself 
a new structure, and that to this hierarchy of languages 
there may be rio limit' ." This was written presumably in 
the belief that an attempt to refer to the structure of a 
language in the language itself would lead to the occur- 
rence of logical paradoxes. 1 * But Carnap. by actually car- 
rying out such an analysis, has subsequently shown that a 
language can without self-contradiction be used in, the 
analysis of itself. 1 * 

to. Introduction to L. Wittgenstein's Tractates Logie^-Phikao- 

pnfeux, p. 23. 
ci. Concerning logical paradoxes, see Russcfl and Whitehead, 

Trinclpia Mathematica, Introduction, Chapter E; F. P. Rwotty, 
Foundations d Mathematics pp, r-t*s; and Lewis and Langford. 
Symbolic Logic, Chapter xiii. 
it Vide toglscbe Syot&x &tt Spracbe, Parts 1 and 11. 



63 



CHAPTER 4 

THE A PRIORI 

The view of philosophy which we have adopted may, 
I think, fairly be described as a form of empiricism. For 
it is characteristic of an empiricist to eschew metaphysics, 
on the ground that every factual proposition must refer to 
sense-experience. And even if the conception of philoso- 
phizing as an activity of analysis is not to be discovered 
in the traditional theories of empiricists, we have seen that 
it is implicit in their practice. At the same time, it must 
be made clear that, in calling ourselves empiricists, we 
are not avowing a belief in any of the psychological doc- 
trines which are commonly associated with empiricism. 
For, even if these doctrines were valid, their validity would 
be independent of the validity of any philosophical thesis. 
It could be established only by observation, and not by the 
purely logical considerations upon which our empiricism 
rests. 

Having admitted that we are empiricists, we must now 
(leal with the objection that is commonly brought against 
all forms of empiricism; the objection, namely, that it is 
impossible on empiricist principles to account for our 
knowledge of necessary truths. For, as Hum* conclusively 
showed, no general proposition whose validity is subject 
to the test of actual experience can ever be logically cer- 
tain. No matter how often it is verified in practice, there 
still remains the possibility that it will be confuted on 
some future occasion. The fact that a law has 'teen sub- 
stantiated in it— i cases affords no logical guarantee that 
it will be substantiated in the nth case also, no matter 
how large we take n to be. And this means that no general 
£rap©sitic.n referring to a matter of fact can ever be shown 






to be necessarily and universally true. It can at best fee a 
probable hypothesis. And this, we shall find, applies not 
only to general propositions, but to all propositions which 
have a factual content. They can none of them ever be- 
come logically certain- This conclusion, which wc shall 
elaborate later on, is one which, must be accepted by every 
consistent empiricist. It is often thought to involve him 
in complete scepticism: but this is not the case. For the 
fact that the validity of a proposition cannot be logically 
guaranteed in no way entails that it is irrational for us to 
believe ir_ On the contrary, what is irrational is to look 
for a guarantee where none can be forthcoming; to de- 
mand certainty where probability is all that is obtainable* 
We have already remarked upon this, in referring to the 
work of Hume. And we shall make the point clearer when 
we come to treat of probability, in explaining the use which 

we make of empirical propositions. We shall discover that 
there is nothing perverse or paradoxical about the view 
that all the 'truths' of science and common sense are hypo- 
theses; and consequently that the fact that it involves this 
view constitutes no objection to the empiricist thesis. 

Where the empiricist does encounter drmculty is in con- 
nexion with the truths of formal logic and mathematics. 
For whereas a scientific generalization is readily admitted 
to be fallible, the truths of mathematics and logic appear 
to everyone to be necessary and certain. But if empiricism 
is correct no proposition which has a factual content can 
be necessary or certain Accordingly the empiricist must 
deal with the truths of logic and mathematics in one of 
the two following ways; he must say either that they arc 
not necessary truths, in which case he must account for 
the universal conviction that they are; or he must say that 
they have no factual content, and then he must explain 
bow a proposition which is empty of all factual content 
can be true and use f u I and surprising. 

6S 






If neither of these courses proves satisfactory., we shall 
be obliged to give way to rationalism. We shall be obliged 
to admit that there are some truths about the world which 
we can know independently of experience; that there are 
some properties which we can ascribe to all objects, even 
though we cannot conceivably observe that all objects 
have them. And we shall have to accept it as a mysterious 
inexplicable fact that our thought has this power to re- 
veal to us authoritatively the nature of objects which we 
have never observed- Or else we must accept the Kantian 
explanation which, apart from the epistemological diffi- 
culties which we have already touched on, only pushes 
the mystery a stage further back. 

It is clear that any such concession to rationalism would 
upset the main argument of this book. For the admission 
that there were some facts about the world which could 
be known independently of experience would be incom- 
patible wilh our fundamental contention that a sentence 
says nothing unless it is empirically verifiable. And thus 
the whole force of our attack on metaphysics would be 
destroyed. It is vital, therefore, for us to be able to show 
that one or other of the empiricist accounts of the proposi- 
tions of logic and mathematics is correct. If we are suc- 
cessful in this, we shall have destroyed the foundations of 
rationalism. For the fundamental tenet of rationalism is 
that thought is an independent source of knowledge, and 
is moreover a more trustworthy source of knowledge 
than experience; indeed some rationalists have gone so far 
as to say that thought is the only source of knowledge. 
And the ground for this view is simply that the only neces- 
sary truths about the world which are known to us are 
known through thought and not tltrough experience. So 
that if wc can show either that the truths an question are 
not necessary or that they are not 'truths about the world 1 , 
wc shall he taking away the support on which rationalism 

66 






rests. We shall be making good the empiricist contention 
that there are no 'truths of reason ' which refer to matters 
of fact. 

The course of maintaining that the truths of logic and 
mathematics are not necessary or certain was adopted by 
Mill. He maintained that these propositions were induc- 
tive generalizations based on an extremely large number 
of instances. The fact that the number of supporting in- 
stances was so very large accounted, in his view, for our 
believing these generalizations to be necessarily and uni- 
versally true. The evidence in their favour was so strong 
that it seemed incredible to us that a contrary instance 
should ever arise. Nevertheless it was in principle pos- 
sible for such generalizations to be confuted. They were 
highly probable, but, being inductive generalizations, they 
were not certain. The difference between them and the 
hypotheses of natural science was a difference in degree 
and not in kind. Experience gave us very good reason to 
suppose that a 'truth* of mathematics or logic was true 
universally; but we were not possessed of a guarantee. 
For these 'truths' were only empirical hypotheses which 
had worked particularly well in the past; and. like ail em- 
pirical hypotheses, they were theoretically fallible, 

1 do not think that this solution of the empiricist's diffi- 
culty with regard to the propositions of logic and mathe- 
matics is acceptable. In discussing it, it is necessary to 
make a distinction which is perhaps already enshrined in 
Kant's famous dictum that although there can be no doubt 
that all our knowledge begins with experience, it does not 
follow that it all arises out of experienced When we say 
that the truths of logic are known independently of ex- 
perience, we are not of course saying that they are innate, 
in the sense that we are born knowing them. It is obvious 
that mathematics and logic have to be learned in the same 
a. Critique of Pure Reason. 2nd ed„ Iniroduction. section L 

67 



way as chemistry and history have to be teamed. Nor art 
wc denying that the first person to discover a given logical 
or mathematical truth was Jed to it by an inductive pro- 
cedure. It is very probable, for example, that the principle 
of the syllogism was formulated not before but after the 
validity of syllogistic reasoning had been observed in a 
number of particular cases. What wc are discussing, how- 
ever, when we say that logical and mathematical truths 
are known independently of experience, is not a historical 
question concerning the way in which these truths were 
originally discovered, nor a psychological question con- 
cerning the way in which each of us comes to learn them, 
but an epistemological question. The contention of Mill's 
which we reject is that the propositions of logic and 
mathematics have the same status as empirical hypo- 
theses; that their validity is determined, in the same way. 
We maintain that they arc independent of experience in 
the sense that they do not owe their validity to empirical 
verification. We may come to discover them through an 
inductive process; but once we have apprehended them we 
see that they are necessarily true, that they hold good for 
every conceivable instance. And this serves to distinguish 
them from empirical generalizations. For we know that a 
proposition whose validity depends upon experience can- 
not be seen to be necessarily and universally true. 

In rejecting Mill's theory, we are obliged to be some- 
what dogmatic. We can do no more than state the issue 
Cleanly and then trust that his contention will be seen to 
be discrepant with the relevant logical facts. The follow- 
ing considerations may serve to show that of the two ways 
of dealing with logic and mathematics which are open to 
the empiricist, the one which Mill adopted is not the one 
which is correct. 

The best way to substantiate our assertion that the 
truths of formal logic and pure mathematics are neces- 

68 



sarily true is to examine cases in which they might seem 
to be confuted. It might easily happen, for example, that 
when I came to count what 1 had taken to be five pairs 

of objects, I found that they a mounted Only to nine. And 

if I wished to mislead people I might say that on this 
occasion twice five was not ten. But in that case I should 
not he using the complex sign '2 x$ = to' in the way in 
which is it ordinarily used. I should he taking it not as 
the expression of a purely mathematical proposition, but 
as the expression, of an empirical generalization, to the 
effect that whenever I counted what appeared to me to 
be five pairs of objects I discovered that they were ten 
in number, This generalization may yeiy -well be false. 
But if it pioved false in a given case, one would not say 
that the mathematical proposition '2x5=10' had been 
confuted, One would say that I was wrong in supposing 
that there were five pairs of objects to start with, or that 
one of the objects had been taken away while I was count- 
ing, or that two of them had ■coalesced, or that 1 had coun- 
ted wrongly. One would adopt as an explanation whatever 
empirical hypothesis fitted in best with the accredited 
facts, The one explanation which would in no circum- 
stances be adopted is that ten is not always the product of 
two and five. 

To tafte another example : if what appears to be a Eucli- 
dean triangle is found by measurement not to have angles 
totalling 380 degrees, we do not say that we have met with 
an instance which invalidates the mathematical proposi- 
tion that the sum of the three angles of a Euclidean tri- 
angle is 180 degrees. We say that we have measured 
wrongly, or, more probably, that the triangle we have been 
measuring is not Euclidean* And this is our procedure in 
every case in which a mathematical truth might appear to 
be confuted. We always preserve its validity >y adopting 
some other explanation of the occurrence. 

*9 



The same thing applies to the principles of formal logic. 
We may take an example relating to the soolled law of 
excluded middle, which states that a proposition must be 
either true or false, or. in other words, that tt is impossible 
that a proposition and its contradictory should neither of 
them be true. One might suppose that a proposition of the 
form *x has stopped doing y' would in certain cases con- 
stitute an exception to this law. For instance, if my friend 
has never yet written to me, it seems fair to say that it is 
neither true nor false that he has stopped writing to me. 
£ut in fact one would refuse to accept such an instance 
as an invalidation of the law of excluded middle. One 
would point out that the proposition "My friend has stop- 
ped writing to me' is not a simple proposition, hut the 
conjunction of the two propositions 'My friend wrote to 
me in the past" and 'My friend does not write to me 
now': and, furthermore, that the proposition 'My friend 
has not stopped writing to me' is not, as it appears to be, 
contradictory to 'My friend has stopped writing to me', 
but only contrary to it. For it means 'My friend wrote to 
me in the past, and he still writes to me*. When, therefore, 
we say that such a proposition as 'My friend has stopped 
writing to me' is sometimes neither true nor false, wc are 
speaking inaccurately. For we seem to be saying that 
neither it nor its contradictory is true. Whereas what we 
mean, or anyhow should mean, is that neither at nor its 
apparent contradictory is true. And its apparent contra- 
dictory is really only its contrary. Thus we preserve the 
law of excluded middle by showing that the negating of 
a sentence does not always! yield the contradictory of the 
proposition originallyexpresscd. 

There is no need to give further examples. Whatever 
instance we care to take, we shall always find that the 
situations in which a logical or mathematical principle 
might appear to be confuted are accounted for in such a 

70 



way as to leave the principle unassailcd. And this indi- 
cates that Mill was wrong in supposing that a situation 
could arise which would overthrow a mathematical truth. 
The principles of logic and mathematics are true univer- 
sally simply because we never allow them to be anything 
else. And the reason for this is that we cannot abandon 
them without contradicting ourselves, without sinning 
against the rules which govern the use of language, and 
so making our utterances self-stultifying. In other words, 
the truths of logic and mathematics are analytic proposi- 
tions or tautologies. In saying this we are making what 
will be held to he an extremely controversial statement 
Mid wc must now proceed to make its implications clear. 

The most familiar definition of an analytic proposition, 
or judgement, as he called it, is that given by Kant. He 
said' that an analytic judgement was one in which the 
predicate B belonged to the subject A as something which 
was covertly contained in the concept of A- He contrasted 
analytic with synthetic judgements, in which the predi- 
cate B lay outside the subject A, although it did stand in 
connexion with it. Analytic judgements, he explains, 'add 
nothing through the predicate to the concept of the subject, 
hut merely break it up into those constituent concepts 
that have all along been thought In it, although con- 
fusedly'. Synthetic judgements, on the other hand, 'add to 
the concept of the subject a predicate which has not been 
in any wise thought in it, and which no analysis: could 
possibly extract from if. Kant gives 'all bodies are ex- 
tended' as an example of an analytic judgement, on the 
ground that the required predicate can be extracted from 
the concept of 'body', 'in accordance with the principle 
of contradiction'; as an example of a synthetic judgement, 
be gives 'all bodies are heavy'. He refers also to *7+$- 12' 
as a synthetic judgement, on the ground that the concept 

a. Critique of Pure Reason, md ed.. Introduction, sections hr and v. 

71 



• 



of twelve is by no means already thought in merely think- 
ing the union of seven and five. And he appears to re- 
gard this as tantamount to saying that the judgement does 
not rest on the principle of contradiction alone. He holds, 
also, that through analytic judgements our knowledge is 
not extended as it is through synthetic judgements. For in 
analytic judgements 'the concept which 1 already have 
is merely set forth and m ade intelligible to me '. 

J think that this is a fair summary of Kant's account of 
the distinction between analytic and synthetic proposi- 
tions, but I do not think that it succeeds in making the 
distinction clear. For even if we pass over the difficulties 
which arise out of the use of the vague term 'concept', 
and the unwarranted assumption that every judgement, 
as well as every German or English sentence, can he said 
to have a subject and a predicate, there remains still this 
crucial defect: Kant does not give one straightforward 
criterion for distinguishing between analytic and synthe- 
tic propositions; he gives two distinct criteria, which are 
by no means equivalent. Thus his ground for holding that 
the proposition '7 +5 = 12 "is synthetic is, as we have seen, 
that the subjective intension of V+S P does not com- 
prise the subjective intension of '12*; whereas his ground 
for holding that 'all bodies are extended' is an analytic 
proposition is that it rests on the principle of contradic- 
tion alone. That is, he employs a psychological criterion 
in the first of these examples, and a logical criterion in. 
the second, and takes their equivalence for granted. But, 
in fact, a proposition which is synthetic according to the 
former criterion may very well be analytic according to 
the Utter. For, as wc have already pointed out, it is pos- 
sible for symbols to be synonymous without having the 
same intensional meaning for anyone: and accordingly 
from the fact that one can think of the sum of seven and 
five without necessarily thinking of twelve, it by no means 

?3 



follows that the proposition '7+5= 12' can be denied with- 
out self-contradiction. From the rest of his argument, it 
is clear that it is this logical proposition, and not any psy- 
chological proposition, that Kant is really anxious to es- 
tablish. His use of the psychological criterion leads him to 
think that he has established it, when he has not, 

1 think that we can preserve the logical import of Kant's 
distinction between analytic and synthetic propositions, 
while avoiding the confusions which mar his actual ac- 
count of it, if we say that a proposition is anaLytic when, 
its validity depends solely on the definitions of the syn> 
bols it contains, astd synthetic when its validity is deter- 
mined by the facts of experience. Thus, the proposition 
"There are ants which have established a system of slavery* 
is a synthetic proposition. For we cannot tell whether it 
is true or false merely by considering the definitions of 
the symbols which constitute it. We have to resort to ac- 
tual observation of the behaviour of ants. On the other 
hand, the proposition 'Either some ants are parasitic or 
none are 1 is an analytic Reposition. For one need not re- 
sort to observation to discover that there either are or are 
not ants which are parasitic. If one knows what is the 
[unction of the words 'either', 'or', and 'not', then one 
can see that any proposition, of the form 'Either p is true 
or p is not true" is valid, independently of experience. Ac- 
cordingly, all such propositions arc analytic. 

It is to be noticed that the proposition "Either some 
ants are parasitic or none are' provides no information 
whatsoever about the behaviour of ants, or, indeed, about 
any matter of fact. And this applies to all analytic pro- 
positions. They none of them provide any information 
about any matter of fact. In other words, they are entirely 
devoid of factual content. And it is for this reason that 
no experience can confute them. 
When we say that analytic propositions are devoid of 

73 



factual, content, and consequently that they say nothing, 
we are not suggesting that they are senseless in the way 
that metaphysical utterances are senseless. For, although 
they give us no information about any empirical situa- 
tion., they do enlighten us by illustrating the way in which 
we use certain symbols. Thus if I say, 'No-thing can be 
coloured in different ways at toe same time with respect 
to the same part of itself', I am not saying anything about 
the properties of any actual thing; but X am not talking 
nonsense, I am expressing an analytic proposition, which 
records our determination to call a colour expanse which 
differs in quality from a neighbouring colour expanse a 
different part of a given thing. En other words, 1 am sim- 
ply calling attention to the implications of a certain lin- 
guistic usage- Similarly, in saying that if all Bretons are 
Frenchmen, and all Frenchmen Europeans, then all Bretons 
are Europeans, I am not describing any matter of fact. But 
I am showing that in the statement that all Bretons are 
Frenchmen, and all Frenchmen Europeans, the further 
statement, that all Bretons are Europeans is implicitly con- 
tained. And I am thereby indicating the convention which 
governs our usage of the words *if ' and *a]l\ 

We see, then, that there is a sense in which analytic 
propositions do give us new knowledge. They call atten- 
tion to linguistic usages, of which we might otherwise not 
be conscious, and they reveal unsuspected implications In 
our assertions and beliefs. But we can see also that theie is 
a sense in which they may be said to add nothing to our 
knowledge. For they tell us only what we may be said to 
know already. Thus, if I know that the existence of May 
Queens is a relic of tree-worship, and I discover that May 
Queens still exist in England, I can employ the tautology 
'If p implies <j, and p is true, q Is true' to show that there 
stiEl exists a relic of tree-worship in England. But in say- 
ing [Kit there ate still May Queens in England, and that 

74 



the existence of May Queens is a relic of tree-worship. I 
have already asserted the existence in England of a relic 
of tree-worship. The use of the tautology does, indeed, en- 
able me to make this concealed assertion explicit. But it 
does not provide me with any new knowledge, in the sense 
in which, empirical evidence that the election of May 
Queens had been forbidden by law would provide me with 
new knowledge. If one had to set forth all the information 
one possessed, with regard to matters of fact, one would 
not write down any analytic propositions. But one would 
make use of analytic propositions in compiling one's en- 
cyclopedia, and would thus come to include propositions 
which one would otherwise have overlooked. And, besides 
enabling one to make one's list of information complete, 
the formulation of analytic propositions would enable 
one to make sure that the synthetic propositions of which 
the list was composed formed a self-consistent system. By 
showing which ways of combining propositions resulted 
in contradictions, they would prevent one from including 
incompatible propositions and so making the list self-stulti- 
fying- But in so far as we had actually used such words 
as 'all' and 'or' and 'not' without falling into sclf-coatra- 
diction, we might be said already to know what was 
revealed in the formulation of analytic propositions illus- 
trating the rules which govern our usage of these logical 
particles. So that here again we are justified in saying that 
analytic propositions do not increase our knowledge. 

The analytic character of the truths of formal logic was 
obscured in the traditional logic through its being insuffi- 
ciently formalized. For in speaking always of judgements, 
instead of propositions, and introducing irrelevant psy- 
chological questions, the traditional logic gave the impres- 
sion of being concerned in some specially intimate way 
With the workings of thought. What it was actually con- 
. cerned with was the formal relationship of classes, as is 



r 

■ 



shown by the fact that all its principles of inference are 
subsumed in the Boolean class-calculus, which is subsumed 
in its tun* in the prepositional calculus of Russell and 
Whitehead.' Their system, expounded in friacipia Mathe- 
matiCQ, makes it clear that formal logic is not concerned 
with the properties o£ men's minds, much less with 
the properties of material objects, but simply with the pos-* 
sibility of combining propositions by means of logical 

particles into analytic propositions, and with study- 
ing the formal relationship of these analytic proposi- 
tions, in virtue of which oae is deducible from another. 
Their procedure is to exhibit the propositions of formal 
logic as a deductive system, based on five primitive pro- 
positions, subsequently reduced in number to one. Here* 
by the distinction between logical truths and principles of 
inference, which was maintained in the Aristotelian logic. 
very properly disappears. Every principle of inference is 
put forward as a logical truth and every logical truth can 
serve as a principle of inference. The three Aristotelian 
'laws of thought', the law of identity, the law of excluded 
middle, and the law of non-contradiction, are incorpora- 
ted hi the system, but they are not considered more im- 
portant than the other analytic propositions. They arc not 
reckoned among the premises of the system. And the 

System of Russell and Whitehead itself is probably on!/ 

one among many possible logics, each of which is com- 
posed of tautologies as interesting to the logician as the 
arbitrarily selected Aristotelian ' laws of thought'.* 

A point which is not sufficiently brought out by Rus- 
sell, if indeed it is recognized by him at all, is that every 

j. Vide Karl Menger. 'Die Keue LoRik', Krise und Neiiautbau in 
den Exakten Wisscnsctralten, pp. 94-6; and Lewis and Landlord, 
Symbolic Logic, Chapter v, 

1. vide Lewis and Langford, Symbolic Logic, Chapter vii, for an. 

elaboration of this point. 

7° 



' 



logical proposition is valid in its own right. Its validity 
does not depend on its being incorporated in a system, 
and deduced from certain propositions which are taken 
as self-evident. The construction of systems of logic is 
useful as a means of discovering and certifying analytic 
propositions, but It is not in principle essential even for 
this purpose. For it is possible to conceive of a symbolism 
in which every analytic proposition could be seen to be 

analytic in virtue of its form alone. 

The fact that the validity of an analytic proposition in 
no way depends on its being deducible from other analytic 
propositions is our justification for disregarding the ques- 
tion whether the propositions of mathematics are re- 
ducible to propositions of formal logic, in the way that 
Russell supposed-* For even if it is the case that the de- 
finition of a cardinal number as a class of classes similar 
to a given class is circular, and it is not possible to reduce 
mathematical notions to purely logical notions, it will still 
remain true that the propositions of mathematics are ana- 
lytic propositions. They will form a special class of analy- 
tic propositions, containing Special terms, but they will be 
none the less analytic for that. For the criterion of an 
analytic proposition is that its validity should follow sim- 
ply from the definition of the terms contabed an it, and 
this condition is fulfilled by the propositions of pure 
mathematics. 

The mathematical propositions which cne might most 
pardonably suppose to be synthetic are the propositions of 

geometry. For It is natural for us to thin a , as Kant thought, 
that geometry is the study of the properties of physical 
space, and consequently that its propositions have factual 
content. And if we believe this, and also recognize that 
the truths Of geometry are necessary and certain, then 
we may be inclined to accept Kant's hypothesis thac 
5. Vide Introduction to MorfcemuftVof Philosophy, Chapter ii. 

77 



space is the form of intuition of oar outer sense, a 
form imposed by us on the matter of sensation, as the 
on]y possible explanation of our a priori knowledge of 
these synthetic propositions. But while the view that pure 
geometry is concerned with physical space was plausible 
enough in Kant's day, when the geometry of Euclid was 
the only geometry known, the subsequent invention of 
non-Euclidean geometries has shown it to be mistaken. 
We see now that the axioms of a geometry are simply de- 
finitions, and that the theorems of a geometry are simply 
the logical consequences of these definitions ,* A geometry 
is not in itself about physical space; in itself it cannot be 
said to be 'about' anything. But w* can use a geometry 
to reason about physical space. That is to say, once we 
have given the axioms a physical interpretation, we can 
proceed to apply the theorems to the objects which satisfy 
the axioms. Whether a geometry can be applied to the 
actual physical world or not, is an empirical question 
which fads outside the scope of the geometry itself* There 
is- ao sense, therefore, in asking which of the various gec* 
metrics known to us are false and which are true. In so far 
as they are all free from contradiction, they are all true. 
What one can ask is which of them is the most useful on 
any given occasion, which of them can be applied most 
easily and most fruitfully to an actual empirical situation. 
But the proposition which states that a certain applica- 
tion of a geometry is possible is not itself a proposition of 
that geometry. All that the geometry itself tells us is that 
if anything can be brought under the definitions, it will 
also satisfy the theorems. It is therefore a purely logical 
system, and its propositions are purely analytic proposi- 
tions. 

It might be objected that the use made of diagrams In 
geometrical treatises shows that geometrical reasoning 
6. cf . H. PoiBcart In Science ct f Hypotbezc, Pan II, Chapter in. 

?8 . 



is not purely abstract and logical, but depends on our In- 
tuition of the properties of figures. In fact, however, the 
use of diagrams is not essential to completely rigorous 
geometry. The diagrams are Introduced as an aid to our 
reason, They provide us with a particular application of 
the geometry, and so assist us to perceive the more general 
truth that the axioms of the geometry involve certain 
consequences. But the fact that most of us need the help 
of an example to make us aware of those consequences 
does not show that the relation between them and the 
axioms is not a purely logical relation. It shows merely 
that our intellects are unequal to the task of carrying out 
very abstract processes of reasoning without the assistance 
of intuition. In other words, it has no bearing on the na- 
ture of geometrical propositions, but is simply an empiri- 
cal fact about ourselves. Moreover, the appeal to intuition, 
though generally of psychological value, is also a source 
of danger to the geometer. He is tempted to make assump- 
tions which are accidentally true of the particular figure 
he is taking as an illustration, but do not follow from 
his axioms. It has, indeed, been shown that Euclid him- 
self was guilty of this, and consequently that the presence 
of the figure is essential to some of his proofs. 7 This shows 
that his system is aot, as he presents it, completely 
rigorous, although of course it can be made so. It does not 
show that the presence of the figure is essential to a truly 
rigorous geometrical proof. To suppose that it did would 
be to take 2s a necessary feature of all geometries what is 
really only an incidental defect in one particular geometri- 
cal system. 

We conclude, then, that the: propositions of pur* geo- 
metry are analytic. And this leads us to reject Kant's hypo- 
thesis that geometry deals with the form of intuition of 
our outer sense, For the ground for this hypothesis was 
7. cf. M. Black, The Nature of Mathematics, p.ij-f 

79 



that it alone explained how the propositions of geometry 
could be both true a priori and synthetic : and we have 
seen that they are not synthetic. Similarly our view that 
the propositions of arithmetic are not synthetic but analy- 
tic leads us to reject the Kantian hypothesis' that arith- 
metic is concerned with our pure intuition of time, the 
form of our inner s«nse. And thus wc are able to dismiss 
Kant's transcendental aesthetic without having to bring 
forward the epistemologkaJ difficulties which it is com- 
monly said to involve. For the only argument which can 
be brought in favour of Kant's theory is that it alone ex- 
plains certain 'facts'. And now we have found that the 
'facts' which it purports to explain are not facts at all. 
For while it is true that we have c priori knowledge of 
necessary propositions, it is not true, as Kant supposed, 
that any of these necessary propositions are synthetic- They 
are without exception analytic propositions, or, In other 
words, tautologies. 

We have already explained how it is that these analytic 
propositions are necessary and certain. We saw that the 
reason why they cannot be confuted in experience is that 
they do not make any assertion about the empirical world, 
They simply record our determination to use words in a 
certain fashion. We cannot deny them without infringing 
the conventions which are presupposed by our very denial, 
and so falling into self-contradiction. And this is the sole 
ground of their necessity. As Wittgenstein puts it, our jus- 
tification for holding that the world could not conceivably 
disobey the laws of logic is simply that we could not say 
of an unlogical world how it would look." And just as 
the validity of an analytic proposition is Independent of 
the nature of the external world, so is it independent of 

8. This hypothesis Is not mentioned in the Critique ot Pure Reason 

but was maintained by Kant at an earlier date, 

9, Tractatiu togiahPtulffSQphkus, 3.031. 

80 



r 

i 



the nature of our minds. It is perfectly conceivable that 
we should have employed different linguistic conventions 
from those which we actually do employ. But whatever 
these conventions might be, the tautologies in which we 
recorded them would always be necessary. For any denial 
of them would he self-stultifying. 

We see, then, that there is nothing mysterious about the 
apodeictic certainty of logic and mathematics. Our know- 
ledge that no observation can ever confute the proposition 
'7+5=12' depends simply on the fact that the symbolic 
expression '7 + 5' is synonymous with '12', just as our 
knowledge that every occulist is an eye-doctor depends Oh 
the fact that the symbol 'eye-doctor' is synonymous with 
'oculist'. And the same explanation holds good for every 
other a priori truth. 

What is mysterious at first sight is that these tautologies 
should on occasion be so surprising, that there should he 
in mathematics and logic the possibility of invention and 
discovery. As Poincare" says : 'If all the assertions which 
mathematics puts forward can be derived from one an- 
other by formal logic, mathematics cannot amount to any- 
thing more than an immense tautology. Logical inference 
can teach us nothing essentially new, and if everything is 
to proceed from the principle of identity, everything must 
be reducible to it. But can we really allow that these Theo- 
rems which fill so many books serve no Other purpose than 
to say in a roundabout fashion "A=A" ? ,M Poincare" finds 
this incredible. His own Theory is that the sense of inven- 
tion and discovery in mathematics belongs to it in virtue 
of mathematical induction, the principle that what is true 
for the number 1, and true for n + 1 when it is true for n, u 
is true for all numbers. And he claims that this is a 

10. La Science et f Hypotktse, Part 1, Chapter f. 
ii. This was wrongly staled in previous editions as 'true for a 
when it is true for n+ I', 

8l 



synthetic a priori principle. It is. in fact, a priori, but it is 
not synthetic. It is a defining principle of the natural num* 
bcrs. serving to distinguish them from such numbers as 
the infinite cardinal numbers, to which it cannot be ap- 
plied. a Moreover, we must remember that discoveries can 
be made, not only in arithmetic, but also in gecmeby 
and formal logic, where no use is made of mathematical 
induction. So that even if Poincare* were right about mathe- 
matical induction, he would not have provided a satis- 
factory explanation of the paradox that a mere body of 
tautologies can be so interesting and so surprising. 

The true explanation is very simple. The power of logic 
and mathematics to surprise us depends, like their use- 
fulness, on the limitation? of our reason. A being whose 
intellect was infinitely powerful would take no interest 
in logic and mathematics. 1 * For he would be able to see at 
A glance everything that his definitions implied, and, ac- 
cordingly, could never learn anything from logical infer- 
ence which he was not fully conscious of already- But Our 
intellects arc not of this order. It is only a minute propor- 
tion of the consequences of our definitions that we are 
able to detect a* a glance. Even so simple a tautology as 
'91x79=7189' is beyond the scope of our immediate ap- 
prehension. To assure ourselves that '7189 1 is synonymous 
with '91x79' we have to resort to calculation, which is 
simply a process of tautological transformation - that is, 
a process by which we change the form of expressions 
without altering their significance. The multiplication 
tables are rules for carrying out this process in arithmetic, 
just as the laws of logic are rules for the tautological trans- 

12. tf. B. Russell's Introduction to Mathematical Philosophy, Chap- 
ter tii, p. 27. 

15. cf. Hans Hahn, 'LoRik. Mathcmatik und NaturcrkenneiT. EM- 
heitswissenxhatt, Heft II, p. iS, 'Ein allwissendts Wcsen btaacht 
keinc Logik. und keine Mathemaiik.' 

82 



r 



formation of sentence? expressed in logical symbolism or 
in ordinary language. As the process of calculation is car* 
ried out more or less mechanically, it is easy for us to 
make a slip and so unwittingly contradict ourselves. And 
this accounts for the existence of logical and mathematical 
'falsehoods', which otherwise might appear paradoxical. 
Clearly the risk of erior In logical reasoning is propor- 
tionate to the length and the complexity of the process 
of calculation. And in the same V/ay, the more complex 
an analytic proposition is, the more chance it has of in- 
teresting and surprising US, 

It is easy to see that the danger of error in logical rea- 
soning can be minimized by the introduction of symbolic 
devices, which enable us to express highly complex tauto- 
logies in a conveniently simple form, And this gives us 
an opportunity for the exercise of invention in the pursuit 
of logical inquiries. For a well-chosen definition will call 
our attention to analytic truths, which would otherwise 
have escaped us. And the framing of definitions which 
are useful and fruitful may well be regarded as a creative 

act- 
Having thus shown that there is no inexplicable para- 
dox involved in the view that the truths of logic an4 
mathematics are all of them anaEytic, we may safely adopt 
it as the only satisfactory explanation of their a priori 
necessity. And in adopting it we vindicate the empiricist 
claim that there can be no a priori knowledge of reality. For 
we show that the truths of pure reason, the propositions 
which we know to be valid independently of all experi- 
ence, are so only in virtue of their lack of factual content. 
To say that a proposition is true a priori is to say that it is 
a tautology. And tautologies, though they may serve to 

guide us in our empirical search for knowledge, do not in 

themselves contain any information about any matter of 
fact* 

83 



CHAPTER J 
TRUTH AND PROBABILITY 

Having shown bow the validity of a priori propositions 
is. determined, we shall how put forward the criterion 
which ii used to determine the validity of empirical pro- 
positions- rn this way we shall complete our theory of 
truth. For it is easy to see that the purpose of a 'theory of 
truth' is simply to describe the criteria by which the vali- 
dity of the various kinds of propositions is determined. 
And as all propositions are either empirical or a priori, 
and we have already dealt with the a priori, all that is 
now required to complete our theory of truth is an indica- 
tion of the way in which we determine the validity of em- 
pirical propositions. And this we shall shortly proceed n> 
give. 

But first of all wc ought, perhaps, to justify our assump- 
tion that the object of a 'theory of truth* can only be to 
show how propositions are validated. For at is commonly 
supposed that the business of the philosopher who con- 
cerns himself with 'truth' is to answer the question 'What 
is truth r* and that it is only an answer to this question 
that can fairly be said to constitute a "theory of truth". 
But when we come to consider what this famous ques- 
tion actually entails, we find that it is aot a question which 
gives rise to any genuine problem; and consequently that 
no theory can be required to deal with it. 

We have already remarked that all questions of the 
form, 'What is the nature of x ? ' are requests for a defini- 
tion of a symbol in use, and that to ask for a definition of 
a symbol x in use is to ask how the sentences in which x 
oceurs are to be translated into equivalent sentences, 
which do not contain x or any of its synonyms. Applying 

84 



this to the case of 'truth' we find that to ask, 'What Is 
truth?' is to ask for such a translation of the sentence '(the 
proposition) p is true '. 

It may be objected here that we are ignoring the fact 
that it is not merely propositions that can be said to be 
true or false, but a!so statements and assertions and judge- 
ments and assumptions and opinions and beliefs. But the 
answer to this is that to say that a belief, or a statement, 
or a judgement, is true is always an elliptical way of as- 
cribing truth to a proposition, which is believed, or stated, 
or judged. Thus, if I say that the Marxist's belief that capi- 
talism leads to war is true, what I am saying is that the 
proposition, believed by Marxists, that capitalism leads to 
war is true; and the illustration holds good when the word 
'opinion' or 'assumption', or any of the others in the list, 
is substituted for the word 'belief. And, further, it must 
be made clear that we are not hereby committing our- 
selves to the metaphysical doctrine that propositions are 
real entities. 1 Regarding classes as a species of logical con- 
structions, we may define a imposition as a class of sen- 
tences which have the same intentional significance for 
anyone who understands them. Thus, the sentences, 'I am 
ill', *Ich bin krank% 'Je suis maladc', arc all elements of 
the proposition '1 ara ill'. And what we have previously 
said about logical constructions should make it clear that 
we arc not asserting that a proposition is a collection of 
sentences, but rather that to speak about a given proposi- 
tion is a way of speaking about certaia sentences, just as 
to speak about sentences, in this usage, is a way of speak- 
ing about particular signs. 

Reverting to the analysis of truth, we find that in all 
sentences of the form *p is true'., the phrase 'is true' is 
logically superfluous. When, for example, one says that 

i. For a criticism of this doctrine, see G- Ryle, 'Are there pro- 

positions J' Aristotelian Society Proceed mat, rgzsrs-o- 

85 



the proposition 'Queen Anne is dead' is true, all that 
one is saying is lhat Queen Anne is dead, And similarly, 
when one says that the proposition 'Oxford is the capital 
of England' is false, all that one is saying is that Oxford 
is not the capital of England. Thus, to say that a proposi- 
tion is true is just to assert it, and to say that it is false is 
just to assert its contradictory- And this indicates that the 
terms 'true' and 'false' connote nothing, but function in 
the sentence simply as marks of assertion and denial. And 
in that case there can be no sensa in aslting us to analyse 
the concept of 'truth '. 

This point seems almost too obvious to mention, yet 
the preoccupation o£ philosophers with the 'problem of 
truth* shows that they have overlooked it- Their excuse is 
that references to truth generally occur in sentences whose 
grammatical forms suggest that the word 'true' does stand 
for a genuine quality or relation. And a Superficial con- 
sideration of these sentences might lead one to suppose 
that there was something more in the question 'What is 
truth?* than a demand for the analysis of the sentence 'p 
is true*. But when one comes to analyse the sentences in 
questionp one always finds that they contain sub-sentences 
of the form 'p is true' or 'p is false', and that when they 
are translated ai such a way as to make these sub- sentences 
explicit, they contain no other mention of truth. Thus, to 
take two typical examples, the sentence 'A proposition is 
not made true by being believed' is equivalent to 'For no 
value of p or x, is "p is true " entailed by "x believes p " ' : 
and the sentence 'Truth is sometimes stranger than fic- 
tion* is equivalent to 'There are values of p and q such 
that p is true and q is false and p is more surprising than, 
q.' And the same result would be yielded by any other 
example one cared to take. In every case the analysis of 
the sentence would confirm our assumption that the ques- 
tion 'What is truth V is reducible to the question 'What 

86 



is the analysis of the sentence "p is true"? And it is plain 
that this question raises no genuine problem, since we 
have shown that to say that p is true is simply & way of 
asserting p.* 

We conclude then, that there is no problem of truth as 
it is ordinarily conceived. The traditional conception of 
truth as a 'real quality' or a 'real relation' is due. like 
most philosophical mistakes, to a failure to analyse sen- 
tences correctly. There are sentences, such as the two we 
have just analysed, in which the word 'truth' seems to 
stand for something real; and this leads the speculative 
philosopher .to inquire what this 'something' is. Natur- 
ally he fails to o&tain a satisfactory answer, since his ques- 
tion is illegitimate. For our analysis has shown that the 
word 'truth' does not stand for anything, in the way 
which such a question requires. 

It follows that if all theories of truth were theories 
about the 'real quality' or the 'real relation', which the 
word 'truth.' is naively supposed to stand for, they would 
be all nonsense. But in fact they are for the most part 
theories o£ an entirely different sort. Whatever question 
their authors may think that they are discussing, what 
they are really discussing most of the time is the ques- 
tion 'What makes a proposition true or false?' And this 
is a loose way o£ expressing the question 'With regard to 
any proposition p r what are the conditions in which p (is 
true) and what are the conditions in which not-p?' In 
other words, it Is a way of asking how propositions are 
validated. And this is the question which we were con- 
sidering when we embarked on our digression about the 
analysis of truth. 

In saying that wc propose to show 'how propositions 
are validated', we do not of course mean to suggest that 

2. cf. P. P. Ramsey on 'Facts and Propositions', The Foundations 
of Mathematics, pp. 141-3. 

87 



all propositions are validated in the same way. On the con- 
trary we lay stress on the fact that the criterion by which 
we determine the validity of an a priori or analytic pro- 
position is not sufficient to determine the validity of an 
empirical or synthetic proposition. For it is characteris- 
tic of empirical propositions that their validity is not 
purely forma!. To say that a geometrical proposition, or a 
system of geometrical propositions, is false is to say that 
it is self-contradictory. But an empirical proposition, or a 
system of empirical propositions, may be free from con- 
tradiction, and still be false. It is said to be fake, not be- 
cause it is formally defective, but because it faits to satisfy 
somt material criterion. And it is our business to discover 
what this criterion is. 

We have been assuming so far that empirical proposi- 
tions, though they differ from a priori propositions in 
their method of Validation, do not differ in this respect 
among themselves. Having found that al] a priori proposi- 
tions are validated in the same way, we have taken it for 
granted that this holds good of empirical propositions also. 
But this assumption would be challenged by a great many 
philosophers who agree with us in most other respects. 3 
They would say that among empirical propositions, there 
was a special class of propositions whose validity consis- 
ted in the fact that they directly recorded an immediate 
experience. They maintain that these propositions, which 
we may call 'ostenstve' propositions, are not were hypo- 
theses but are absolutely certain. For they are supposed to 
be purely demonstrative in character, and so incapable of 
being refuted by any subsequent experience. And they are, 
on this view, the only empirical propositions which are 

3- e«, M. Schlick. Tiber das Fundament der Erfcenntnis". Etkennt- 
nis. Band IV. Heft II; and 'Facts and Propositions'. Analysis, Vol. 
II. No. 5; and B. von Juhos, 'Empiricism and Physicalisra'. Atuirsis, 
Vol II. No. d 

88 



certain. The rest are hypotheses which derive what vali- 
dity they have from their relationship to the ostensive 
propositions. For their probability is held to be determined 
by the number and variety of the ostensive propositions 
which, can be deduced from them. 

That no synthetic proposition which is not purely osten- 
sive can be logically indubitable, may be granted with- 
out further ado. What we cannot admit is that any syn- 
thetic proposition can be purely ostensive.* For the notion 
of an ostensive proposition appears to involve a contra- 
diction in terms, It implies that there could be a sentence 
which consisted of purely demonstrative symbols and was 
at the same time intelligible. And this is not even a logical 
possibility, A sentence which consisted of demonstrative 
symbols would not express a genuine proposition. It would 
be a mere ejaculation, jn no way characterizing - that to 
which it was supposed to refer. 1 

. The fact is that one cannot in language point to an ob- 
ject without describing it. If a sentence is to express a pro- 
position, it cannot merely name a situation; it must say 
something about it. And in describing a situation, one is 
not merely 'registering' a sense-content; one is classifying 
it in some way or other, and this means going beyond 
what is immediately given. But a proposition would be os- 
tensive only if it recorded what was immediately experi- 
enced, without referring in any way beyond. And as this is 
not possible, it follows that no genuine synthetic proposi- 
tion can be ostensive, and consequently that none can be 
absolutely certain. 

4. See also Rudolf Carnap, 'Obex Protokottsatzc*. Erkenntnis. Band 
III; Otto Ncurauv 'Protokollsalzc*. Erkenntnis, Band 111; and 'Radi- 
kaler Physikalismus unci "Wirkliche Well'". Erktnntnis, Band IV. 
Heft V; and Carl Hempel, 'On the Logical Posiiivisis' Theory of 
Truth', Analysis. Vol. II, No. 4. 
S. This question is reviewed in the Introduction, pp. 12-13, 






Accordingly we hold not merely that no ostensive, pro- 
positions ever are expressed, but that it Is inconceivable 

that any osteasive proposition ever should he expressed. 

Tliat no ostensive propositions ever are expressed might 
be admitted even by those wh<> believe in them. They 

might allow that in actual practice one never limits one- 
self to describing the qualities of an immediately presented 
sense-content, but always treats it as if it were a material 
thing. And it is ohvious that the propositions in which we 
formulate our ordinary judgements about materia) things 
are not ostensive, referring as they do to an infinite series 
of actual and possible sense-contents. Cut it Is In principle 
possible to formulate propositions which simply describe 
the qualities o£ sense-contents without expressing percep- 
tual judgements. And it is claimed that these artificial pro- 
positioas would be genuinely ostensive. It should he clear 
from what we have already said that this claim is unjusti* 
fed. And if any doubt on this point still remains, we may 
remove it with the help of an example. 

Let us suppose that E assert the proposition 'This is 
white', and my words are taken to refer, not, as they nor- 
mally would, to> some material thing, but to a sense- 
content. Then what T am saying about this sense-content 
is that it is an element in the class of sense-content': which 
constitutes 'white' for me; or in other words that it is 
similar in colour to certain other sense-contents, namely 
those which I should call, or actually have called, white. 
And I think I am saying also that it corresponds in some 
fashion to the sense-contents which go to constitute 
'white' for other people : so that if I discovered that I had 
an abnormal colour-sense, I should admit that the sense- 
content in question was not white. But even if we exclude 
all reference to other people, it is still possible to think of 
a situation which would lead me to suppose that ray classi- 
fication of a sense-content was mistaken. 1 might, for 

90 



example, have discovered that whenever I sensed a sense- 
content of a certain quality, I made some distinctive overt 
bodily movement; and I might On MW occasion be presen- 
ted with a sense-content which J asserted to be of that 
quality, and then fail to make the hodily reaction which I 
had come to associate with it. In such a case I should 
probably abandon the hypothesis that sensfrcontents of 
that quality always called out in me the bodily reaction in 
question. But I should not, logically, be obliged to aban- 
don it. If I found it more convenient, I could save this 
hypothesis by assuming that I really did make the reac- 
tion, although 1 did not notice it, or. alternatively, that 
the sense-content did not have the quality I asserted it to 
have. The fact that this course is a possible one, that it 
involves no logical contradiction, proves that a proposi- 
tion which describes the quality of a presented sense- 
content may as legitimately be doubted 35 any other em- 
pineal proposition* And this shows that such a propose 
tion is not ostensive, for we have seen that an ostensive 
proposition could not legitimately be doubted. But pro- 
positions describing the actual qualities of presented 
sense-contents are the only examples of ostensive proposi- 
tions which those who believe in ostensive propositions 
have ever ventured to give. And if these propositions are 
not ostensive, it is certain that none are. 

In denying the possibility of ostensive propositions, we 
are not of course denying that there really is a 'given' 
element in each of our sense-experiences. Nor are we 

6. Of course those who believe in 'ostensive' proporiuons do 
not maintain that such a proposition as "This is white' is valid in 
virtue of its form alone. What they assert is that I am entitled to 
regard the proposition "This is white" as objectively certain when 
I am actually experiencing a wnite sense-content. But can it really 
be the case that they mean to assert tw> more than the trivial tau- 
tology that when I am seeing something white, then I am seeing 
something white I Sec following footnote. 

9* 



suggesting that- our sensations are themselves doubtful. 
Indeed such a suggestion would be nonsensical. A sensation 
is not the sort of thins which can be doubtful or not doubt- 
ful. A sensation simply occurs. What are doubtful are the 
propositions which refer to our sensations, including the 
propositions which describe the qualities of a presented 
sense-content, or assert that a certain sense-content has 
occurred. To identify a proposition of this sort with the 
sensation itself would clearly be a gross logical blunder. 
Yet ! fancy that the doctrine of ostensive propositions is 
the outcome of such a tacit identification. It is difficult to 
account for It in any other way.' 

However, we shall not waste time speculating about the 
origins of this false philosophical doctrine. Such questions 
may be left to the historian. Our business is to show that 
the doctrine is false, and this we may fairly claim to 
have done. It should now be clear that there are no ab- 
solutely certain empirical propositions. It is only tautolo- 
gies that arc certain. Empirical propositions are one and 
all hypotheses, which may be confirmed or discredited in 
actual sense-experience. And the propositions in which we 
record the observations that verify these hypotheses are 
themselves hypotheses which are subject to the test of fur- 
ther sense-experience. Thus there are no final propositions. 
When we set about verifying a hypothesis we may maVe 
an observation which satisfies us at the time. But the very 
next moment we may doubt whether the observation 
really did talte place, and require a fresh process of veri- 

7. it has subsequently occurred to me that (be doctrine of osten- 
sive propositions may be due to- the confusion of the proposition 
'ft is certain that p implies p' - e.g, 'It is certain that if I am in 
pain, then 1 am in pain' - which is a tautology, with the proposi- 
tion 'p implies that (p is certain)' - e.g. 'if 1 am in pain, then the 
proposition 'I am in pain' is certain*, which is, in general, false. 
Vide my article on "Toe Criterion of Truth'. Analysis, Vol III 
Nos. 1 and 2. 

92 



r 






fication in order to be reassured. And, logically, there is 
no reason why this procedure should not continue indefi- 
nitely, -each act of verification supplying us with a new 
hypothesis, which in turn leads to a further scries of acts 
of verification. In practice we assume that certain types of 
observation are trustworthy, and admit the hypothesis that 
they have occurred without bothering to embark on a pro- 
cess of verification. But we do this, not from obedience to 
any logical necessity, hut from a purely pragmatic motive, 
the nature of which will shortly be explained. 

When one speaks of hypotheses being verified in experi- 
ence, it is important to bear in mind that it is never just a 
single hypothesis which an observation confirms or dis- 
credits, but always a system of hypotheses. Suppose that 
we have devised an experiment to test the validity of a 
scientific 'law'. The law states that in certain conditions a 
certain type of observation will always be forthcoming- It 
may happen in this particular instance that we make the 
observation as our law predicts. Then it is not only the 
law itself that is substantiated, but also the hypotheses 
which assert the existence of the requisite conditions. For 
it is only by assuming the existence of these conditions 
that we can hold that our observation is relevant to the 
law. Alternatively, we may fait to make the expected ob- 
servation. And in that case we may conclude that the law 
is invalidated by our experiment. But we are not obliged 
to adopt this conclusion. If we wish to preserve our law, 
wc may do so by abandoning one or more of the other 
relevant hypotheses. We may say that the conditions were 
really not what tbey seemed to be, and construct a theory 
to explain how we came to be mistaken about them; or 
we may say that some factor which we had dismissed as 
irrelevant was really relevant, and support this view with 
supplementary hypotheses. We may even, assume that the 
experiment was really aot unfavourable, and that our 

93 



negative observation was hallucinatory. And in that case 
we must bring the hypotheses Which record the condi- 
tions that are deemed necessary for the occurrence of a 
hallucination into line with the hypotheses which des- 
cribe the conditions in which this observation is supposed 
to have taken place. Otherwise we shall be maintaining 
incompatible hypotheses. And this is the one thing that 
we may not do. But, so long as we take suitable steps to 
ieep our system of hypotheses free from self-contradiction, 
we may adopt any explanation of our observations that 
we choose. In practice our choice of an explanation is 
guided by certain considerations, which we shall presently 
describe. And these considerations have the effect of limit- 
ing our freedom in the matter of preserving and rejecting 
hypotheses. But logically our freedom is unlimited. Any 
procedure which ts self-consistent will satisfy the require- 
ments of logic 

It appears, then, that the 'facts of experience" can never 
compel us to abandon a hypothesis. A man can always 
sustain his convictions in the face of apparently hostile evi- 
dence if he is prepared to make the necessary ad hoc 
assumptions. But although any particular instance in which 
a cherished hypothesis appears to be refuted can al- 
ways be explained away, there must still remain the pos- 
sibility that the hypothesis will ultimately be abandoned. 
Otherwise it is not a genuine hypothesis. For a proposition 
whose validity we are resolved to maintain in the face of 
any experience is not a hypothesis at all, but a definition- 
In other words, it is not a synthetic but an analytic pro- 
position. 

That some of our roost hallowed 'laws of nature' are 
merely disguised definitions is, I think, incontestable, but 
this is not a question that we can go into here. 1 It is suffi- 

8. For an elaboration of this vi&tr, jxe H. Palncar-i, ia Scitace « 
rtfypoti&e. 

94- 



dent for us to point out that there is a danger of mistak- 
ing such definitions for genuine hypotheses, a danger 
which is increased by the fact that the same form of words 
may at one time, or for one set of people, express a syn- 
thetic proposition, and at another time, or for another act 
of people, express a tautology. For our definitions of things 
are not immutable. And if experience leads us to entertain 
a very strong belief that everything of the kind A has the 
property of being a B, we tend to make the possession of 
this property a defining characteristic of the land. Ulti- 
mately we may refuse to call anything A unless it is also a 
B. And in that case the sentence 'All A*s arc BV, which 
originally expressed a synthetic generalization, would 
come to express a plain tautology. 

Out good reason for drawing attention to this possibi- 
lity is that the neglect of it by philosophers is responsible 
for much of the confusion that infects their treatment of 
general propositions. Consider the stock example, 'All 
men are mortal.' We are told that this is not a doubtful 
hypothesis* as Hume maintained, but an instance of a neces- 
sary connexion. And if we ask what it is that is here neces- 
sarily connected, the only answer that appears possible to 
us is that it is the concept of 'man" and the concept of 
'being mortal'. But. the only meaning which we attach to 
the statement that two concepts are necessarily connected 
is that the sense of one concept is contained in that of the 
other. Thus to say that 'All men are mortal' is an instance 

of a necessary -connexion is to say that the concept of 
being mortal is contained in the concept of man, and this 
amounts to saying that 'All men are mortal" is a tauto- 
logy. Now the philosopher may use the word 'man' in 
such a way that he would refuse to call anything a man 
unless it were mortal. And in that case the sentence 'All 
men are mortal* will, as far as he is concerned, express a 
tautology* But this does not mean that the proposition 

95 



which we ordinarily express by that sentence is a tauto- 
logy. Even for our philosopher, it remains a genuine em- 
pirical hypothesis. Only he cannot now express it in the 
form 'All men are mortal'. Instead, he must say that every- 
thing which has the other defining properties of a man 
also has the property of bein^ mortal, or something to that 
effect. Thus we may create tautologies by a suitable ad- 
justment of our definitions: but we cannot solve empiri- 
cal problems merely by juggling with the meanings of 
words. 

Of course, when a philosopher says that the proposition 
'All men are mortal' is an instance of a necessary con- 
nexion, he docs not intend to say that it is a tautology. It 
is left to us to point out that this is all he can be saying, 
if his words are to bear their ordinary sense and at the 
same time express a significant proposition. But I think 
that he finds it possible to hold that this general proposi- 
tion is both synthetic and necessary, only because he iden- 
tifies it tacitly with the tautology which might, given suit- 
able conventions, be expressed by the same form o£ words. 
And the same applies to all other general propositions of 
law. We may turn the sentences which now express them 
into expressions of definitions. And then These sentences 
will express necessary propositions. But these will be differ- 
ent propositions from the original generalizations. They, 
as Hume saw, can never be necessary. However firmly we 
believe them, it is always conceivable that a future ex- 
perience will lead us to abandon them. 

This brings us once more to the question. What, are Che 
considerations that determine in any given situation 
which of the relevant hypotheses shall be preserved and 
which shall be abandoned ? It is sometimes suggested that 
we arc guided solely by the principle of economy, or, in 
other words, by our desire to make the least possible al- 
teration in our previously accepted system of hypotheses. 

96 



But though we undoubtedly have this desire, and are in- 
fluenced by it to som-e extent, it is not the sole or even 
the dominant, factor in our procedure. If our concern was 
simply to keep our existing system of hypotheses intact, 
we should not feel obliged to take any notice of an un- 
favourable observation. We should not feel the need Co 
account for it in any way whatsoever - not even by intro- 
ducing the hypothesis that we had just had a hallucina- 
tion. Wc should simply ignore it. But, in fact, we do not 
disregard inconvenient observations. Their occurrence al- 
ways causes us to make some alteration in our system of 
hypotheses in spite of our desire to keep it intact. Why is 
this so? Jf we can answer this question, and show why we 
find it necessary to alter our systems of hypotheses at all, 
we shall be in a better position to decide what are the 
principles according to which such alterations axe actually 
carried out. 

What we must do to solve this problem is to ask our- 
selves, What is the purpose of formulating hypotheses? 
Why do we construct these systems in the first place? 
The answer is that they are designed to enable us to anti- 
cipate the course of our sensations. The function of a sys- 
tem of hypotheses is to warn us beforehand what will be 

our experience in a certain field - to enable us to make ac- 
curate predictions. The hypotheses may therefore be de- 
scribed as rules which govern our expectation of future 
experience. There is no need to say why we require such 
rules, it is plain that On our ability to make successful pre- 
dictions depends the satisfaction of even our simplest do- 
sires, including the desire to survive. 

Now the essential feature of our procedure with regard 
to the formulation of these rules is the use of past experi- 
ence as a guide to the future. We have already remarked 
upon this, when discussing the so-called problem of in- 
duction, and we have seen that there is no sea$< io asking 



97 



for a theoretical justification of this policy. The philoso- 
pher must be content to record the facts of scientific 
procedure. If he .ve-eks to justify it, beyond showing that it 
is self-consistent, he will find himself involved in spurious 
problems. This is a point which we stressed earlier on. and 
we shall not trouble lo argue it over again. 

We remark, then, as a fact that our forecasts of future 
experience are in some way determined by what we have 
experienced in the past. And this fact explains why 
science, which is essentially predictive, is also to some 
extent a description of our experience.' But it is noticeable 
that we tend to ignore those features of our experience 
which cannot be made the basis of fruitful generaliza- 
tions. And, furthermore, that which, we do describe, we 
describe with some latitude. As Poincare" puts it : 'One does 
not limit oneself to generalizing experience, one corrects it; 
and the physicist who consented to abstain from these cor- 
rections and really be satisfied with bare experience would 
be obliged to prom ulgatc the most extraordinary laws. '» 

But even if we do not follow past «tperience slavishly 
in making our predictions, we arc guitfed by it to a very 
large extent. And this explains why we do not simply dis- 
regard the conclusion of an unfavourable experiment. We 
assume that a system of hypotheses which has: broken 
down once is likely to break down again. Wc could, of 
course, assume that it had not broken down at all. but 
wc believe that this assumption would not pay us so well 
as the recognition that the system had really failed us, and 
therefore required some alteration if it was not to fail us 
again. We alter our system because we think that by alter- 

S>. It will be seen th« ««a 'descriptions of past experience' arc 
in a sense predictive sine* they function as 'rules for the anticipa- 
tion of future experience'. Sec the end of this chapter Cor an 
elaboration of this point 

10- La Science et i'Hypothtee. Part IV, Chapter ix 4 p. 170, 

98 



fag it we shall make it a more efficient instrument for the 
anticipation of experience And this belief is derived from 
our guiding principle that, broadly speaking, the future 
course of our sensations will be in accordance with the 
past. 

This desire of ours to have an efficient set of rules for 
our predictions, which causes us to take notice of un- 
favourable observations, is also the factor which primarily 
determines how we adjust our system to cover the new 
data. It is true that we are infected with a spirit of con- 
servatism and would rather make small alterations than 
large ones, it is disagreeable and troublesome for us to 
admit that our existing system is radically defective. And 
Jt is true that, other things being equal, we prefer simple 
to complex hypotheses, again from the desire to s^vc our- 
selves trouble. But if experience leads us to suppose that 
radical changes are necessary, then we are prepared to 
make them, even though they do complicate our system, 
as the recent history of physics shows. When an observa- 
tion runs counter to our most confident expectations, the 
easiest course is to ignore it, or at any rate to explain it 
away. If we do not do this, it is because we think that, if 
we leave our system as it is, we shall suffer further dis~ 
appoinanents. We think it will increase the efficiency of 
our system as an instrument of prediction if we make it 
compatible with the hypothesis that the unexpected obser- 
vation occurred. Whether we are right in thinking this is a 
question which cannot be settled by argument. We can 
only wait and see if our new system is successful in practice. 
U it is not, we alter it once again. 

We have now obtained the information we required in 
order to answer our original question, 'What is the cri- 
terion by which we test the validity of an empirical pro- 
position?' The answer is that we test the validity of an 
empirical hypothesis by seeing whether it actually fulfils 

99 



the function which it is designed to fulfil. And we have 
seen that the function of an empirical hypothesis is to 
enable us to anticipate experience. Accordingly, if an ob- 
servation to which a given proposition is relevant con- 
forms to our expectations, the truth of that proposition is 
confirmed. One cannot say that the proposition has been 
proved absolutely valid, because it is still possible that a 
future observation will discredit it. But one can say that 
its probability has been increased. If the observation is 
contrary to our expectations, then the status of the pro- 
position is jeopardized. We may preserve it by adopting 
or abandoning other hypotheses: or we may consider it 
to have been confuted. But even if it is rejected in con- 
sequence of an unfavourable observation, one cannot say 
that it has been invalidated absolutely. For it is still pos- 
sible that future observations wiU lead us to reinstate it* 
One can say only that its probability has been diminished. 
It is necessary now to make clear what is meant in this 
context by the term 'probability'. In referring to the pro- 
bability of a proposition, we are not, as is sometimes sup- 
posed, referring to an intrinsic property of it, or even to 
an unanalysable logical relation which holds between it 
and other propositions. Roughly speaking all that we 
mean by saying that an observation increases the proba- 
bility of a proposition is that it increases our confidence 
in the proposition, as measured by our willingness to rely 
on it in practice as a forecast of our sensations, and to 
retain it in preference to other hypotheses in face of an 
unfavourable experience. And, similarly, to say of an ob- 
servation that it diminishes the probability of a proposi- 
tion is to say that it decreases our willingness to include 
the proposition in the system of accepted hypotheses 
which serve us as guides to the future. 11 

ii. This definition is not, of course, intended to apply to tho 

mathematical usage of the term 'protvability'. 

100 



As It stands, this account of the notion of probability 
is somewhat over-simplified. For it assumes that we deal 
with all hypotheses in a uniform self-consistent fashion, 
and tMs 3s unfortunately not the case. In practice, we do 
not always relate belief to observation in the way which is 
generally recognized to be the most reliable. Although we 
acknowledge that certain standards of evidence ought al- 
ways to be observed in. the formation of our beliefs, we 
do not always observe them. In other words, we are not 
always rational. For to be rational is simply to employ a 
self-consistent accredited procedure in the formation of 
all one's beliefs. The fact that the procedure, by reference 

to which we now determine whether a belief is rational, 

may subsequently forfeit our confidence, does not in any 
way detract from the rationality of adopting it now. For 
we define a rational belief as one which is arrived at by 
the methods which we now consider reliable. There is no 
absolute standard of rationality, just as there is no me- 
thod of constructing hypotheses which is guaranteed to be 
reliable. We trust the methods of contemporary science 
because they have been successful in practice. If in the 
future we were to adopt different methods, then beliefs 
which are now rational might become irrational from the 
standpoint of these new methods. But the fact that this is 
possible has no bearing on the fact that these beliefs art 
rational now. 

This definition of rationality enables us to amend our 
account of what is meant by the term 'probability', in 
the usage with which we are now concerned. To say that 
aji observation increases the probability of a hypothesis- 
is not always equivalent to saying that it increases the 
degree of confidence with which we actually entertain the 
hypothesis, as measured by our readiness to act upon It ; 
for we may be behaving irrationally. It is equivalent to 
saying that the observation increases the degree of 

IOI 



confidence with which it is rational to entertain the hypo- 
thesis. And here we may repeat that the rationality of a 
belief is defined, not by reference to any absolute stan- 
dard, but by reference to part of our own actual practice. 

The obvious objection to our original definition of pro- 
bability was that it was incompatible with the fact that 
one is sometimes mistaken about the probability of a 
proposition - that one can bcticYC it to be more or less prot> 
able than it really is. It is plain that our amended defini- 
tion escapes this objection, For, according to it. the prob- 
ability of a proposition is determined both by the nature 
of our observations and by our conception of rationality. 
So that when a man relates belief to observation in a way 
which is inconsistent with the accredited scientific me- 
thod of evaluating hypotheses, it is compatible with cur 
definition of probability to say that he is mistaken, about 
the probability of the propositions which he believes. 

With this account of probability we complete our dis- 
cussion of the validity of empirical propositions. The 
point which we must finally stress is that our remarks 
apply to. all empirical propositions without exception, 
whether they are singular, or -particular, or universal 
Every synthetic proposition is a rule for the anticipation 
of future experience and is distinguished in content from 
other synthetic propositions by the fact that it is relevant 
to different situations. So that the fact that propositions 
referring to the past have the same hypothetical character 
as those which refer to the present, and those which refer 
to the future, in no way entails that these three types of 
proposition are not distinct. For they are verified by, and 
so serve to predict, different experiences. 

It may be their failure to appreciate this point which 
has caused certain philosophers to deny that propositions 
about the past are hypotheses in the same sense as the laws 
of a natural science are hypotheses. For they have not 



102 



been able to support their view t>y any substantial argu- 
ments, or to say what propositions about the past arc, if 
they are not hypotheses, of the sort we have just described. 
For my own part, I do not find anything excessively para- 
doxical in the view that propositions about the past are 
rules for the prediction of those 'historical* experiences 
which are commonly said to verify them," and I do not 
see how else 'our knowledge of the past' is to be analysed. 
And I suspect, moreover, that those who object to our 
pragmatic treatment of history are really basing their ob- 
jections on a tacit, or explicit assumption that the past 
is somehow 'objectively there' to be corresponded to - 
that it is 'real' in the metaphysical sense of the term. And 
from wbat we have remarked concerning the metaphysi- 
cal issue of idealism and realism, it is clear that such an 
assumption is not a genuine hypothesis." 

iz. Tile implications of this statement may be misleading, vide 
Introduction, pp. 23-4. 

15. The -case for a pragmatic treatment of history, in our sense. 
Is well put by C. L Lewis Is Mind end the World Ortfcr, pp. 150-jM. 



103 



1 



CHAPTER 6 
CRITIQUE OF ETHICS AND THEOLOGY 

There is still one objection to be met before we can 
claim to have justified our view that all synthetic pro- 
positions are empirical hypotheses. This objection is based 
on the common supposition that our speculative know- 
ledge is of two distinct kinds - that which relates to ques- 
tions of empirical fact, and that which relates to questions 
of value. It will be said that 'statements of value' are 
genuine synthetic propositions, but that they cannot with 
any show of justice be represented as hypotheses, which 
are used to predict the course of our sensations; and, ac- 
cordingly, that the existence of ethics and aesthetics as 
branches of speculative knowledge presents an insuper- 
able objection to our radical empiricist thesis. 

In face of this objection, it is our business to give an 
account of 'judgements of value' which is both satisfac- 
tory in itself and consistent with our general empiricist 
principles. We shall set ourselves to show that in so fax 
as statements of value are significant, they are ordinary 
'scientific' statements; and that in so far as they are 
not scientific, they are not in the literal sense significant, 
but are simply expressions of emotion which can be 
neither true nor false. la maintaining this view, we may 
confine ourselves for the present to the case of ethical 
statements. What is said about them will be found to 
apply, mutatis mutandis, to the case of aesthetic state- 
ments also.' 

The ordinary system of ethics, as elaborated in the 
works of ethical philosophers, is very far from being a 

I. The argument that follows should be read In conjunction w«tfe 
the Introduction, pp. 25-8. 

104. 



homogeneous whole. Not only is it apt to contain pieces 
of metaphysics, and analyses of non-ethical concepts t its 
actual ethical contents arc themselves of very different 
kinds. We may divide them, indeed, into four main classes. 
There are, first of all, propositions which express defini- 
tioiis of ethical terms, or judgements about the legitimacy 
or possibility of certain definition*, Secondly, there are 
propositions describing the phenomena of moral experi- 
ence, and their causes. Thirdly, there are exhortations to 
mora! virtue. And, lastly, there are actual ethical judge- 
ments. It is unfortunately the case that the distinction 
between these four classes, plain as it is, is commonly ig- 
nored by ethical philosophers; with the result that it Is 
often very difficult to tell from ihcir works what it is that 
they are seeking to discover or prove. 

In fact, it is easy to see that only the first of our four 
classes, namely that which comprises the propositions re- 
lating to the definitions of ethical terms, can be said to 
constitute ethical philosophy. The propositions which de- 
scribe the phenomena of moral experience, and their 
causes, must be assigned to the science of psychology, or 
sociology. The exhortations to moral virtue are not pro- 
positions at all, but ejaculation? or commands which are 
designed to provoke the reader to action of a certain sort. 
Accordingly, they do not belong to any branch of philo- 
sophy or science. As for the expressions oi ethical judge- 
ments, we have not yet determined how they should be 
classified. But inasmuch as they are certainly neither defi- 
nitions nor comments upon, definitions, nor quotations, 
we may say decisively that they do not belong to ethical 
philosophy. A strictly philosophical treatise on ethics 
should therefore make no ethical pronouncements. But it 
should, by giving an analysis of ethical terms, show what 
is the category to which all such pronouncements belong. 
And this is what we are now about to do. 






\ 



105 



A question which is often discussed by ethical philo- 
sophers is whether it is possible to find definitions which 
would reduce all ethical terms to one or two fundamental 
terms. But this question, though it undeniably belongs to 
ethical philosophy, is not relevant to our present inquiry. 
We are not now concerned to discover which term, with- 
in the sphere of ethical terms, is to be taken as fundamen- 
tal; whether, for example, 'good' can be defined in terms 
of 'right* or 'right' in terms of 'good', or both in terms 
of 'value'. What we are interested in is the possibility of 
reducing the whole sphere of ethical terms to non-ethical 
terms. We are inquiring whether statements of ethical 
value can be translated into statements of empirical f get. 

That they can be so translated is the contention of those 
ethical philosophers who are commonly called subject!- 
vists, and of those who are known as utilitarians. For the 
utilitarian defines the Tightness of actions, and the good- 
ness of ends, in terms of the pleasure, or happiness, or 
satisfaction, to which they give rise; the subjectivist, in 
terms of the feelings of approval which a certain person, 
or group of people, has towards them. Each of these types 
of definition makes moral judgements into a sub-class of 
psychological or sociological judgements; and for this rea- 
son they are very attractive to us. For, if either was cor- 
rect, it would follow that ethical assertions were not 
gcnerically different from the factual assertions which are 
ordinarily contrasted with them; and the account which 
we have already given of empirical hypotheses would apply 
to them also. 

Nevertheless we shall not adopt either a subjectivist or 
a utilitarian analysis of ethical terms. We reject the sub- 
jectivist view that to call an action right, c-r a thing good, 
is to say that it is generally approved oi, because it is not 
self-contradictory to assert that some actions which are 
generally approved of are not right, or that some things 

ro6 



which are generally approved of are not good. And we re- 
ject the alternative subjectivist view that a man who as- 
serts that a certain action is right, or that a certain thing 
is good, is saying that he himself approves of it, on the 
ground that a man who confessed that he sometim-es 
approved of what was bad or wTong would not be contra- 
dicting himself. And a similar argument is fatal to utili- 
tarianism. We cannot agree that to call an action right is 
to say that of all the actions possible in the circumstances 
it would cause, or be likely to cause, the greatest happiness, 
or the greatest balance of pleasure over pain, or the great- 
est balance of satisfied over unsatisfied desire, because we 
find that it is not self-contradictory to -say that it is some- 
times wrong to perform the action which would actually 
or probably cause the greatest happiness, or the greatest 
balance of pleasure over pain, or of satisfied over unsatis- 
fied desire, And since it is not self-contradictory to say 
that some pleasant things are not good, or that some bad 
things are desired, it cannot be the case that the sentence 
'\ is good' is equivalent to 'x is pleasant', or to *x is de- 
sired'. And to every other variant of utilitarianism with 
which I am acquainted the same objection can be made. 
And therefore we should, I think, conclude that the vali- 
dity of ethical judgements is not determined by the felicl- 
fic tendencies of actions, any more than, by the nature of 
people's feelings; but that it must be regarded as 'absolute' 
or 'intrinsic', and not empirically calculable. 

If we say this, we are not, of course, denying that it is 
possible to invent a language in which all ethical symbols 
are definable in non-ethical terms, or even that it is desir- 
able to invent such a language and adopt it in place of our 
awn; what we are denying is that the suggested reduction 
of ethical to non-ethical statements 3s consistent with the 
conventions of our actual language. That is. we reject utili- 
tarianism and subjectivism, not as proposals to replace 

107 



our existing ethical notions by new ones, but as analyses 
of our existing ethical notions, Our contention is simply 
that in our language, sentences which contain normative 
ethical symbol are not equivalent to sentences which ex- 
press psychological propositions, or indeed empirical pro- 
positions of any kind- 
It is advisable here to make it plain that it is only norma- 
tive ethical symbols, and not descriptive ethical symbols, 
that are held by us to be indefinable in factual terms. There 
is a danger of confusing these two types of symbols, because 
they are commonly constituted by signs of the Same sensible 
form. Thus a complex sign of the form 'x is wrong' may 
constitute a sentence which expresses a moral judgement 
concerning a certain type of Conduct, or it may constitute 
a sentence which states that a certain type of conduct is 
repugnant to the moral sense of a particular society. In 
the latter case, the symbol 'wrong' is a descriptive ethical 
symbol, and the sentence in which it occurs expresses 
an ordinary sociological proposition; in the former Case, 
the symbol 'wrong' ts a normative ethical symbol, and 
the sentence in which it occurs does not, we maintain, ex- 
press an empirical proposition at all. It as only with norma- 
tive ethics that wc arc at present concerned; so that when- 
ever ethical symbols are used in the course of this argument 
without qualification, they are always to be interpreted 
as symbols of the normative type. 

In admitting that normative ethical concepts are irre- 
ducible to empirical concepts, we seem to be leaving the 
way clear for the "absolutist" view of ethics - that is, the 
view that statements of value are not controlled by ob- 
servation, as ordinary empirical propositions 3re, but only 
by a mysterious 'intellectual intuition'. A feature of this 
theory, which is seldom recognized by its advocates, is 
that it makes statements of value unverifiable. For it is 
notorious that what seems intuitively certain to one per- 

to8 



son may seem doubtful, or even false, to another. So that 
unless it is possible to provide some criterion by which 
one may decide between conflicting intuitions, a mere ap- 
peal to intuition is worthless as a test of a proposition's 
validity. But in the case of moral judgements no such cri- 
terion can be given. Some moralists claim to settle the 
matter by. saying that they 'know' that their own moral 
judgements are correct. But such an assertion Is of purely 
psychological interest, and has not the slightest tendency 
to prove the validity of any moral judgement. For dissen- 
tient moralists may equally well 'know' that their ethical 
views are correct. And, as far as subjective certainty goes. 
there will be nothing to choose between them. When such 
differences of opinion arise in connexion with an ordin- 
ary empirical proposition, one may attempt to resolve 
them by referring to, or actually carrying out, some rele- 
vant empirical test. But with regard to ethical statements, 
there is, on the 'absolutist' or "intuitionist' theory, no 
relevant empirical test- We arc therefore justified in saying 
that on this theory ethical statements are held to be 
unvcrifiable. They arc, of course, also held to be genuine 
synthetic proportions. 

Considering the use which we have made of the prin- 
ciple that a synthetic proposition is significant only if it 
is empirically verifiable, it is clear that the acceptance of 
an 'absolutist' theory of ethics would undermine the 
whole of our main argument. And as we have already re- 
jected the 'naturalistic' theories which are commonly 
supposed to provide the only alternative to 'absolutism' 
in ethics, we seem to have (reached a difficult position. We 
shall meet the difficulty by showing that the correct treat- 
ment of ethical statements is afforded by a third theory, 
which is wholly compatible with our radical empiricism. 

We begin by admitting that the fundamental ethical 
concepts are unanalysable, inasmuch as there is no 

109 



criterion by which one can test the validity of the judge- 
ments in which they occur. So far we are in agreement 
with the absolutists. But, unlike the absolutists, we are 
able to give an explanation of thte fact about ethical con- 
cepts, We say that the reason why they are unanalysable is 
that they are mere pseudo-concepts. The presence of an 
ethical symbol in a proposition adds nothing to its factual 
content. Thus if 1 say to someone, 'You acted wrongly in 
stealing that money,' I am not stating anything more than 
if 1 had simply said, 'You stole that money.' In adding that 
this action is wrong I am not making any further state- 
ment about it. 1 am simply evincing my moral disapproval 
of it. It is as if I had said, 'You stole that money,' in a 
peculiar tone of horror, or written it with the addition of 
some special exclamation marks. The tone, or the exclama- 
tion marks, adds nothing to the Jiteral meaning of the 
sentence. It merely serves to show that the expression of 
it is attended by certain feelings in the speaiker. 

If now I generalize my previous statement and say. 
•Stealing money is wrong.' I produce a sentence which 
has no factual meaning - that is, expresses no proposition 
which can he cither true or false, it is as if I had written 
'Stealing money! ! ' - where the shape and thickness of 
the exclamation marks show, by a suitable convention, 
that a special sort of moral disapproval is the feeling which 
is being expressed. It is clear that there is hothing said 
here which can be true or false, Another man may dis- 
agree with me about the wrongness of stealing, in the 
sense that he may not have the same feelings about steal- 
ing as I have, and he may quarrel with me on account of 
my mora] sentiments. But he cannot, strictly speaking, 
contradict me. For in saying that a certain type of action 
is right or wrong. I am not making any factual statement, 
not even a statement about my own state of mind. I am 
merely expressing certain moral sentiments. And the man 

no 









who is ostensibly contradicting me is merely expressing 
his moral sentiments. So that there is plainly no sense in 
asking which of us is in the right. For neither of us is as- 
serting a genuine proposition. 

What we have just been saying about the symbol 
'wrong* applies to all normative ethical symbols. Some- 
times they occur in sentences which record ordinary em- 
pirical facts besides expressing ethical feeling about those 
facts: sometimes they occur an sentences which simply 
express etbicar* feeling about a certain type of actio*, or 
situation, without making any statement of fact. But in 
every case in which one would commonly be said to be 
making an ethical judgement, the function of the relevant 
ethical word is purely 'emotive'. It is used to express feel- 
ing about certain objects, but not to make any assertion 
about them. 

It is worth mentioning that ethical terms do not serve 
only to express feeling. They are calculated also to arouse 
feeling, and so to stimulate action. Indeed some of them 
are used in such a way as to give the sentences an which 
they occur the effect of commands. Thus the sentence 'It 
is your duty to tell the truth' may be regarded both as 
the expression c>f a certain sort of ethical feeling about 
truthfulness and as the expression of the command 'Tel! 
the truth." The sentence 'You ought to tell the truth' also 
involves the command 'Tell the truth', but here the tone 
of the command is less emphatic. In the sentence 'It is 
good to tell the truth' the command has become tittle 
more than a suggestion. And thus the 'meaning' of the 
word 'good*, in its ethical usage, is differentiated from 
that of the word 'duty' or the word 'ought'. In fact we 
may define the meaning of the various ethical words in 
terms both of the different feelings they are ordinarily 
taken to express, and also the different responses which 
they are calculated to provoke. 

in 



Wc can now see why it is impossible to find a criterion 
for determining the validity of ethical judgements. It is 
not because they have an 'absolute' validity which is mys- 
teriously independent of ordinary sense-experience, but 
because they have no objective validity whatsoever. If a 
sentence makes no statement at all, there is obviously no 
sense in asking whether what it says is true or false. And 
we have seen, that sentences which simply express moral 
Judgements do not say anything. They are pure expres- 
sions of feeling and as such do not come under the cate- 
gory of truth and falsehood. They are unverifiable for the 
same reason as a cry of pain or a word of command ts un- 
verifiable - because they do not express genuine proposi- 
tions. 

Thus, although our theory of ethics might fairly be said 
to be radically subjectivist, it differs in a very important 
respect from the orthodox subjectivist theory. For the or- 
t-hodox subjectivist does not deny, as we do, that the sen- 
tences of a rooralizer express genuine propositions, All he 
denies is that they express propositions of a unique non- 
empirical character- His own view is that they express 
propositions about the speaker's feelings. U this were so, 
ethical judgements dearly would be capable of being true 
or false. They would be true if the speaker had the rele- 
vant feelings, and false if he had not. And this is a mat- 
ter which is> in principle, empirically verifiable. Further- 
more they could be significantly contradicted. For if I say, 
'Tolerance is a virtue.' and someone answers, 4 Yqu don't 
approve of it,' he would, on the ordinary subjectivist 
theory, be contradicting me. On our theory, he would not 
be contradicting me. because, in saying that tolerance was 
a virtue, I should not be making any statement about my 
own feelings or about anything else. I should simply be 
evincing my feelings, which is not at all the same thing as 
saying that 1 have theta, 

112 



The distinction between the expression of feeling and 
the assertion of feeling is complicated by the fact that the 
assertion that one has a certain feeling often accompanies 
the expression of that feeling, and is then, indeed, a fac- 
tor in the expression of that feeling. Thus I may simul- 
taneously express boredom and say that I am bored, and 
in that case my utterance of the words 'I am bored' is 
one of the circumstances which make it true to say that I 
am expressing or evincing boredom. But ! can express 
boredom without actually saying that I am bored. I can 
express it by my tone and gestures, while making a state- 
ment about something wholly unconnected with it, or by 
art -ejaculation, or without uttering any words at aU, So 

that even if the assertion that one has a certain feeling al- 
ways involves the expression of that feeling, the expres- 
sion of a feeling assuredly does not always involve the 
assertion that one has it. And this is the important point 

to grasp in. considering the distinction between Our theory 

and the ordinary subjectivist theory- For whereas the sub' 
jectivist holds that ethical statements actually assert the 
existence of certain feelings, we hold that ethical state- 
ments: arc expressions and excitants of feeling which do 
not necessarily involve any assertions. 

We have already remarked that the main objection to 
the ordinary subjectivist theory is that the validity of 
ethical judgements is not determined by the nature of 
their author's feelings. And this is an objection which our 
theory escapes. For it does not imply that the existence of 
any feelings b a necessary and sufficient condition of the 
validity of an ethical judgement. It implies, on the con- 
trary, that ethical judgements have no validity. 

There is, however, a celebrated argument against sub- 
jectivist theories which our theory does not escape. !t has 
been pointed out by Moore that if ethical statements were 
simply statements about the speaker's feelings, it would 

1*3 



be impossible to argue about questions of value.' To take 

a typical example: if a man said that thrift was a virtue, 
and another replied that it was a vice, they would nbt, 
on this theory, be disputing with one another* One would 
be saying that he approved of thrift, and the other that he 
didn't; and there is no reason why both these statements 
should not he true. Now Moore held it to be obvious that 
we do dispute about questions of value, and accordingly 
concluded that the particular form of subjectivism which 
he was discussing was false. 

It is plain that the conclusion that it is impossible to 
dispute about questions of value follows from our theory 
also. For as we hold that such sentences as 'Thrift is a 
virtue' and 'Thrift is a vice" do not express propositions 
at all, we clearly cannot hold that they express incom- 
patible propositions. We must therefore admit that i£ 
Moore's argument really refutes the ordinary subjectmst 
theory, it also refutes ours. But. in fact, we deny that it 
does refute even the ordinary subjfrctfvist theory. For we 

hold that one really never does dispute about questions of 

value. 

This may seem, at first sight to be a very paradoxical 
assertion. For wc certainly do engage in disputes which 
are ordinarily regarded as disputes about questions of 
value, But, in all such cases, we find, if we consider the 
matter closely, that the dispute is not really about a ques- 
tton of value, but about a question of fact. When someone 
disagrees with us about the moral value of a certain action 
or type of action, we do admittedly resort to argument in 
order to win him over to our way of thinking. But we <k> 
not attempt to show by our arguments that he has the 
'wrong* ethical feeling towards a situation whose nature 
he has correctly apprehended. What wc attempt to show 
is that he is mistaken about the facts of the case. We argue 

z. cf. Philosophical Studies. 'The Nature of Moral Philosophy'. 

EI 4 



that he has misconceived the agent's motive: or that he 
has misjudged the effects of the action, or its probable 
effects in view of the agent's knowledge; or that he has 
failed to take into account the special circumstances- in 
which the agent was placed. Or else we employ more gen- 
eral arguments about the effects which actions of a certain 
type tend to produce, or the qualities which are usu- 
alLy manifested in their performance. Wc do this in the 
hope that we have only to get our opponent to _ a S ree ™ ih - 
us about the nature of the empirical facts for him to adopt 
the same moral attitude towards them as we do. And as 
the people with whom we argue have generally received 
the same moral education as ourselves, and live in the 
same social order, our expectation is usually justified. But 
if our opponent happens to have undergone a different 
process of moral 'conditioning' from ourselves, so that, 
even when he acknowledges all the facts, he still disagrees 
with us about the moral value of the actions under dis- 
cussion, then we abandon the attempt to convince him by 
argument. We say that it is impossible to argue with him 
because he has. a distorted or undeveloped moral sense; 
whichsignines merely that he employs a different set of 
values from our own. We feel that our own system of 
values is superior, and therefore speak in such derogatory 
terms of his. But we cannot bring forward any arguments 
to show that our system is superior. For our judgement 
that it is so is itself a judgement of value, and accordingly 
outside the scope of argument. It is because argument fails 
us when we come to deal with pure questions of value, as 
distinct from questions of fact,, that we finally resort to 
mere abuse. 

In short, we find that argument is possible on mora! 
questions only if some system of values is presupposed. If 
our opponent concurs with us in expressing moral dis- 
approval of all actions of a given type t, then we may get 

US 



him to condemn a particular action A, by "bringing for- 
ward arguments to show that A is of type t. For the ques- 
tion whether A does or does not "belong to that type is a 
plain question of fact. Given that a man has certain moral 
principles, we argue that he must, in order to be consistent, 
react moral!/ to certain things in a certain way. What we 
do not and cannot argue about is the validity of these 
moral principles. We merely praise or condemn them in 
the light of our own feelings. 

If anyone doubts the accuracy of this account of moral 
disputes. let him try to construct even an imaginary argu- 
ment on a question of value which does not reduce itself 
to an argument about a question of logic or about an em- 
pirical matter of fact, i am confident that he will not suc- 
ceed in producing a single example. And if that is the case, 
be must allow that its involving the impossibility of purely 
ethical arguments is not. as Moore thought, a ground of 
objection to our theory, but rather a point in favour of it. 

Haying upheld our theory against the only criticism 
which appeared to threaten it, we may now use it to de- 
fine the nature of all ethical inquiries. We find that ethical 
philosophy consists simply in saying that ethical concepts 
are pseudo-concepts and therefor* unanalysable. TTie fur- 
ther task of describing the different feelings that the dif- 
ferent ethical terms are used to express, and the different 
reactions that they customarily provoke, is a task for the 
psychologist. There cannot be such a thing as ethical 
science, if by ethical science one means the elaboration of 
a 'true' system of morals. For we have seen that, as ethi- 
cal judgements are mere expressions of feeling, there can 
be n9 way o£ determining the validity of any ethical sys- 
tem, and. indeed, no sense in asking whether any such sys- 
tem is true. All that one may legitimately inquire in this 
connexion is. What are the moral habits of a given per- 
son or group of people, and what causes them to have pre 

116 






cisely those habits and feelings? And this inquiry falls 
wholly within the scope of the existing social sciences. 

It appears, then, that ethics, as a branch of knowledge, 
b nothing more than 3 department of psychology an< * 
sociology. And in case anyone thinks that we are over- 
looking the existence of casuistry, wc may remark that 
casuistry is not a science, but is a purely analytical in- 
vestigation of the structure of a given moral system. In 
other words, it is an exercise in formal logic. 

When one comes to pursue the psychological inquiries 
which constitute ethical science, one is immediately en- 
abled to account for the Kantian and hedonistic theories 
of morals. For one finds that one of the chief causes of 
moral behaviour £s fear, both conscious and unconscious, 
of a god's displeasure, and fear of the enmity of society. 
And this, indeed, is the reason, why moral precepts pre- 
sent themselves to some people as 'categorical' com- 
mands. And one finds, also, that the moral code of a society 
is partly determined by the beliefs of that society con- 
cerning the conditions of its own happiness - or, in other 
words, that a society tends to encourage or discourage a 
given type of conduct by the use of moral sanctions ac- 
cording as it appears to promote or detract from the con- 
tentment of the society as a whole. And this is the reason 
why altruism is recommended in most moral codes and 
egotism condemned. It is from the observation of this con- 
nexion between morality and happiness that hedonistic or 
eudaemonistic theories of morals ultimately spring, just as 
the moral theory of Kant is based on the fact, previously 
explained, that moral precepts have for some people the 
force of inexorable commands. As each of these theories 
Ignores the fact which lies at the root of the other, both 
may be criticized as being onesided; but this is not the 
main objection to either of them- Their essential defect 
is that they treat propositions which refer to the causes 

"7 



and attributes of our ethical feelings as ff they were de- 
finitions of ethical concepts. And thus They fail to recog- 
nize that ethical concepts are pseudo-concepts and con- 
sctj uently indefinable. 

As we have already said, our conclusions about the na- 
ture Of ethics apply to aesthetics also. Aesthetic terms are 
used in exactly the same way as ethical terms. Such aes- 
thetic words as 'beautiful' and 'hideous' are employed, as 
ethical words are employed, not to make statements of 
fact, hut simply to express certain feelings and evoke a 
certain response. It follows, as in ethics, that there is no 
sense in attributing objective validity to aesthetic judge- 
ments,^ and no possibility of arguing about questions of 
value in aesthetics, but only about questions of fact. A 
scientific treatment of aesthetics would show us what in 
general were the causes of aesthetic feeling, why various 
societies produced and admired the works of art they did, 
why taste varies as it does within a given society, and so 
forth. And these are ordinary psychological or sociological 
questions. They have, of course, little or nothing to do 
with aesthetic criticism as we understand it. But that is 
because the purpose of aesthetic criticism is not so much 
to give knowledge as to communicate emotion. The critic, 
by calling attention to certain features of the work under 
review, and expressing his own feelings about them,, en- 
deavours to make us share his attitude towards the work 
as a whole. The only relevant propositions that he formu- 
lates are propositions describing the nature of the work. 
And these art plain records of fact. We conclude, there- 
fore, that there is nothing in aesthetics, any more than 
there is in ethics, to justify the view that It embodies a 
unique type of knowledge*. 

It should now be clear that the only information which 
we can legitimately derive from the study of our aesthetic 
and moral experiences is information about our own men- 



118 



■ 



tal and physical make-up. We take note of these experi- 
ences as providing data for our psychological and socio- 
logical generalizations. And this is the only way in which 
they serve to increase our knowledge- It follows that any 
attempt to make our use of ethical and aesthetic concepts 
the basis of a metaphysical theory concerning the exis- 
tence of a world of .values, as distinct from the world of 
facts, involves a false analysis of these concepts. Our own 
analysis has shown that the phenomena of moral experi- 
ence cannot fairly be used To support any rationalist or 
metaphysical doctrine whatsoever. In particular, they can- 
not, as Kant hoped, be used to established the existence of a 
transcendent god. 

This mention of God brings us to the question of the 
possibility of religious knowledge. We shall see that this 
possibility has already been ruled out by our treatment of 
metaphysics. But, as this is a point of considerable interest, 
we may be permitted to discuss it at some length. 

It is now generally admitted, at any rate by philoso- 
phers, that the existence of a being having the attributes 
which define the god of any non-animistic religion cannot 
be demonstratively proved. To see that this is so, we have 
only to ask ourselves what are the premises from which 
the existence of such a god could be deduced. If the con- 
clusion that a god exists is to be demonstratively certain, 
then these premises must be certain; for, as the conclusion 
of a deductive argument is already contained in the pre- 
mises, any uncertainty there may be about the truth of 
the premises is necessarily shared by it. But we know that 
no empirical proposition can ever be anything more than 
probable. It is only a priori propositions that are logic- 
ally certain. But we cannot deduce the existence of a god 
from an a priori proposition. For we know that the rea- 
son why a priori propositions are certain is that they are 
tautologies. And from a set of tautologies nothing but a 

ri9 



■ 



further tautology can be validly deduced. It follows that 
there is no possibility of demonstrating the existence of a 
god. 

What is not so generally recognized is that there can be 
no way of proving that the existence of a god, such as the 
God of Christianity, Is even probable. Yet this also is easily 
shown. For if the existence of such a god were probable, 
then the proposition that he existed would be an empirical 
hypothesis. And in that case it would be possible to deduce 
from it, and other empirical hypotheses, certain experi- 
ential propositions which were not deduclblc from those 
other hypotheses alone. But in fact this is not possible. It 
is sometimes claimed,, indeed, that the existence of a cer- 
tain sort of regularity in nature constitutes sufficient evi- 
dence for the existence of a god. But if the sentence 'God 
exists' entails no more than that certain types of pheno- 
mena occur in certain sequences, then to assert the exis- 
tence of a god will be simply equivalent to asserting that 
there is the requisite regularity in nature; and no religious 
man would admit that this was all he intended to assert 
in asserting the existence of a god. He would say that in 
talking about God he was talking about a transcendent 
being who might be known through certain empirical 
manifestations, but certainly could not be denned in terms 
of those manifestations. But in that case the term 'god' is 
a metaphysical term. And if 'god' is a metaphysical term, 
then it cannot be even probable that a god exists- For to 
say that 'God exists' is to make a metaphysical utterance 
which cannot be either true or false. And by the same cri- 
terion, no sentence which purports to describe the nature 
of a transcendent god can possess any literal significance. 

It is important not to confuse this view of religious as- 
sertions with the view that is adopted by atheists, or ag- 
nostics.* For it is characteristic of an agnostic to hold that 
5. This point was suggested to me by Professor H. H. Price, 

I2.Q 



;: 



the existence of a god is a possibility in which there is 
no good reason either to- believe or disbelieve; and" it is 
characteristic of an atheist to hold that it is at least prob- 
able that no god exists. And our view that all utterances 
about the nature of God are nonsensical, so far from be- 
ing identical with, or even lending any support to, either 
of these familiar contentions, as actually incompatible 
with them. For if the assertion that there is a god is non- 
sensical then the atheist's assertion that there is no god is 
equally nonsensical, since it is only a significant proposi- 
tion that can be significantly contradicted. As for the 
agnostic, although he refrains from saying either that 
there is or that there is not a god, he does not deny that 
the question whether a transcendent god exists is a genuine 
question. He docs not deny that the two sentences 'There 
is a transcendent god' and 'There is no transcendent god' 
express propositions one of which is actually true and the 
other false. All he says is that we have no means of telling 
which of them is true, and therefore ought not to commit 
ourselves to either. But we have seen that the sentences in 
question do not express propositions at all. And this means 
that agnosticism also is ruled out. 

Thus we offer the theist the same comfort as we gave 
to the moralist. His assertions Cannot possibly be valid, 
but they cannot be invalid either. As he says nothing at 
all about the world, he cannot justly be accused of saying 
anything false, or anything for which he has insufficient 
grounds. It is only when the theist claims that in asserting 
the existence of a transcendent god he is expressing a 
genuine proposition that we are entitled to disagree with 
him. 

It is to be remarked that in cases where deities are iden- 
tified with natural objects, assertions concerning them 
may be allowed to be significant, Jf, for example, a man 
tells me that the occurrence of thunder is alone both 



12.L 



necessary 1 and sufficient to establish tlie truth of the proposi- 
tion that Jehovah is angry, 1 may conclude that, in his 
usage of words, the sentence 'Jehovah is angry' is equiva- 
lent to 'It Is thundering.' But in sophisticated religions, 
though they may he to some extent based on men's awe of 
natural processes which they cannot sufficiently understand, 
the 'person' who is supposed to control the empirical 
world is not himself located in it; he is held to be superior 
to the empirical world, and so outside it; and he is en- 
dowed with super-empirical attributes. But the notion of a 
person whose essential attributes are non-empirical is not 
an intelligible notion at all. We may have a word which is 
used as if it named this 'person', but, unless the sentences 
in which It occurs express propositions which are empiri- 
cally verifiable, it cannot be said to symbolize anything. 
And this is the case with Tegard to the word 'god', in the 
usage in which it is intended to refer to a transcendent 
object. The mere existence of the noun is enough to foster 
the illusion that there is a real, or at any rate a possible 
entity corresponding to it. ft is only when we inquire what 
God's attributes are that we discover that 'God', in thts 
usage, is not a genuine name. 

It is common to find belief in a transcendent god con- 
joined with belief in an after-life. But, in the form which 
it usually takes, the content of this belief is not a genuine 
hypothesis. To say that men do not ever die, or that the 
state of death is merely a state of prolonged insensibility, 
is indeed to express a significant proposition, though all 
the available evidence goes to show that it is false. But to 
say that there is something imperceptible inside a man, 
which is his soul or his real self, and that it goes on living 
after he is dead, is to make a metaphysical assertion which 
has no more factual content than the assertion that there 
Is a transcendent god. 

It is worth mentioning that, according to the account 

LZ2 






I 



■■ 



which we have given of religious assertions, there is no 
logical ground lor antagonism between religion and na- 
tural science. As far as the question of truth or falsehood 
is concerned, there is no opposition between the natural 
scientist and the theist who believes in a transcendent 
god. For since the religious utterances of the theist are not 
genuine propositions at all they cannot stand in any logi- 
cal relation to the propositions of science. Such antagon- 
ism as there is between religion and science appears to 
consist in the fact that science takes away one of the mo- 
tives which make men religious. For it is acknowledged 
that one of the ultimate sources of religious feeling lies in 
the inability of men to determine their own destiny; and 
science tends to destroy the feeling of awe with which 
men regard an alien world, by making them believe that 
they can understand and anticipate the course of natural 
phenomena, and even to some extent control St. The fact 
that it has recently become fashionable for physicists 
themselves to be sympathetic towards religion is a point 
in favour of this hypothesis. For this sympathy towards- 
religion marks the physicists' own lack ol confidence in 
the validity of their hypotheses, which is a reaction on 
their part from the anti-religious dogmatism of nineteenth- 
century scientists, and a natural outcome of the crisis 
through which physics has just passed. 

ft is not within the scope of this inquiry to enter more 
deeply into the causes of religious feeling, or to discuss the 
probability of the continuance of religious belief. We are 
concerned only to aiiswer those questions which arise out 
of our discussion of the possibility of religious know- 
ledge. The point which we wish to establish is that there 
cannot be any transcendent truths of religion. FOr the sen- 
tences which the theist uses to express such 'truths' are 

not literally significant. 
An interesting feature of this conclusion is that it 

"3 



accords with what many theists are accustomed to say 
themselves. For we are often told that the nature of God is 
a mystery which transcends the human understanding. But 
to say that something transcends the human understand- 
ing is to say that it is unintelligible. And what is unin- 
telligible cannot significantly be described. Again, we are 
told that God is not an object of icason but an object of 
faith. This may be nothing more than an admission that 
the existence of God must be taken, on trust, since it can- 
not be proved. But it may also be an assertion that God 
is the object of a purely mystical intuition, and cannot 
therefore be defined in terms which are intelligible to the 
reason. And I think, there arc many theists who would 
assert this. But if one allows that it is impossible to define 
God in intelligible terms, then one is allowing that it is 
impossible for a sentence both to be significant and to he 
about God. If a mystic admits that the object of his vision 
is something which cannot be described, then he must 
also admit that he is bound to talk nonsense when he 
describes it. 

For his part, the mystic may protest that his intuition 
does reveal truths to him, even though he cannot explain 
to others what these truths are; and that we who do not 
possess this faculty of intuition can have no ground 
for denying that it is a cognitive faculty. For we can 
hardly maintain a priori that there are no ways of dis- 
covering true propositions except those which we our- 
selves employ. The answer is that we set no limit to the 
number of ways in which one may come to formulate a 
true proposition. We do not in any way deny that a syn- 
thetic truth may be discovered by purely intuitive me- 
thods as well as by the rational method of induction. But 
we do say that every synthetic proposition, however it 
may have been arrived at, must be subject to the test of 
actual experience. We do not deny a priori that the mystic 

124 



■ 



■ 



is able to discover truths by his own special methods. We 
wait to hear what arc the propositions which embody his 
discoveries, in order to see whether they are verified ot 
confuted by our empirical observations. But the mystic 
so far from producing propositions which are empirically 
verified, is unable to produce any intelligible propositions 
at all. And therefore we say that his intuition has not re- 
vealed to him any facts. It is no use his saying that he 
has apprehended facts but is unable to express them. For 
we know that if he really had acquired any information, 
he would be able to express it. He would be able to in- 
dicate ia some way or other how the genuineness of his 
discovery might be empirically determined. The fact that 
he cannot reveal what he 'knows', or even himself de- 
vise an empirical test to validate his 'knowledge', shows 
that his state of mystical intuition is not a genuinely cog- 
nitive state- So that in describing his vision the mystic 
does not give us any information about the external world. 
he merely gives us indirect information about the condi- 
tion of his own mind. 

These considerations dispose of the argument from re- 
ligious experience, which many philosophers still regard 
as a valid argument in favour of the existence of a god. 
They say that it is logically possible for men to be im- 
mediately acquainted with God, as they are immediately 
acquainted with a sense-content, and that there is no rea- 
son why one should be prepared to believe a man when 
he says that he is seeing a yellow patch, and refuse to be- 
lieve him he says that he is seeing God. The answer to this 
js that if the man who asserts that he is seeing God is 
merely asserting that he is experiencing a peculiar kind of 
sense-content, then we do not for a moment deny that bis 
assertion may be true. But, ordinarily, the man who says 
that he is seeing God is saying not merely that he is ex- 
periencing a religious emotion, but also that there exists 

125 



a transcendent being who is the: object of this emotion; 
just as the man who says that he sees a yellow patch is 
ordinarily saying not merely that his visual sense-field con- 
tains a yellow sense-content, but also that there exists a 
yellow object to which the sense-content belongs. And it is 
not irrational to be prepared to believe a man when he 
asserts the existence of a yellow object, and to refuse to 
believe him when he asserts the existence of a transcen- 
dent god. For whereas the sentence 'There exists here a 
yellow-coloured material thing' expresses a genuine syn- 
thetic proposition which could be empirically verified, the 
sentence 'There exists a transcendent god* has, as we have 
seen, no literal significance. 

We conclude, therefore, that the argument from, reli- 
gious experience is altogether fallacious. The fact that 
people have religious experiences is interesting from the 
psychological point of view, but it docs not in any way 
imply that there is such a thing as religious knowledge, 
any more than our having mora! experiences implies that 
there is such a thing as moral "knowledge. The theist, like 
the moralist, may believe that his experiences are cogni- 
tive experiences, but, unless he can formulate his 'know- 
ledge* in propositions that are empirically verifiable, we 
may be sure that he is deceiving himself. It follows that 
those philosophers who fill their books with assertions that 
they intuitively 'know' this or that moral or religious 
'truth* are merely providing material for the psycho- 
analyst. For no act of intuition can be said to reveal a 
truth about any matter of fact unless it issues m verifiable 
propositions. And all such propositions are to be incor- 
porated! in the system of empirical propositions which con- 
stitutes science. 



126 



CHAPTER 7 
THE SELF AND THE COMMON WORLD 



It is customary for the authors o£ cpistemological treat- 
ises to assume that our empirical knowledge must have a 
basis of certainty, and that there must therefore be objects 
whose existence is logically indubitable. And they believe 
for the most part, that it is their business, not merely to 
describe these objects, which they regard as being imme- 
diately 'given' to- us, but also to provide a logical proof 
of the existence of objects which are not so 'given'. For 
they think that without such a proof the greater part of 
our so-called empirical knowledge will lack the certifica- 
tion which it logically requires. 

To those who have followed the argument of this book 
it will, however, be clear that these familiar assumptions 
are mistaken- For we have seen that our claims to empiri- 
cal knowledge are not susceptible of a logical* but only of 
a pragmatic, justification. It Is futile, and therefore illegi- 
timate, to demand an a priori proof of the existence of 
objects which are not immediately 'given'. For, unless 
they are metaphysical objects, the occurrence of certain 
sense-experiences will itself constitute the Only proof of 
their existence which is requisite or obtainable; and the 
question whether the appropriate sense-€xperieaces do or 
do not occur in the relevant circumstances is one that 
must be decided in actual practice, and not by any a priori. 
argumentation. We have already applied these considera- 
tions to the so-called problem of perception, and we shall 
shortly be applying them also to the traditional 'prob- 
lems' of our knowledge of our own existence, and of the 
existence of other people, In the case of the problem of 
perception, we found that in order to avoid metaphysics 

127 



we were obliged to adopt a phenomcnalist standpoint, and 
wc shall find that the same treatment must be accorded 
to the other problems to which we have just now referred. 

We have seen, furthermore, that there are no objects 
whose existence is indubitable. For, since existence is not 
a predicate, to assert that an object exists is always to as- 
sert a synthetic proposition.; and it has been shown that 
no synthetic propositions are logically sacrosanct. AH of 
them, including the propositions which describe the con- 
tent of our sensations, are hypotheses which, however 
great their probability, we may eventually find it expedient 
to abandon. And this means that our empirics! knowledge 
cannot. have a basts of logical certainty. It follows, in- 
deed, from the definition of a synthetic proposition that 
it cannot be either proved or disproved by formal logic. 
The man who denies such a proposition may be acting 
irrationally, by contemporary standards of rationality, but 
he is not necessarily contradicting himself. And we know 
that the only propositions that are certain are those which 
cannot be denied without self-contradiction, inasmuch as 
they arc tautologies. 

It must not be thought that in denying that.our empiri- 
cal knowledge has & basis of certainty we are denying that 
any objects are really 'given*. For to say that an object is 
immediately 'given' is to say merely that it is the content 
of a sense-experience, and we are very far from maintain- 
ing that our sense-experiences have no real content, or even 
that their content is in any way indescribable. All that we 
are maintaining in this connexion is that any description 
of the content of any sense-experience is an empirical 
hypothesis of whose validity there can be no guarantee. 
And this is by no means equivalent to maintaining that 
no such hypothesis can actually be valid. We shall not, 
indeed, attempt to formulate any such hypotheses our- 
selves, because the discussion of psychological questions is 

128 



1 









out of place in a philosophical inquiry; and we have al- 
ready made it clear that our empiricism is not logically 
dependent on an atomistic psychology, such as Hume and 
Mach adopted, but is compatible with any theory what- 
soever concerning the actual characteristics of our sen- 
sory fields. For the empiricist doctrine to which we axe 
committed is a logical doctrine concerning the distinction 
between analytic propositions, synthetic propositions, and 
metaphysical verbiage; and as such it has no bearing on 
any psychological question of fact. 

It is not possible, however, to set aside all the questions 
which philosophers have raised in connexion with the 
'given* as being psychological in character, and SO out- 
side the scope of this inquiry. In particular, it is impos- 
sible to deal in this way with the question whether sense- 
contents are mental or physical, or with the question, 
whether they are in any sense private to a single self, or 
with the question whether they can exist without being 
experienced. For none of these three questions is capable 
of being solved by an empirical test- They must, if they 
are soluble at all. be soluble a priori. And as they are all 
questions which have given rise to much dispute among 
philosophers, we shall in fact attempt to provide for each 
of them a definitive a priori solution. 

To begin with, we must make it clear that we do not 
accept the realist analysis of our sensations in terms of 
subject, act, and object. For neither the existence of the 
substance which is supposed to perform the so-called act 
of sensing nor the existence of the act itself, as an entity 
distinct from the sense-contents on which it is supposed 

to be directed, is in the least capable of being verified. We 
do not deny, indeed, that a given sense-content can legi- 
timately be said to be experienced by a particular subject; 
bat we shall see that this relation of being experienced by 
a particular subject is to be analysed in terms of the 






■ 4 






129 



relationship of sense-contents to one another, and not in 
terms of a substantival ego asd its mysterious acts * ^ c " 
cordingly we define a sense-content not as the object, but 
as a part of a sense-experience. And from this it follows 
that the existence of a sense-content always entails the 
existence of a sense-experience. 

It is necessary, at this point, to remark that when one 
says that a sense-experience, or a sensc^ontent, exists, one 
is making a different type of statement from that which 
one makes when one says that a materia! thing exists. For 
the existence Of a material thing is denned in terms of the 
actual and possible occurrence of the sense-contents which 
constitute it as a logical construction, and one cannot sig- 
nificantly speak of a sense-experience, which is a whole 
composed of sense-contents, or of a sense*content itself as 
if it were a logical construction out of sense-contents. And 
in fact when we say that a given sense<ontent or sense- 
experience exists, we are saying no more than that it oc- 
curs. And, accordingly, it seems advisable always to speak 
of the "occurrence' of sense-contents and sense-experiences 
in preference to speaking of their 'existence', and so to 
avoid the danger of treating sense-contents as if they -were 
material things. 

The answer to the question whether sense-contents are 
mental or physical is that they are neither; or rather, that 
the distinction between what is mental and what is physi- 
cal does not apply to sense-contents. It applies only to ob- 
jects which are logical constructions out of them. But 
what differentiates one such logical construction from an- 
other is the fact that it is constituted by different sense- 
contents or by sense-contents differently related. So that 
when we distinguish a given mental object from a given 
physical object, or a mental object from another mental 
object, or a physical object from another physical object, 
we are in every case distinguishing between different log* 

130 



! 



cal constructions whose elements cannot themselves be 
said to be either mental or physical. It is, indeed, t\ot im- 
possible for a sense-content to be an element both of a 
mental and of a physical object; but it is necessary that 
some of the elements, or some of the relations, should be 
different in the two logical constructions. And it may be 
advisable here to repeat that, when we refer to an object 
as a logical construction out of certain sense-con«nts, we 
arc not saying that it is actually constructed out of those 
sense -contents, or that the sense-contents are in any way 
parts of it, but are merely expressing, in a convenient, if 
somewhat misleading, fashion, the syntactical fact that 
all sentences referring to it are translatable into sentences 
referring to them. 

The fact that the distinction between mind and matter 
applies only to logical constructions and that all dis- 
tinctions between logical constructions are reducible to 
distinctions between sense-contents, proves that the differ- 
ence between the entire class of mental objects and the 
entire class of physical objects is not in any sense more 
fundamental than the difference between any two sub- 
classes of mental objects, or the difference between any 
two sub-classes of physical objects. Actually, the distin- 
guishing feature of the objects belonging to the category 
of 'one's own mental states* is the fact that they arc 
mainly constituted, by 'introspective* sense- contents and 
by sense-contents which are elements of one's own body; 
and the distinguishing feature of the objects belonging to 
the category of the ' mental states of others' is the fact that 
they are mainly constituted by sense-contents which are 
elements of other living bodies; and what makes one unite 
these two classes of objects to form the single class of 
mental objects is the fact that there is a high degree of 
qualitative similarity between many of the sense-contents 
which are elements of other living bodies and many of 

"3i 



the elements of one's own. But we are not now concerned 
with the provision of an exact definition of 'mentality'. 
We arc interested only in making it plain that the distinc- 
tion between mind and matter, applying as it does to logi- 
cal constructions out of sense-contents, cannot apply to 
sense-contents themselves. For a distinction between logi- 
cal constructions which is constituted by the fact that 
there are certain distinctions between their elements is 
clearly of a different type from any distinction that can 
obtain between the elements. 

It should be clear, also, that there is no philosophical 
problem concerning the relationship of mind and matter, 
other than the linguistic problems of defining certain sym- 
bols which denote logical constructions in terms of sym- 
bols which denote sense-contents. The problems with 
which philosophers have vexed themselves in the past, con- 
cerning the possibility of bridging the 'gulf between mind 
and matter in knowledge or in action, are all fictitious 
problems arising out of the senseless metaphysical con- 
ception of mind and matter, or minds and material things, 
as 'substances'. Being freed from metaphysics, we see that 
there can be no a priori objections to the existence either 
of causal or of epistemologieal connexions between minds 
and material things. For, roughly speaking, all that we are 
saying when we say that the mental state of a person A at 
a time t is a state of awareness of a material thing X, is 
that the sense-experience which is the element of A occur- 
ring at time t contains a sense-content which is an element 
of X, and also certain images which define A's expectation 
of the occurrence in suitable circumstances of certain fur- 
ther elements of X, and that this expectation is correct : 
and what we are saying when we assert that a mental ob- 
ject M and a physical object X are causally connected is 
that, in certain conditions, the occurrence of a certain sort 
of sense-content, which is an element of M, is a reliable 

132 



- 



of the occurrence of a certain sort of sense-content, 
which is an element of X, or vice versa, and the question 
whether any propositions of these kinds are true or not is 
clearly an empirical question. It cannot be decided, as 
metaphysicians have attempted to decide it, a priori. 

We turn now to consider the question of the subjecti- 
vity of sense-contents - that is, to consider whether it is 
or is not logically possible for a sense-content to occur 
in the sense-history of more than a single self. And in or- 
der to decide this: question we must proceed to give an 
analysis of the notion of a self. 

The problem which now confronts us is analogous to 
the problem of perception with which we have already 
dealt. We know that a self, if it is not to be treated as a 
metaphysical entity, must be held to be a logical construe- 
tion out of sense-experiences. It is, in fact, a logical con- 
struction out of the sense-experiences which constitute 
the actual and possible sense-history of a self. And, ac- 
cordingly, if we ask what is the nature of the self, we 
are asking what is the relationship that must obtain be- 
tween sense-experiences for them to belong to the sense- 
history of the same self. And the answer to this question is 
that for any two sense-experiences to belong to the sense- 
history of the same self it is necessary and sufficient that 
they should contain organic sense-contents which are ele- 
ments of the same body. 1 But, as it is logically impossible 
for any organic sense-content to be an element of more 
than one body, the relation of 'belonging to the sense- 
history of the same self turns out to be a symmetrical 
and transitive relation. 8 And, from the fact that the rela- 
tion of belonging to the sense-history of the same self is 

i. This is not the only criterion; Vide The Foundations of Pmpfrt- 
cal Knowledge, pp. -H2-4. 

1. For a definition of a symmetrical transitive relation, see Chap- 
ter 3. p, 8S. 

133 



7 



symmetrical and transitive, it follows necessarily that the 
Series of sense-experiences which constitute the sense- 
histories of different selves cannot have any members in 
common. And this is tantamount to saying that it is logi- 
cally impossible for a sense-experience to belong to the 
sense-history of more than a single self But if all sense- 
experiences are subjective, then, all sense-contents are sub- 
jective. For it is necessary by definition for a sense-content 
to be contained in a single sense-experience. 

To many people, the account of the self, on which this 
conclusion depends, will no doubt appear paradoxical. For 
it js still fashionable to regard the self as a substance. But, 
when one comes to inquire into the nature of this sub- 
stance, one finds that it is an entirely unobservablc entity. 
It may be suggested that it is revealed in self-consciousness 
but this is not the case. For all that is involved in self- 
consciousness is the ability of a self to remember some of 
its earlier states. And to say that a self A is able to remem- 
ber some of its earlier states Is to say merely that some of 
the sense-experiences which constitute A contain memory 
images which correspond to sense-contents which have 
previously occurred in the sense-history of A.* And thus 
we find that the possibility of self-consciousness in no 
way involves the existence of a substantive ego. But if the 
substantive ego is not revealed in self-consciousness, it is 
-Tot revealed anywhere, the existence of such an entity 
is completely unverifiable. And accordingly, we must 
conclude that the assumption of its existence is no less meta- 
physical than Locke's discredited assumption of the ex- 
istence of a material substratum. For it is clearly no more 
significant to assert that an 'unobservablc somewhat' 
underlies the sensations which are the sole empiri- 
cal manifestations of the self than it is to assert that an 
'unobservable somewhat' underlies the sensations which 
35. cf. Beitraad Kuwcll, Analysis ot Mind, Lecture IX. 

134 



are the sole empirical manifestations of a material thing. 
The considerations which make it necessary, as Berkeley 
saw, to give a phenomenalEst account of material things, 
make it necessary, also, as Berkeley did not see, to give a 
phenomena list account of the self. 

Our reasoning on this point, as on so many others, is in 
conformity with Hume's. He, too, rejected the notion of a 
substantive ego on the ground that no such entity was ob- 
servable. For, he said, whenever he entered most intima- 
tely into what he called himself, he always stumbled on 
some particular perception or other — of heat or cold, 
light or shade, love or hatred, pain or pleasure, He never 
could catch himself at any time without a perception, and 
never could observe anything but the perception* And 
this led him to assert that a self was 'nothing but a bundle 
or collection of different perceptions'. 4 But. having asser- 
ted this, he found himself unable to discover the principle 
on which innumerable distinct perceptions among which 
it was impossible to perceive any 'real connexion' were 
united to form a single self. He saw that the memory must 
be regarded not as producing, but rather as discovering, 
personal identity ~ or. in other words, that whereas self- 
consciousness has to be defined in terms of memory, self- 
identity cannot be; for the number of my perceptions: 
which I can remember at any time always falls far short 
of the number of those which have actually occurred in 
my history, and those which 1 cannot remember are no 
less constitutive of my self than those which I can. But 
having, on this ground, rejected the claim of memory to 
be the unifying principle of the self. Hume was obliged to 
confess that he did not know what was the connexion be- 
tween perceptions in virtue of which they formed a single 
self* And this confession has often been taken by ration- 

4. Treatise of Human Nature, Book I.PartlV.scctioavi. 
f. Treatise of Human Nature. Apjwndix. 

*35 



alist authors as evidence that it is impossible for a consis- 
tent empiricist to give a satisfactory account of the self. 

For our part, we have shown that this charge against 
empiricism is unfounded. For we have solved Hume's 
problem by defining personal identity in terms of bodily 
identity, and bodily identity is to be defined in terms of 
the resemblance and continuity of sense-contents. And 
this procedure is justified by the fact that whereas it is 
permissible, in our language, to speak of a man as surviv- 
ing a complete loss of memory, or a complete change of 
character, it is self-contradictory to speak of a man as 
surviving the annihilation of his body.' For that which is 
supposed to survive by those who look forward to a 'life 
after death' is not the empirical seLf, but a metaphysical 
entity - the soul. And this metaphysical entity, concern- 
ing which no genuine hypothesis can be formulated, has 
no logical connexion whatsoever with the self. 

It must, however, be remarked that, although we have 
vindicated Hume's contention that it is necessary to give a 
phenomenalist account of the nature of the self, our ac- 
tual definition of the self is not a mere restatement of his. 
For we do not hold, as he apparently did. that the self is 
an aggregate of sense-experiences, or that the sense- 
experiences which consitute a particular self are in any 
sense parts of it. What we hold is that the self is reducible 
to sens&experiences, in the sense that to say anything 
about the self is always to say something about sense- 
experiences; and our definition of personal identity is in- 
tended to show how this reduction could be made, 

In thus combining a thoroughgoing phenomenalism 
with the admission that all sense-experiences, and the 
sense-contents which form part of them, are private to a 
single self, we are pursuing a course to which the follow- 

&. This is not Urut if one adopts a psychological criterion of 
sonal identity. 






ing objection is likely to be raised. It will be said that 
anyone who maintains both that all empirical knowledge 
resolves itself on analysis into knowledge of the relation- 
ships of sense •contents, and also that the whole of a man's 
sense-history is private to himself, is logically obliged to 
be a solipsist - that is, to hold that no other people besides 
himself exist, or at any rate that there is no good reason to 
suppose that any other people beside himself exist. For it 
follows from his premises, so it will be argued, that the 
sense-experiences of another person cannot possibly form 
part of his own experience, and consequently that he can- 
not have the slightest ground for believing in their occur- 
rence; and, in that case, if people are nothing but logical 
constructions out of their sense-experiences, he cannot 
have the slightest ground for believing in the existence of 
any other people. And it will be said that even if such a 
solipsistk doctrine cannot be shown to be self-contradic- 
tory, it is nevertheless known to be false. 7 

1 propose to meet this objection, not by denying that 
solipsism is know to be false, but by denying that it is a 
necessary consequence of our epistcmology. I am, indeed, 
prepared to admit that if the personality of others was 
something that I could not possibly observe, then 1 should 
have no reason to believe in the existence of anyone else. 
And in admitting this 1 am conceding a point which would 
not, F think, be conceded by the majority of those philo- 
sophers who hold, as we do, that a sense-content cannot 
belong to the sense-history of more than a single self. They 
would maintain, on the contrary, that, although one can 
not in any sense observe the existence of other people, one 
can nevertheless infer their existence with a high degree 
of probability from one's Own, experiences. They would 
say that my observation of a body whose behaviour re- 
sembled the behaviour of my own body entitled me to 
•j. cf. L S. Stebbins. Logical Positivism aiui Analysis. 

137 



think it probable- that that body was related to a self which 
I could not observe, in the same way as my body was re- 
lated to my own observable self. And in saying this, they 
would be attempting to answer not the psychological ques- 
tion, What causes me to believe in the existence of other 
people? but the logical question. What good reason have I 
for believing in the existence of other people ? So that their 
view cannot be refuted, as is sometimes supposed, by an 
argument which shows that infants come by their belief 
in the existence of other people intuitively, and not 
through a process of inference. For although my belief In 
a certain proposition may in fact be causally dependent 
on my apprehension of the evidence which makes the be- 
lief rational, it is not necessary that it should be. It is not 
self-contradictory to say that beliefs for which there are 
rational grounds are frequently arrived at by irrational 
means. 

The correct way to refute this view that I can use an 
argument from analogy, based on the fact that there is a 
perceptible resemblance between the behaviour of other 
bodies and that of my own, to Justify a belief in the exis- 
tence of other people whose experiences I couJd not con- 
ceivably observe, is to point out that no argument can 
render probable a completely unverifiable hypothesis, t 
can legitimately use an argument from analogy to estab- 
lish the probable existence of an object which has never 
in fact manifested itself in my experience, provided that 
the object is such that it could conceivably be manifested 
in my experience. If this condition is not fulfilled, then, 
as far as 1 am concerned, the object is a metaphysical 
object, and the assertion that it exists and has certain pro- 
perties is a metaphysical assertion. And. since a metaphysi- 
cal assertion K senseless, no argument can possibly render 
it probable. But. on the view which we are discussing, I 
must regard other people as metaphysical objects; for it is 

138 



assumed that their experiences are completely inaccessible 
to my observation. 

The conclusion to be drawn from this is not that the 
existence of other people is for me a metaphysical, and so 
fictitious, hypothesis, but that the assumption that other 
people's experiences are completely inaccessible to my ob- 
servation is false; just as the conclusion to be drawn from 
the fact that Locke's notion of a material substratum is 
metaphysical is not that all the assertions which we make 
about material things are nonsensical, but that Locke's 
analysis of the concept of a material thing is false. And 
just as I must define material things and my own self in 
terms of their empirical manifestations, so I must define 
other people in terms of their empirical manifestations - 
that is, in terms of the behaviour of their bodies, and ulti- 
mately in terms of sense-con tents. The assumption that 
'behind' these sense-contents there arc entities which are 
not even in principle accessible to my observation can 
have no more significance for me than the admittedly meta- 
physical assumption that such entities 'underlie' the sense- 
contents which constitute material things for me, or my 
own self. And thus I find that I have as good a reason to 
believe in the existence of other people as I have to be- 
lieve in the existence of material things. For in each case 
my hypothesis is verified by the occurrence in my sense- 
history of the appropriate series of sense-contents. 8 

It must not be thought that this reduction of other 
people's experiences to one's own in any way involves a 
denial of their reality. Each of us must define the experi- 
ences of the others in terms of what he can at least in 
principle observe, but this does not mean that each of us 
must regard all the others as so many robots. On the 

8. cf. Rudolf Carnap, 'SchcinproWcnic in der Philosophic; das 
Fremdpsy-tfiJschc und dcr Realkmussureit', and 'Psych-o-logie id 
pkyslkaUschcr Sprache*, Erkenntiris, Vol. HI, iojz. 

139 



contrary, the distinction between a conscious man and an 
unconscious machine resolves itself into a distinction be- 
tween different types of perceptible behaviour. The only 
ground I can have for asserting that an object which ap- 
pears to be a conscious being is not really a conscious 
being, but only a dummy or a machine, is that it fails to 
satisfy one of the empirical tests by which the presence 
or absence of consciousness is determined. If 1 know that 
an object behaves tn every way as a conscious being must, 
by definition, behave, thin I know that it is really con* 
scious. And this is an analytical proposition. For when I 
assert that an object is conscious I am asserting no more 
than that it would, in response to any conceivable test, 
exhibit the empirical manifestations of consciousness. I 
am not making a metaphysical postulate concerning the 
occurrence of events which I could not, even in principle, 
observe. 

It appears, then, that the fact that a man's sense- 
experiences are private to himself, inasmuch as: each of 
them contains an organic sense-content which bdongs to 
his body and to no other, is perfectly compatible with 
his having #>od reason to believe in the existence of other 
men. For, if he is to avoid metaphysics, he must define the 
existence of other men in terms of the actual and hypo- 
thetical occurrence of certain sense<antents. and then the 
fact that the requisite sense-contents do occur in his sense- 
history gives him a £ood reason for believing that there 
are other conscious beings besides himself. And thus we 
see that the philosophical problem of 'our knowledge of 
other people' is not the insoluble, and. indeed, fictitious, 
problem of establishing by argument the existence of en- 
tities which are altogether unobservable r but is simply the 
problem of indicating the Way in which a certain type of 
hypothesis is empirically verified.' 

9. This question is referred to in the Introduction, pp. HS- 

140 






It must be made clear, finally, that our phenomenalism 
is compatible not merely with the fact that each of us has 
good reason io believe that there exist a number of con- 
scious beings of the same kind as himself, but also with 
the fact that each of us has good reason to believe that 
these beings communicate with one another and with 
him, and inhabit a common world. For it might appear, 
at first sight, as if the view that all synthetic propositions 
ultimately referred to sense-contents, coupled with the 
view that no sense-content could belong to the sense- 
history of more than one person, implied that no one could 
have any good reason to believe that a synthetic proposi- 
tion ever had the same literal meaning for any other per- 
son as it had for himself. That is. it might be thought that 
if each person's experiences were private to himself, no 
one oould have good reason to believe that any other per- 
son's experiences were qualitatively the same as his own, 
and consequently that no one could have good reason to 
believe that the propositions which he understood, refer- 
ring as they did to the contents of his own sense-experiences, 
were ever understood in the same way by anybody 
else. 3 " But this reasoning would be fallacious. It does not 
follow from the fact that each man's experiences arc pri- 
vate to himself that no one ever has good reason to believe 
that another man's experiences are qualitatively the same 
as his Own. For we dtfiite th« qualitative identity and dif- 
ference of two people's sense-experiences in terms of the 
similarity and dissimilarity of their reactions to empirical 
tests. To determine, for instance, whether two people have 
the same colour sense we observe whether they classify all 
the colour expanses with which they are confronted in 
the same way; and. when we say that a man is colour- 

19. T*hi* argument is used "by Professor L. S. Stubbing in her article 
<in 'CctiWEnuhicatiott .and Verification'., Supplementary Proceedings 
til 111* Ari*e© uli<m Society 4 195+ 

141 






blind, what we are asserting is that he classifies certain 
colour expanses in a different way from that in which 
they would be classified by the majority of people, ft may 
be objected that the fact that two people classify oolour 
expanses in the same way proves only that their colour 
worlds have the same structure, and not that they have 
the same content; that it is possible for another man to 
assent to every proposition which I make about colours 
on the basis of entirely different colour sensations, al- 
though, since the difference is systematic, neither of us is 
ever in a position to detect it. But the answer to this is 
that each of us has to define the content of another man's 
sense-experiences in terms of what he can himself observe* 
If he regards the experiences of cithers as essentially un- 
observable entities, whose nature has somehow to be in- 
ferred from the subjects' perceptible behaviour, then, as 
we have seen, even the proposition that there are other 
conscious beings becomes for him a metaphysical hypo- 
thesis. Accordingly, it is a mistake to draw a distinction 
between the structure and the content of people's sensa- 
tions - such as that the structure alone is accessible to the 
observation of others, the content inaccessible. For if the 
contents of other people's sensations really were inacces- 
sible to my observation, then I could never say anything 
about them. But. in fact, I do make significant statements 
about them; and that is because I define them, and the rela- 
tions between them, in terms of what I can myself ob- 
serve. 

fn the same way, each of us has good reason to suppose 
that other people understand him, and that he understands 
them, because he observes that his utterances have the 
effect on their actions which he regards as appropriate, 
and that they also regard as appropriate the effect which 
their utterances have on his actions; and mutual under- 
standing is de&ned in terms of such harmony of behaviour. 

142 






And, since to assert that two people inhabit a c<hm»o» 
world is to assert that they are capable, at least in prin- 
ciple, of understanding one another, it follows that each 
of us, although his sense-experiences are private to him- 
self, has good reason to believe that he and other conscious 
beings inhabit a common world. For each o£ us observes 
the behaviour, on the part of himself and others, which 
constitutes the requisite understanding- And there is noth- 
ing in oar epistemolo^y which involves a denial of this 
fact. 



143 



CHAPTER 8 

SOLUTIONS OF OUTSTANDING 
PHILOSOPHICAL DISPUTES 

One of the main objects of this treatise has "been to show 
that there is nothing in the nature of philosophy to war- 
rant the existence of conflicting philosophical parties or 
'schools'. For it is only when the available evidence is 
insufficient to determine the probability of a proposition, 
that a difference of opinion concerning it is justifiable. 
But with regard to the propositions of philosophy this can 
never be the case. For, as we have seen, the function of 
the philosopher is not to devise speculative theories 
which require to be validated in experience, but to elicit 
the consequences: of our linguistic usages. That is to say, 
the questions with which philosophy is concerned are 
purely logical questions; and although people do in fact 
dispute about logical questions, such disputes are always 
unwarranted. For they involve cither the denial of a pro- 
position which is necessarily true, or the assertion of a 
proposition which is necessarily false. In all such cases, 
therefore, we may be sure that one party to the dispute has 
been guilty of a miscalculation which a sufficiently close 
scrutiny of the reasoning will enable us to detect. So that 
if the dispute is not immediately resolved, it is because 
the logical error of which one party is guilty is too subtle 
to he easily detected, and not because the question at issue 
is irresolubte on the available evidence. 

Accordingly, we who are interested in the condition of 
philosophy can no longer acquiesce in the existence of 
party divisions among philosophers. For we know that if 
the questions about which the parties contend arc logical 
in. character, they can be definitively answered. And, if 

144. 



they are not logical, they must either be dismissed as 
metaphysical, or made the subject of an empirical inquiry. 
I propose, therefore, to examine in turn the three great 
issues concerning which philosophers have differed in the 
past, to sort out the problems of which these issues con- 
sist, and to provide for each problem a solution appro- 
priate to its nature. It will be found that some of these 
problems have already been dealt with in the course of 
this book, and in such cases we shall be content to recapi- 
tulate our solution without repeating the argument on 
which k was founded. 

The questions which we arc now about to consider are 
those that lie at issue between rationalists and empiricists, 
between realists and idealists, and between monists and 
pluralists. In each case, we shall Snd that the thesis which 
is maintained by one school and controverted by another 
is partly logical, partly metaphysical, and partly empirical, 
and that there is no strict logical connexion between its 
constituent parts; so that it is legitimate to accept some 
portions of it and reject others. And, indeed, we do not 
Claim that for anyone to be accounted a member of a par- 
ticular school it is necessary for him to adhere to all the 
doctrines which we hold to be characteristic of the school, 
but rather that it is sufficient iff he adheres to any of them. 
It is advisable for us to say this in order to protect our- 
selves against a possible charge of historical inaccuracy. 

But it must be understood from the outset that we are not 
concerned to vindicate any one set of philosophers at the 
expense of any other, but simply to settle certain ques- 
tions which have played a part in the history Of philo- 
sophy which is out of all proportion to their difficulty or 
their importance. We shall now begin with the questions 
which enter into the rationalist-empiricist controversy. 



145 



RATIONALISM AND EMPIRICISM 

The metaphysical doctrine which is upheld by rationalists, 
and rejected by empiricists, is that there exists a supra- 
sensible world which is the object of a purely intellectual 
intuition and is alone wholly real. We have already dealt 
with this doctrine explicitly in the course of our attack 
on metaphysics, and seen that it is not even false but sense- 
less. For no empirical observation could have the slightest 
tendency to establish any conclusion concerning the pro- 
perties, or cyen the existence, of a supra-sensible world. 
And therefore we are entitled to deny the possibility of 
such a world and to dismiss as nonsensical the descrip- 
tions which have been given of it. 

With the logical aspect of the rationalist-empiricist 
controversy we have also dealt very fully, and pronoun- 
ced, it will be remembered, in favour of the empiricists. 
For we showed that a proposition only had factual con- 
tent if at was empirically verifiable, and, consequently, 
that the rationalists were mistaken in supposing that there 
could be a priori propositions which referred to matters 
of fact. At the same time we disagreed with those empiri- 
cists who maintain that the distinction which is ordin- 
arily drawn between a priori propositions and empirical 
propositions is an illegitimate distinction, and that all sig- 
nificant propositions are empirical hypotheses, whose 
truth may be in the highest degree probable but can never 
be certain. We admitted that there were propositions 
which were necessarily valid apart from all experience, 
and that there was a difference in kind between these pro- 
positions and empirical hypotheses. But we did not ac- 
count for their necessity by saying, as a rationalist might, 
that they were speculative 'truths of reason*. We accoun- 
ted for it by saying that they were tautologies. And we 
showed that the fact that we sometimes make mistakes in 

146 



our a priori reasonings, and that even when we have not 
made any mistake we may arrive at an interesting and un- 
expected conclusion, is b no way incompatible with the 
fact that such reasonings are purely analytic. And thus we 
found that OUT rejection Of the logical thesis of rational- 
ism, and of ail forms of metaphysics, did not oblige us to 
den/ that there could be necessary truths. 

An explicit rejection of metaphysics, as distinct from a 
mere abstention from metaphysical utterances, is charac- 
teristic of the type of empiricism which is known, as posi- 
tivism. But we have found ourselves unable to accept the 

Criterion which the positiyists employ to distinguish a 

metaphysical utterance from a genuine synthetic proposi- 
tion. For they require of a synthetic proposition that it 
should, in principle at least, be conclusively verifiable. And 
as, for reasons which, we have already given, no proposi- 
tion is capable, even in principle, of being verified 
conclusively, but only at best of being rendered highly 

probable, the positivist criterion, so far from marking the 
distinction between literal sense and nonsense, as it is in- 
tended to do, makes every utterance nonsensical. And 
therefore, as we have seen, it is necessary to adopt a weak- 
ened form of the positivist verification principle, as a 
criterion of literal significance, and to allow a proposition 
to be genuinely factual if any empirical observations 
would be relevant to its truth or falsehood. So that an ut- 
terance is by us accounted metaphysical only if it is 
neither a tautology nor yet capable of being substantiated 
to any degree whatsoever by any possible observation. In 
practice, indeed, very little of what is allowed to be signi- 
ficant by this criterion would not be allowed also by the 
positivists. But that is because they do not apply their own 
criterion consistently. 

ft should "be added that we dissent also from the positi- 
vist doctrine with regard to the significance of particular 

H7 






symbols. For it is characteristic of a positivist to hold that 
all symbols, other than logical constants, must either 
themselves stand for sense-contents or «lse be explicitly- 
definable in terms of symbols which stand for sense- 
contents. It is plain that such physical symbols as 'atom' or 
'molecule' or 'electron* fail to satisfy this condition, and 
some positivists, including Mach, have been prepared on 
this account to regard the use of them as illegitimate. 1 
They would not have been so ruthless if they had realized 
that they ought also, if they were to be consistent in the 
application of their criterion, to have condemned the use 
of symbols which stand for material things. For, as we 
have seen, even such familiar symbols as 'table* or "chair* 
or 'coat' cannot be defined explicitly in terms of symbols 
which stand for sense-contents, but only in use. And, ac- 
cordingly, we must allow that the employment of a sym- 
bol is legitimate if it is possible, at any rate in principle, 
to give a rule for translating the sentences in which, it oc- 
curs into .sentences which refer to sensc<ontents - or, in 
other words, if it is possib3e to indicate how the proposi- 
tions which it helps to express may be empirically sub- 
stantiated. And this condition is as well satisfied by the 
physical symbols which positivists have condemned as by 
the symbols which stand for familiar material things. 

finally, it must again be emphasized that we are not 
committed by our logical thesis to any of the factual doc- 
trines which haye been propounded by empiricist authors. 
We have, indeed, already expressed our dissent from the 
psychological atomism of Mach and Hume; and we may 
add that, although we agree in the main with Hume's epis- 
temotogical views concerning the Validity of general pro- 
positions of law, we do not accept his account of the way 
in which such propositions actually come to be forntula- 

J. See Hans Hahn. 'Logik. Mathematik und NaturekennenV 
Einheluwissenscbott, Heft II, for a discussion of this question, 

148 



.1 



ted. We do not hold, as be apparently did, that every gen- 
eral hypothesis is, in fact, a generalization from a number 
of observed instances, Wc agree with the rationalists that 
the process by which scientific theories come into being is 
often deductive rather than inductive. The scientist does 
not formulate his laws only as the result of seeing them 
exemplified in particular cases. Sometimes he considers 
the possibility of the law before he is in possession of the 
evidence which justifies it. It 'occurs' to him that a cer- 
tain hypothesis or set of hypotheses may be true* He em- 
ploys deductive reasoning to discover what he ought to 
experience in a given situation if the hypothesis is true; 
and if he makes the required observations, or has reason to 
believe that he could make them, he accepts the hypothe- 
sis. He does not, as Hume implied, passively wait for na- 
ture to instruct him; rather, as Kant saw, does he force 
nature to answer the questions which he puts to her, So 
that there is a sense in which the rationalists are right in 
asserting that the mind is active in knowledge, jt is not 
true, indeed, that the validity of a proposition 3s ever logic- 
ally dependent upon the mental attitude of anyone to- 
wards it, nor is it true that every physical fact is either 
logically or causally dependent upon a mental fact, nor 
yet that observation of a physic*! object necessarily causes 
any change in it, although it may in fact do so in some 
cases. But it is true that the activity of theorizing is, in 
its subjective aspect, a creative activity, and that the psy- 
chological theories of empiricists concerning 'the origins 
of our knowledge' are vitiated by their failure to take this 
Into account. 

But while it must be recognized that scientific laws are 
often -discovered through a process of intuition, this does 
not mean that they can be intuitively validated. As we 
have said many times already, it is essential to distinguish 
the psychological question. How does our knowledge 

149 



originate? from the logical question. How is it certified as 
knowledge ? Whatever may be the correct answers to these 
Two questions, it is clear that they are logically in- 
dependent of one another. And, accordingly, we can 
consistently allow that the psychological theories of ra- 
tionalists concerning the part played by intuition in the 
acquisition of our knowledge are very probably true, 

While at the same time we reject as self-contradictory their 
logical thesis that there are synthetic propositions of 
whose validity we have an a priori guarantee. 

REALISM AND IDEALISM 

Whereas the main points in. the dispute between ration- 
alists and empiricists, of which we have now finally dis- 
posed, have been referred to constantly throughout this 
book, comparatively little attention has yet been paid to 
the realist-idealist controversy, which, to the historian of 
modern philosophy at any rate, is almost equally import- 
ant. All that we have done so far in connexion with it is 
to rule out its metaphysical aspect, and to assert that the 
logical questions which it involves are questions concern- 
ing the analysis of existential propositions. Wc have seen 
that the dispute between idealists and realists becomes a 
metaphysical dispute when it is assumed that the ques- 
tion whether an. object is real or ideal is an empirical ques- 
tion which cannot be settled by any possible observation. 
We showed that in the ordinary sense of the term 'real'., 
the sense in which 'being real' is opposed to 'being illu- 
sory', there were definite empirical tests for determining 
whether an object was real or not; but that those who, 
agreeing that an object was real in this sense, went on to 
dispute whether it had a completely undetectable pro- 
perty, which they called also the property of being real, or 
an equally undetectable property of being ideal, were de- 

150 



• 



baling an altogether fictitious question. And to this we 
need not now add anything further, but may proceed at 
once to consider the realist-idealist controversy in its logi- 
cal aspect. 

The logical doctrines which arc maintained by idealists 
and controverted by realists are all concerned with the 

question, What is entailed by sentences of the form 'x 

is real*? Thus, it is the contention of Bcrkcleyan idealists 
that the sentence 'x is real' or 'x exists', where x stands 
for a thing and not for a person, is equivalent to 'x is per- 
ceived', so that it is self-contradictory to assert that any- 
thing exists unperceived; and they hold, furthermore, that 
'x is perceived' entails *x is mental', and so conclude that 

everything that exists is mental. Both these propositions 
are denied by realists, who maintain for their part that 
the concept of reality is unanalysable, so that there is no 
sentence referring to perceptions which is equivalent to 
the sentence 'x is real*. In fact, we shall find that the realists 
are right in what they deny, but wrong an what they affirnu 
Briefiy, the grounds on. which Berkeley held that no ma- 
terial thing could exjjt unperccived were these. He main- 
tained, first, that a thing was nothing more than the sum 
of its sensible qualities, and, secondly, that it was self- 
contradictory to assert that a sensible quality existed tin- 
sensed. And from these premises it docs follow that a thing 
cannot without self-contradiction be said to exist unper- 
ceived. But since he recognized that the common-sense 
assumption that things did exist 'when no human being 

was perceiving them was certainty not self-contradictory. 
and, indeed, himself believed it to be true, Berkeley allowed 
that a thing might exist unperccived by any human being, 
inasmuch as it could still be perceived by Cod. And he 
appears to have regarded the fact that he was obliged to 
rely on the perceptions of God to brin.g his doctrine into 
harmony with the fact that things very prohaWy do exist 

rsi 



1 



at times when no human "being is perceiving them as con- 
stituting a proof of the existence of a personal god: 
whereas, in truth, what it proves is that there is an error 
in Berkeley's reasoning. For, since propositions which as- 
sert the existence of material things have an undisputed 
factual significance, it cannot be correct to analyse them 
in terms of such metaphysical entities as the perceptions 

of a transcendent god* 

Wc must now consider exactly where the error in Ber- 
keley's reasoning lies. It is customary for realists to deny 
his proposition that a sensible quality cannot possibly 
exist unsensed. Taking him, I think rightly, to be using 
the terms 'sensible quality* and 'idea of .sensation*, as 
we have been using the term 'sense-content', to refer to 
an entity which is sensibly given, they assert that he makes 
a faulty analysis of sensation through failing to distin- 
guish between the object sensed and the act of conscious- 
ness which is directed upon it, and that there is no con- 
tradiction involved in supposing that the object may exist 
independently of the act.* But I do not think that this 
criticism is just- For these acts of sensing, which realists 
reproach Berkeley for having ignored, appear to mc to be 
completely inaccessible to any observation. And I sug- 
gest that those who believe in them have been misled by 
the grammatical fact that the sentences which they use to 
describe their sensations contain a transitive verb, just 
zs those who believe that the self is given in sensation are 
misled by the fact that the sentences which people use 
to describe their sensations contain a grammatical sub- 
ject: while what those who claim to detect the presence 
of such acts of sensing in their visual and tactual experi- 
ences are, I think, really detecting is the fact that their 
visual and tactual sense-fields have the sensible property of 

3. Vide G. E. Moore, Thihsapbical Studies, 'The. Refutation of 
Idealism'. 

152 



* 
* 



depth.* And. therefore, although Berkeley made a psycho- 
logical error in supposing that the succession of 'Ideas* 
which constituted a person's sense-history was sensibly 
discrete, I believe that he was right to regard these 'ideas' 
as the contents rather than the objects of sensations, and 
consequently that he was justified in asserting that a 'sen- 
sible quality' could not conceivably exist unsensed. Ac- 
cordingly we may allow that his dictum, 'Esse est pep- 
dpi*, is true with regard to sense-contents, for to speak of 
the existence of sense-contents is, as we have seen, merely 
a misleading way of speaking of their occurrence, and a 
sense-content cannot without self-contradiction be said to 
occur except as part of a sense-experience. 

But although it is a fact that a sense-content cannot by 
definition occur without being experienced, and that ma- 
terial things are constituted by sense-contents, it is a mis- 
take to conclude, as Berkeley did, that a material thing 
cannot exist unperceived. And the mistake is due to his 
misconception of the relationship between material things 
and the sense-contents which constitute them. If a ma- 
terial thing were really the sum of its 'sensible qualities' 
- that is to say, an aggregate of sense-contents, or even a 
whole composed of sense-contents - then it would follow 
from the definitions of a materia! thing and a sense-content 
that no thing could exist unperceived. But, in fact, we have 
seen that sense-contents are not in any way parts of the 
material things which they constitute; the sense in whkh 
a material thing is reducible to sense-contents is simply 
that it is a logical construction and they are its elements; 
and this, as we have previously made clear, is a linguistic 
proposition which states that to say anything about it is 
always equivalent to saying something about them. More- 
over the elements of any given material thing are not 

3. This point is m»d< also by Rudolf Camap in Dct Iogische Aat* 
ban det WVrr, section 65. 

15$ 



merely actual but also possible sense-contents - that Is to 
say, the sentences referring to sense-contents, which are 
the translations of the sentences referring to 5 material 

thing, need not necessarily express categorical proposi- 
tions; they may be hypothetical. And this explains how it 
Is possible for a material thing to exist throughout a pe- 
riod when none of its elements are actually experienced : 
it is sufficient that they should be capable of being experi- 
enced - that is, that there should be a hypothetical fact to 
the effect that, if certain conditions were fulfilled, certain 
sense-contente, belonging to the thing in question, would 
be experienced. There is, indeed, no contradiction in- 
volved in asserting the existence of a material thing which 
is never actually perceived. For in asserting that the thing 
existed, one would be asserting only that certain sense- 
contents would occur if a particular set of conditions 
relating to the faculties and the position of ah observer 
was fulfilled; and such a hypothetical proposition may 
very weli be true, even though the relevant conditions 
never are fulfilled. And, as we shall show later on, we may 
in some cases not merely have to recognize the existence 
of an unperceived material thing as a logical possibility, 
but may actually possess good inductive grounds for be- 
lieving in it- 

This analysis of propositions asserting the existence of 
material things, which is in conformity with Mills con- 
ception Of a materia! thing as 'a permanent possibility of 
sensation', enables us not merely to dispense with the 
perceptions of God r but also to allow that people can be 
said to exist in the same sense as material things. It is, i 
think, a serious defect in Berkeley's theory that it does 
not allow this. For, failing to give the phcnomenalist ac- 
count of the self which, as Hume saw, his empiricism de- 
manded* he found, himself unable either to hold that the 
existence of people consisted, like the existence of rna- 

IS4 



terial things, in their being perceived, or to put forward 
any other analysis of it. We, on the contrary, maintain 
that a man must define his own existence, ami the exis- 
tence of other people, no less than that of material things, 
in terms of the hypothetical occurrence of sense-contents. 
And I think we have succeeded in proving the necessity 
of such a thproughgojiig phenomenalism, and in meeting 
the objections to which it seems at first sight to be ex* 
posed. 

The proposition that whatever is perceived is neces- 
sarily mental, which forms the second stage in the argu- 
ment of the Berkcleyan idealist, rests on the assumption 
that the immediate data of sense are necessarily mental, 
together with the assumption that a thing is literally the 
sum of its 'sensible qualities'. And these are both assump- 
tions which we have rejected. We have seen that a thing 
is to be defined, not as a collection of sense-contents, but 
as a logical construction out of them. And we have seen 
that the terms 'mental' and 'physical* apply only to logi- 
cal constructions* and not to the immediate data of sense 
themselves. Sense-contents themselves cannot significantly 
he said either to be or not to be mental. And while it is 
certainly significant to assert that all the things which we 
Ordinarily take to be unconscious are really conscious, we 
sha31 find that this is a proposition! which we have very 
good reason to disbelieve. 

I think that the idealist view that what is immediately 
given in sense-expericnee must necessarily be mental de- 
rives historically from an error of Descartes. For he, be- 
lieving that he could deduce his own existence from the 
existence of a mental entity, a thought, without assum- 
ing the existence of any physical entity, concluded that 
his mind was a substance which was wholly independent 
of anything physical; so that it could directly experience 
only what belonged to itself. We have already seen that 

"55 



1 



the premise of this argument is false; and. in any case, the 
conclusion does not follow from it. For, in the first place, 
the assertion that the mind is a substance, being a meta- 
physical assertion, cannot fellow from anything. Se- 
condly, if the term ^thought' is used, as Descartes 
apparently used it. to refer to a single introspective sense- 
content, then a thought cannot, as in the ordinary usage, 
properly be said to be mental. And, finally, even if it were 
true that the existence of a conscious being could be 
validly deduced from an isolated mental datum, it would. 
not in the least follow that such a being could not, in fact, 
stand in direct causal and epistcmological relations to ma- 
terial things. And, indeed, we have previously shown that 
the proposition that mind and matter are completely in- 
dependent is one which we have good empirical grounds 
for disbelieving, and one which no a priori argument coultf 
possibly serve to prove. 

Although the responsibility for the view that it is pos- 
sible to experience directly only what is menial rests ulti- 
mately with Descartes, subsequent philosophers have sup- 
ported it with arguments of their own. One of these is the 

so-called argument from illusion. This argument proceeds 
from the fact that the sensible appearances of a material 
thing vary with the point of view of the observer, or with 
his physical and psychological condition, or with the na- 
ture of the attendant circumstances such as the presence 
or absence of light. Each of these appearances is, it is ar- 
gued, in itself as 'good" as any other, but, since they are 
in many cases mutually incompatible, they cannot all 
really characterize the material thing; and thence it is con- 
cluded that none of them are 'in the thing', but that they 
are all 'in the mind*. But this conclusion is plainly un- 
warranted. All that this argument from illusion proves is 
that the relationship of a sense-content to the material 
thing to which it belongs is not that of part to whole. It 

r56 



does not hare the least tendency to show that any sense- 
content is 'in the mind*. Nor does the fact that a scnse- 
coitfent is partly dependent for its quality on the psycho- 
logical state of an observer in any way go to prove that it 
is a mental entity itself. 

Another argument of Berkeley's is superficially more 
plausible, tie points out that sensations of all kinds are in 
some degree pleasant or painful, and argues that, as the 
sensation is not phenomenally distinguishable from the 
pleasure or the pain, the two must be identified. But plea- 
sure and pain, he thinks, are indubitably mental, and so 
he concludes that the objects of sense are mental* The 
error in this argument consists in the identification of 
pleasures and pains with particular sense-contents. It is 
true that the word 'pain' is sometimes used to denote an 
organic sense-content, as £n the sentence, ■] feel a pain in 
my shoulder', but in this usage a pain cannot properly be 
said to be mental; and it is noteworthy that there is no 
corresponding usage of the word 'pleasure'. And in the 
usage in which pains and pleasures can properly be said 
to be mental, as in the sentence, 'Domitian took pleasure 
in torturing /lies', the terms denote, not sensecontents, 
but logical constructions. For to refer to pains and plea- 
sures, in this usage, is a way of referring to people's be- 
haviour, and so ultimately to sense-contents, which are 
themselves, as always, neither mental nor physical. 

It is characteristic of some idealists, who are not Ber- 
keleyans, to hold that 'x is real', where x stands for a 
thing and not fox a person, is equivalent to 4 x is thought 
of*, so that it is self-contradictory to hold that anythiag 
exists unthought of, or that anytJiing which is thought of 
is unreal. In support of the first of these consequences, it 
is argued that if [ make any judgement whatsoever about 
a thing I must necessarily 1* thinking of it. But while it 
-t . Vide The First Dialogue between Hylas and Philoaous. 

*57 



is true that the sentence 'I judge that x exists' entails *x 
is thought of", it does not follow from this that it is self- 
contradictory to assert that anything unthought of exists. 
For the sentence 'J judge that x exists' is "plainly not 

equivalent to 'X exists', nor docs it entail it, nor is it en- 
tailed by it. 1 may very well judge that a thing exists which 
in fact docs not exist, and a thing may very well exist 
without my judging that it does, or, indeed, without 
anybody's judging that it does, or without anybody's ever 

thinking of it. It is true that the fact that I assert thai a 
thing exists shows that I am thinking of it, or have 
thought of it, but this does not mean that part of what I 
assert when I say that a thing exists is that I am thinking 
of it. It is essential here to distinguish between that of 
which the occurrence of a sentence is in fact evidence, 
and that which the sentence formally entails. Having 
made this distinction we can see that there is no formal 
contradiction involved in asserting that things which are 
unthought of exist. 

The view that whatever is thought of must necessarily 
be real is not confined to idealists. It depends, as Moore 
has shown, 5 upon the mistaken assumption that such a 
sentence as 'Unicorns are thought of is of the same logi- 
cal form as 'Lions are killed'. 'Lions are killed" does 
indeed entail 'lions are real'; and so £t is supposed that 'uni- 
corns arc thought of must analogously entail 'unicorns are 
real". But, in fact, 'being thought of is not an attribute 
like 'being killed', and there is, accordingly, no contra- 
diction involved in asserting that such things 2s uni- 
corns, or centaurs, although they are thought of, do not 
actually exist- The realist view that such imaginary ob- 
jects 'have real being', even though they do not exiss, 
has already been shown to be metaphysical, and need not 
be further discussed. 

5 .Pfai/otopluc^St«d»>j,' , IneCoaccptionof Reality'^ 

158 



It may be added that even If it were true that *« is real' 
was equivalent to 'x is thought oP, which we have shown 
not to be the case, the idealists' belief that everything that 
exists is mental would not thereby be justified. For 'x is 
mental' is not entailed by "x is thought of, any more 
than by 'x is perceived '. Nor does this proposition that 
everything that exists is mental appear capable of being 
substantiated in any other way. For the fact that 'x is real' 
does not formally entail 'x is mental' proves that it is not 
an a prion truth. And white it is logically possible that all 
the things, such as houses and pens and books, which we 
believe to be unconscious are really conscious, It is highly 
improbable. For these things have never yet been observed 
to behave in the way which is characteristic of conscious 
beings. Chairs do not show any signs of purposive activity, 
nor do clothes appear to be sensitive to pain. And, in gen- 
eral, there is no empirical ground for supposing that what 
we ordinarily take to be material things are all conscious 
beings in disguise. 

There remains still to be considered one empirical ques- 
tion which is a subject of controversy between realists and 
idealists. We have seen that the realists are justified in 
maintaining that it is not self-contradictory to assert that a 
thing exists unperccived; and we must now consider 
whether they have the right to maintain also that things 
do so exist In fact. Against them it has been argued that, 
even if things do in fact continue to exist when no one is 
perceiving them, we cannot have any good reason to 
suppose that they do.' For it is plainly impossible for any- 
one ever to observe a thing existing unobserved. But this 
argument is plausible only so long as the notion of un- 
perceived existence is left unanalysed. As soon as we ana* 
lyse it, we find that there can be a good inductive ground 
for believing that a thing exists unperceived. For what we 

6.cf.W.Stace, 'The Refutation of Realism', Mfof, 1934, 

159 






1 



arc asserting when we say of a thing that it exists although 
no one is perceiving it is, as we have seen, that certain 
sense-contents would occur if certain conditions relating 
mainly to the faculties and position of an observer were 
fulfilled, but that in fact the conditions are not being ful- 
filled, And these are propositions which we do frequently 
have good reason to believe. For instance, the fact that I 
am now experiencing a series of sense-contents which be? 
long to a table, a chair, and other material things, and that 
in similar circumstances 1 always have perceived these ma- 
terial things, and also remarked that other human beings 
perceived them, gives me a good inductive basis for the 
generalization that in such circumstances these material 
things always are perceptible - a hypothesis whose vali- 
dity is independent of the fact that at a given moment no 
one may actually be in a position to perceive them. Hav- 
ing now left my room, 1 have good reason to believe that 
these things are not in fact being perceived by anyone. For 
I observed that no one was there when I left, and I have 
observed that no one has since entered by the door or the 
window; and my past observations of the ways in which 
human beings make their entry into rooms gives me the 
right to assert that no one has entered the room in any 
other way. In addition, ray past observations of the way 
in which material things come to be destroyed support 
my belief that if I were now in my room I should not be 
perceiving any such process of destruction. And thus, hav» 
ing shown that I may simultaneously have good reason 
to believe that no one is perceiving certain material things 
in my room, and also that if anyone were in my room 
he would be perceiving them, I have shown that it is pos- 
sible to have good inductive grounds for believing that a 
material thing exists unperceivctL 

We have mentioned, also, that there may be good in- 
ductive grounds for believing in the existence of things 

too 



which have never at any lime been, perceived. And this, 
too, can easily be shown with the help- of an example. 
Suppose that flowers have been observed to grow at a cer- 
tain altitude on all the mountains of a given range which 
have ever been climbed; and suppose that there is one 

mountain in the range which appears to be exactly like 
the others but happens never to have been climbed; in such 
a case we may infer by analogy that if anyone were to 
climb this mountain he would perceive flowers growing 
there also. And this is to say that we -are entitled to re- 
gard it as probable that flowers do exist there, although 
they are never in fact perceived. 

MONISM AND PLURALISM 

Having dealt with the various aspects of the rcaJkt-ideilist 
controversy, we come finally to treat of the dispute be- 
tween monists and pluralists. We have, indeed, already 
remarked that the assertion that Reality is One, which it 
is characteristic of a monist to make and a pluralist to 
controvert, is nonsensical, since no empirical situation 
could have any hearing on its truth. But this metaphysical 
assertion is apt to be the outcome of certain logical er- 
rors which it is desirable to examine. And this we shall 
now proceed to do. 

The line of argument whiqh most monists pursue is 
this: everything in the world, they say. is related to every- 
thing else in some way or other: a proposition which for 
them is a tautology since they regard otherness as being 
a relation. And, further, they hold that every relation is 
internal to its terms. A thing is what it is, they declare, 
because it has the properties which it has. That is, all its 
properties, including all its relational properties, are con- 
stitutive of its essential nature. If it is deprived of any 
one of its properties, then, they say. it ceases to be the 



1 



same thing. And from these premises it is deduced that 
to state any fact about a thing involves stating every fact 
about it, and that this involves stating every fact about 
everything. And this is tantamount to saving that any true 
proposition can be deduced from any other, from which it 
follows that any two sentences which express true pro- 
positions are equivalent. And this leads mOnists, Who arc 

given to using the words 'truth' and 'reality' interchange- 
ably, to make the metaphysical assertion that Reality is 
One. 

It should be added that it is admitted even by monists 
that the sentences which people actually use to express 
propositions that they believe to be true are not all equiva- 
lent to one another. But they regard this fact, not as throw- 
ing any doubt on their conclusion that every true proposi- 
tion can be deduced from every other, but as showing that 
none of the propositions which anyone ever believes are 
in fact true. They say, indeed, that, while it is impossible 
for human beings ever to express wholly true proposi- 
tions, they can, and do. express propositions which have 
a varying degree of truth. But what precisely they mean 
by this, and how they reconcile it with their premises, 1 
have never yet been able to understand. 

Clearly, the crucial step in the monist's argument, 
which leads him to such paradoxical conclusions, is the 
assumption that all the properties of a thing, including all 
its relational properties, are constitutive of its nature. And 
this assumption has only to be stated clearly and un- 
ambiguously for its falsity to become apparent. In the 
form in which we have stated it so far, which is the form 
in which it is commonly stated, it is not. indeed, un- 
ambiguous. For to speak of the nature of a thing may 
simply be a way of referring to the behaviour which is 
characteristic of it - as in the sentence "It is in the nature 
of a cat to catch mice.' But it may also, as we have seen, 

162 



be a way of referring to the definition of a thing - as in 
the sentence 'It is in the nature of an a priori proposition 
to be independent of experience.' So that the words 'all 
the properties of a thing are constitutive of its nature' 
may legitimately be used to express either the proposition 
that all the properties of a thing are relevant to its be- 
haviour, or else the proposition that all the properties of a 
thing are defining properties of it. And it is not easy to tell 
from the writings of monists which of these propositions 
they wish to maintain. Sometimes, indeed, they seem to 
uphold bothy without drawing a very clear distinction be- 
tween them. But it is plain that it must be the second that 
they employ in the argument which we are now consider- 
ing, whether they are aware of it or not- For even if it 
were true, which it is not, that it was necessary to take 
all the properties of a thing into account in order to pre- 
dict its behaviour, it would not follow that every fact 
about the thing was logically Reducible from every other. 
Whereas this conclusion does follow from the proposition 
that all the properties of a thing belong to it by definition. 
For, in that case, to assert that the thing exists at ail is 
implicitly to assert every fact about it. But we know that 
to ascribe to a thing a property which belongs to it by 
definition is to express an analytic proposition, a tauto- 
logy. And thus the assumption that all the properties of a 
thing arc constitutive of its nature leads, in this usage, to 
the absurd consequence that it is impossible, *yen in prin- 
ciple, to express a synthetic fact about anything. And I 
regard this as being sufficient to show that the assump- 
tion is false. 

What makes this false assumption superficially plausible 

is the ambiguity of such sentences as "If this thing had not 
got the properties which it has, it would not be what it 
is.' To assert this may be to assert merely that if a thing 
has a property, it cannot also lack it - that if, for example. 



my newspaper is on the tabic In front of me, it is not the 
case that it is not on the table. And this is an analytic pro- 
position whose validity no one would dispute. But to al- 
low this is not to allow that all the properties which a 
thing has are defining properties. To say that if my news- 
paper were not on the tabic in front of me it would not 
be what it is, is false if it is equivalent to saying that it is 
necessary for my newspaper to be on the table in the sense 
in which it is necessary for it to contain news. For where- 
as the proposition that my newspaper contains news is 
analytic, the proposition that it is on the table in front of 
me is synthetic. It Is self -contradictory to assert that my 
newspaper does not contain news, but it is not self-contra- 
dictory to assert that my newspaper in not on the table in 
front of me, although it happens to be false And it is only 

when 'A has not p' is a self -contradictory proposition that 
p can be said to be a defining, or internal, property of A. 

la discussing this question, we have employed the fac- 
tual terminology in which it is commonly presented, but 
this has not prevented us from recognizing that it is lin- 
guistic in character. For we have seen that to say that a 
property p is a defining property of a thing A is equivalent 
to saying that the sentence which is formed out of the 
symbol "A" as subject and the symbol *p' as predicate 
expresses an analytic proposition.' And it must be added 
that the use of factual terminology is particularly inad- 
visable in this instance, because a predicate which serves 
to express an analytic proposition when combined with 
one descriptive phrase may serve to express a synthetic 
proposition when combined with another descriptive 

7* The passage which follows, down to the end of the paragraph, 
was incorporated also in a paper on 'lDtern-a| Relations" which 
was reatf at the rajs joint session of Mind Association and Aristo- 
telian Society. See the SuppiemeoWry Pio&ettiass ol the Aiiao- 
Uikm Society, 1935. 

264 



phrase which nevertheless refers to the same object. Thus 

to have written Hamlet is an internal property of the au- 
thor of Hamlet, tut not of the author of Macbeth, nor yet 
of Shakespeare. For it is self-contradictory to say that the 
author of Hamlet -did not write Hamlet, but it is not self- 
contradictory, although it is false, to say that the author 
of Macbeth did not write Hamlet, or that Shakespeare did 
not write Hamlet. If we use the current factual termino- 
logy and say that it was logically necessary for the author 
of Hamlet to have written Hamlet, but not for Shakes- 
peare or the author of Macbeth, or that Shakespeare and 
the author of Macbeth could conceivably have existed 
without writing Hamlet but the author of Hamlet could 
not, or that Shakespeare and the author of Macbeth would 
still have been themselves if they had not written Hamlet 
but the author of Hamlet would not, we should appear in 
each case to be contradicting ourselves; for we allow that 
the author of Hamlet is the same person as Shakespeare 
and as the author of Macbeth, But when it is recognized 
that these are simply ways of saying that 'the author of 
Hamlet wrote Hamlet' is an analytic proposition, where- 
as 'Shakespeare wrote Hamlet' and 'the author of Maty 
beth wrote Hamlet' are synthetic, the appearance of self- 
contradiction is completely removed. 

With this we conclude our examination of the logical 
errors which give rise to the metaphysical doctrine of 
monism. But we must stall mention that it is characteris- 
tic of a monist to affirm, and of a pluralist to deny, not 
Only that every fact is logically contained in every other, 
but also that every event is causally connected with every 
other. There are some, indeed, who would say that the 
latter proposition could be derived from the former, on 
the ground that causality was itself a logical relation. But 
this would be a mistake. For if causality were a logical 
relation, then the contradictory of every true proposition 

165 



which asserted a causal connexion would be self-con- 
tradictory. But it is allowed even by those who maintain 
that causality is a logical relation that propositions which 
assert the existence either of general or of particular causal 
connexions arc synthetic. In Hume's phraseology, they 
are propositions: concerning matters of fact. And we have 
Shown that the validity of such propositions cannot be 
established a priori as Hume himself made clear. 'It im- 
plies no contradiction,' he says, 'that the course of nature 
may change, and that an object, seemingly Bice those 
which we bBK experienced, may be attended with dif- 
ferent or contrary effects. May I not clearly and distinctly 
conceive, that a body, falling from the clouds, and which 
in all other respects resembles snow, has yet the taste of 
salt or feeling of fire ? Is there any more intelligible pro- 
position than to affirm, that all the trees will flourish in 
December and January, and decay in May and June 1 Now 
whatever is intelligible, and can be distinctly conceived, 
implies no contradiction, and can never be proved false by 
any demonstrative argument or abstract reasoning a 
priori.'* Here Hume is supporting our contention that it 
is only by experience that the validity of synthetic pro- 
positions can be determined. Propositions which cannot 
be denied without self-contradiction are analytic. And it 
is to the class of synthetic propositions that those which 
assert causal connexion belong. 

We may conclude from this that the monistic doctrine 
that every event is causally connected with every other is 
logically independent of the other monistic doctrine 
which we have examined - that every fact is logically 
contained in every other. We have, indeed, no a priori 
ground either for accepting or for rejecting the doctrine 
that every event is causally connected with every other, 
but there are good empirical grounds for rejecting it, in- 

& Aa Eaquky Concerning Human Understanding, Section jy, 

i«6 



annuel* as it denies the possibility of natural science. For 
it is plain that in making any given prediction we arc able 
to consider only a limited set of data; what we do not 
take into account, we assume that we are entitled to ig- 
nore as irrelevant. I assume, for example, that in order to 
determine whether it will rain tomorrow 1 need not take 
into account the present state of mind of the Emperor of 
Manchukuo. If we were not entitled to make such assump- 
tions, there would be no likelihood of our predictions ever 
being successful, for we should always be ignoring the 
greater part of the relevant data. The fact that our pre- 
dictions arc very often successful gives us reason to be- 
lieve that some at least of our judgements of irrelevance 
arc correct! and So to reject the monistic doctrine which 
denies their legitimacy. 

It is important for us to expose the errors which are 
commonly associated with monism, because there is a 
sense in which we ourselves desire to uphold the unity of 
science, for we maintain that it is a mistake to conceive 
of the various 'special sciences' as portraying different 
'aspects of reality'. We have shown that all empirical 
hypotheses refer ultimately to our sense-contents; They 
all function alike as 'rules for the anticipation of future 
experience*; and it is very seldom the case that, in making 
a particular prediction, we are guided by the hypotheses 
of only one science. What chiefly prevents this unity from 
being recognized at present is the unnecessary multipli- 
city of current scientific terminologies. 1 

9. What is required to put an end to this is tk« fulfilment of 
Leibnitz's hope for a 'Characteristics Universalis', ttf, Ott© N«u- 

rath. 'Eiiiicitswissenschaft uad Psychologic', finiieitswisse'n.sefcgff,, 

Heft 1, and 'Einheit d«r Wisseaschaft ab Aufgabe', ErAenntnfe, 
Band V Heft I. Afco Rudolf Camap, 'Die phyrikalischc Sprache als 
LTniv-cTsaJsprache der Wisseaschaft \ Erktmttnis, Vol. II. 1952, and 
English translation. The VaUy of Science, and 'Die Aufgabe der 
Wissenschaf islogflt ', Elnitef ttwlssinscaafe, Heft 1 El. 

I&7 



For our part we arc concerned to emphasize not so much 
the unity of science as the -unity of philosophy with 
science. With regard to the relationship of philosophy and 
the empirical sciences, we have remarked that philosophy 
does not in any way compete with the sciences. It does 
not malce any speculative assertions which could conflict 
with the speculative assertions «?f science, nor does it pro- 
fess to venture into fields which lie beyond the scope of 
scientific investigation. Only the metaphysician, does that, 
and produces nonsense as a result. And we have also poin- 
ted Out that it is impossible merely by philosophizing to 
determine the validity of a coherent system of scientific 
propositions. For the question whether such a system is 
valid is always a question of empirical fact; and, therefore, 
the propositions of philosophy, since they are purely lin- 
guistic propositions, can have no bearing upon it. Thus the 
philosopher is not, qua philosopher, in a position to assess 
the value of any scientific theory; his function is simply 
to elucidate the theory by defining the symbols which 
occur in it. 

It might be thought that the philosophical elucidation 
of scientific theories was required only for the populariza- 
tion of science, and could not be of much benefit to the 
scientists themselves. But this would be a mistake. One 
has only to consider the importance to contemporary phy- 
sics of Einstein's definition of simultaneity, in order to 
realize how necessary it is for the experimental physicist 
to be furnished with clear and definitive analyses of the 
concepts which he employs. And the need for such analy- 
ses is even greater in the less advanced sciences. For 
example, the failure of psychologists at the present time 
to emancipate themselves from metaphysics, and to co- 
ordinate their inquiries, is principally due to the use of 
symbols such as 'intelligence" or 'empathy' or 'subcon- 
scious self, which are not precisely defined. The theories 

1 68 



5 



of psycho-analysts are particularly full of metaphysical 
elements which a philosophical elucidation of theEr sym- 
bols would remove. It would be the philosopher's business 
to make clear what was the real empirical content of the 
propositions of psycho-analysts, and what was their logi- 
cal relationship to the propositions off behaviourists or 
Gestalt psychologists, a relationship at present obscured 
by unanalysed differences of terminology. And it can 
hardly be disputed that such a work of clarification would 
be favourable, if not essential, to the progress of the 
science as a whole. 

But if science may be said to be blind without philo- 
sophy, it is true also that philosophy is virtually empty 
without science. For while the analysis of our everyday 
language is useful as a means of preventing, or exposing, a 
certain amount of metaphysics, the problems which it 
presents are not of such difficulty or complexity as to 
make it probable that they will remain long unsolved. In- 
deed we have dealt with most of them in the course of 
this book, including the problem of perception, which is 
perhaps the most difficult problem of those which are not 
essentially connected with the language of science; a fact 
which explains why it has played so large a part in the 
history of modern philosophy. What confronts the philo* 
SOpher who finds that our everyday language has been 
sufficiently analysed is the task of clarifying the concepts 
of contemporary science. But for him to be able to achieve 
this, it is essential that he should understand science. If 
he is incapable of understanding the propositions of any 
science, then he is unable to fulfil the philosopher's func- 
tion in the advancement of our knowledge. For he is un- 
able to define the symbols which, most of all, require to 
be made clear. 

It is indeed misleading to draw a sharp distinction, as 
we have been doing, between philosophy and science. 

169 



What we should rather do is to distinguish between the 
speculative and the logical aspects of science, and assert 
that philosophy raust develop into the logic of science. 
That is to say, we distinguish between the activity of for- 
mulating hypotheses, and the activity of displaying the 
logical relationship of these hypotheses and defining the 
symbols which oceur in them, it is of no importance 
whether we call one who is engaged in the latter activity 
a philosopher or a scientist. What we must recognize is 
that it is necessary for a philosopher to become a scien- 
tist, in this sense, if he is to make any substantial con- 
tribution towards the growth of human knowledge. 



1 



170 



APPENDIX 

In the ten years that have passed since language, Truth 
and Logic was first published, 3 have come to see that the 
questions with which it deals are not in all respects so 
simple as it makes them appear; but I still believe that the 
point of view which it expresses is substantially correct 
Being in every sense a young man's book, it was written 
with more passion than most philosophers allow them- 
selves to snow, at any rate in their published work, and 
while this probably helped to secure it a. larger audience 
than it might have had otherwise. 1 think now that much 
of its argument would have been more persuasive if it had 
not been presented in so harsh a form. It would, however, 
be very difficult for me to alter the tone of the book with- 
out extensively re-writing it, and the fact that, for reasons 
not wholly dependent upon its merits, it has achieved 
something of the status of a textbook is, I hope, a sufficient 
justification for reprinting it as it stands. At the same time, 
there are a number of points that seem to me to call for 
some further explanation, and I shall accordingly devote 
the remainder of this new introduction to commenting 
briefly upon them. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF VERIFICATION 

The principle of verification is supposed to furnish a cri- 
terion by which it can be determined whether or not a 
sentence is literally meaningful. A simple way to formu- 
late it would he to say that a sentence had literal meaning 
if and only if the proposition it expressed was cither ana- 
lytic or empirically verifiable. To this, however, it might 
be objected that unless a sentence was literally meaningful 

171 



it wonld not express a proposition; 1 for it is commonly 
assumed that every proposition is either tme or false, and 
to say that a sentence expressed what was either tree or 
false would entail saying that it was literally meaningful. 
Accordingly, if the principle of verification were formula- 
ted in this way, it might be argued not only that it was 
Incomplete as a criterion of meaning, since it would not 
cover the case of sentences which did not express any 
propositions at all, but also that it was otiose, on the 
ground that the question which it was designed to ensure 
must already have been answered before the principle 
could be applied. It will be seen that when I introduce the 
principle in this book 1 try to avoid this difficulty by 
speaking of 'putative propositions' and of the proposition 
which a sentence 'purports to express'; but this device is 
not satisfactory. For, in the first place, the use of words 
like 'putative' and "purports' seems to bring in psychologi- 
cal considerations into which r do not wish to enter, and 
secondly, m the Case where the 'putative proposition' is 
neither analytic nor empirically verifiable, there would, ac- 
cording to this way of speaking, appear to be nothing that 
the sentence in question could properly be said to express. 
But if a sentence expresses nothing there seems to he a 
contradiction in saying that what it expresses is empiric- 
ally unverifiable; for even if the sentence is adjudged on 
this ground to be meaningless, the reference to 'what it ex- 
presses' appears still to imply that something is expressed. 

This is, however, no more than a terminological diffi- 
culty, and there are various ways in which it might be mec 
One of them would be to make the criterion of veriflability 
apply directly to sentences, and so eliminate the reference 
to propositions altogether. This would, indeed, run counter 
to ordinary usage, since one would not normally say of a 

r. Vide M. Lazerowitx, 'The Principle of Veriliability*. Mind, ipj^, 
PP. 372-6. 

172 



sentence, as opposed to a proposition, that it was -capable 
of being verified, or, for that matter, that it was either true 
or fake; but it might be argued that such a departure from 
ordinary usage was justified, if it could be shown to have 
some practical advantage. The fact is. however, that the 
practical advantage seems to lie on the other side. For while 
it as true that the use of the word 'proposition' docs not 
enable us to say anything that wc could not, in principle, 
say without it, it does fulfil an important function; for Et 

makes it possible to express what is valid not merely for a 
particular sentence s but for any sentence to which s is 
logically equivalent, Thus, if I assert, for example, that the 
proposition p is entailed by the proposition ^ I am indeed 
claiming implicitly that the English sentence s which ex- 
presses p can be validly derived from the English sentence 
r which expresses q, but this is not the whole of my claim. 
For, if I am right, it will also follow that any sentence, 
whether of the English or any other language, that is equi- 
valent to s can be validly derived, in the language in ques- 
tion, from any sentence that is equivalent to r; and it is this 
that my use of the word 'proposition* indicates. Admit- 
tedly, we could decide to use the word 'sentence* in the 
way in which we now use the word 'proposition \ but this 
would not he conducive to clarity, particularly as the 
word 'sentence' is already ambiguous. Thus, in a case of 
repetition, it can be said either that there are two different 
sentences or that the same Sentence has been formulated 
twice. It is in the Utter sense that I have so far been using 
the word, but the other usage is equally legitimate. In 
either usage, a sentence which was expressed m English 
would be accounted a different sentence from its French 
equivalent, but this would not hold good for the new usage 
of the word 'sentence' that we should be introducing if 
we substituted "sentence' for 'proposition', For in that 
case we should have to say that the English expression and 

i73 



its French equivalent were different formulations of the 
same sentence. We might indeed be justified in increasing 
the ambiguity of the word 'sentence' in this way if we 
thereby avoided any of the difficulties that have been 
thought to be attached to the use of the word 'proposi- 
tion'; but I do not think that this is to be achieved by the 
mere substitution of one verbal token for another. Accor- 
dingly. I conclude that this technical use of the word 'sen- 
tence', though legitimate in itself, would be likely to 
promote confusion, without securing us any compensa- 
tory advantage. 

A second way of meeting our original difficulty would 
be to extend the use of the word 'proposition', so that 
anything that could properly be called a sentence would 
be said to express a proposition, whether or not the sen- 
tence was literally meaningful. This course would have the 
advantage of simplicity, but it is open to two objections. 
The first is that it would involve a departure from current 
philosophical usage; and the second is that it would oblige 
us to give up the rule that every proposition is to be ac- 
counted either true or false. For while, if we adopted this 
new usage, we should still be able to say that anything 
that was either true or false was a proposition, the con- 
verse would no longer hold good; for a proposition would 
be neither true nor false if it was expressed by a sentence 
which was literally meaningless. I do not myself think 
that these objections are very serious, but they are per- 
haps sufficiently so to make it advisable to solve our ter- 
minological problem in some other wa y. 

The solution that 3 prefer is to introduce a new techni- 
cal term; and for this purpose I shall make use of the fami- 
liar word 'statement', though I shall perhaps be using it 
in a slightly unfamiliar sense. Thus I propose that any 
form of words that is grammatically significant shall be 
held to constitute a sentence, and that every indicative 

"74 



sentence, whether it is literally meaningful or not, shall 
be regarded as expressing a statement. Furthermore, any 
two sentences which are mutually translatable will be said 
to express the same statement. The word 'proposition* on 
the other hand. will be reserved for what is expressed by 
sentences which are literally meaningful. Thus, the class 
of propositions becomes, in this usage, a sub-class of tbe 
class of statements, and one way of describing the use of 
the principle of verification would be to say that it provided 
a means of determining when an indicative sentence ex- 
pressed a proposition, or, in other words, of distinguishing 
the statements that belonged to the class of propositions 

from those that did not. 

It should be remarked that this decision to say that sen- 
tences express statements involves nothing more than the 
adoption of a verbal convention; and the proof of this is 
that the question, 'What do sentences express?' to which 
it provides an answer is not a factual question. To ask of 
any particular sentence what it is that tt expresses may, 
indeed, be to put a factual question; and one way of 
answering it would be to produce another sentence which 
was a translation of the first. But if the general ques- 
tion, 'What do sentences express?' is to be interpreted 
factually, all that can be said in answer is that, since it is 
not the case that all sentences are equivalent there is not 
any one thing that they all express. At the same time, it is 
useful to have a means of referring indefinitely to 'what 
sentences express' in cases where the sentences themselves 
are not particularly specified; and this purpose is served 
by the introduction of the word 'statement" as a technical 
term. Accordingly, in saying that sentences express state- 
ments, we are indicating how this technical term is to be 
understood, but we are not thereby conveying any factual 
Information in the sense in which we should be conveying 
factual iroforrnation if the question we were answering 

175 



was empirical. This may. Indeed, seem a point too ob- 
vious to be worth making; but the question, 'What do 
sentences express?' is closely analogous to the question, 
'What do sentences mean ?* and, as I have tried to show 
elsewhere, 3 the question. 'What do sentences mean?' has 
been a source of confusion to philosophers because they 
have mistakenly thought it to be factual. To- say that in- 
dicative sentences mean propositions is indeed legitimate, 
just as it is legitimate to say that they express statements. 
But what we are doing, in giving answers of this Jdnd, is 
to lay down conventional definitions; and it is important 
that these conventional definitions should not be confused 
with statements of empirical fact, 

Returning now to the principle of verification, we may, 
for the sake of brevity, apply it directly to statements ra- 
ther than to the sentences which express them, and we 
can then reformulate it by saying that a statement is held 
to be literally meaningful if and only if it is either analy- 
tic or empirically verifiable. But what is to be understood 
in this context by the term •verifiable" J I do indeed at- 
tempt to answer this question in the first chapter of thJs 
book; but I have to acknowledge that my answer is not 
very satisfactory. 

To begin with, it will be seen that I distinguish be- 
tween a 'strong' and a 'weak.' sense of the term 'veri- 
fiable', and that I explain this distinction by saying that 
"a proposition is said to be verifiable in the strong sense o£ 
the term, if and only if its truth could be conclusively 
established in experience', but that 'it is verifiable, in the 
weak sense, if it is possible for experience to render it prob- 
able'. And I then give reasons for deciding that it is only 
the weak sense of the term that is required by my prin- 
ciple of verification. What I seem, however, to have over- 
Looked is that, as I represent them, these arc not two 
a. In The Foundations of Empirical Knowledge, pptfj-io* 

176 






genuine alternatives.* For I subsequently go on to argue 
that all empirical propositions are hypotheses which are 
continually subject to the Test of further experience: and 
from this it would follow not merely that the truth of 
any such proposition never was conclusively established 
but thai it never could be; for however strong the evidence 
In its favour, there would never be a point at which it was 
impossible for further experience to go against it. But 
this would mean that my 'strong' sense of the term 
"verifiable' had no possible application, and in that case 
there was no need for me to qualify the other sense of 
"verifiable' as weak; for on my own showing it was the 
only sense in which any proposition could conceivably 

be verified. 

U i do not now draw this conclusion, it is because I 
have come to think that there is a class of empirical pro- 
positions of which it is permissible to say that they can be 
verified conclusively. It is characteristic of these proposi- 
tions, which I have elsewhere' called 'basic propositions', 
that they refer solely to the content of a single experience, 
and what may be said to verify them conclusively is the 
occurrence of the experience to which they uniquely re- 
fer. Furthermore, ! should now agree with those who say 
that propositions of this kind are 'incorrigible', assuming 
that what is meant by their being incorrigible is that it is 
impossible to be mistaken about them except in a verbal 
sense. In a verbal sense, indeed, it is always possible to 
misdescribe one's experience; but if one intends to do no 
more than record what is experienced without relating it 
to anything else, it is not possible to be factually mistaken; 

3, Yidc M, Lazeruwitz, 'Strong and Weak Verification', Mind, 

4. 'Verification and Experience', PnsietJtfings 0/ the Aristotelian 
Society, Vol. XXXVII; cf. also Tht Foundations pf Empirical Know- 
ledge, pp. 8q~4< 

177 



and the reason for this is that one is making no claim that 
any further fact could confute. It is, in short, a case of 
'nothing venture, nothing lose', it is, however, equally a 
case of 'nothing venture, nothing win', since the mere 
recording of one's present experience does not serve to 
convey any information either to any other person or in- 
deed to oneself ; for In knowing a basic proposition to be 
true one obtains no further knowledge than what is al- 
ready afforded by the occurrence of the relevant experi- 
ence, Admittedly, the form of words that is used to express 
a basic proposition may be understood to express some- 
thing that is informative both to another person and to 
oneself, but when it is so understood it no longer expresses 
a basic proposition. It was for this reason, indeed, that I 
maintained, in the fifth chapter of this book, that there 
could not be such things as basic propositions, in the sense 
in which I am now using the term; for the burden of my 
argument was that no synthetic proposition could be 
purely ostensive. My reasoning on this point was not in 
itself incorrect, but ! think that I mistook its purport. 
For I seem not to have perceived that what J was really 
doing was to suggest a motive for refusing to apply the 
term 'proposition ' to statements that "directly recorded 
an immediate experience'; and this is a terminological 
point which is not of any great importance. 

Whether or not one chooses to include basic statements 
in the -class of empirical propositions, and so to admit 
that some empirical propositions can be conclusively 
verified, it will remain true that the vast majority of the 
propositions that people actually express arc neither them- 
selves basic statements, nor deducible from any finite set of 
basic statements. Consequently, if the principle of verifica- 
tion is to be seriously considered as a criterion of meaning, 
it must be interpreted in such a way as to admit statements 
that are not so strongly verifiable as basic statements are 

*7$ 



supposed to be. But how then is the word 'verifiable' to 
be understood? 

It will be seen that, in this book, I begin by suggesting 
that a statement is 'weakly* "verifiable, and therefore mean- 
ingful, according to my criterion, if 'some possible sense- 
experience would, be relevant to the determination of its 
truth or falsehood*. But, as I recognize, this itself requires 
interpretation; for the word 'relevant' is uncomfortably 
vague. Accordingly, 1 put forward a second version of my 
principle, which I shall restate here in slightly different 
terms, using the phrase ' observation-statement ', in place 
of 'experiential proposition', to designate a statement 
'which records an actual or possible observation'. In this 
version, then, the principle Is that a statement is verifiable, 
and consequently meaningful, if some observation-state- 
ment can be deduced from it in conjunction with certain 
other premises, without being deducible from those other 
premises alone. 

I say of this criterion that it 'seems liberal enough', hut 
in fact it is far too liberal, since it allows meaning to any 
statement whatsoever. For, given any statement 'S* and an 
observation-statement 'Q h , 'O' follows from 'S' and 'if 
S then O' without following from 'if S then 0' alone. 
Thus, the statements 'the Absolute is lazy' and 'if the Ab- 
solute is lazy, this is white' jointly entail the observation- 
statement 'this is white', and since 'this is white' does not 
follow from either of these premises, taken by itself, both of 
them satisfy my criterion of meaning. Furthermore, this 
would hold good for any other piece of nonsense that one 
cared to put. as an example, in place of 'the Absolute is 
lazy ', provided only that it had the grammatical form of an 
indicative sentence. But a criterion of meaning that allows 

such latitude as this is evidently unacceptable. 6 

5. Vid l- I. Berlin, 'VerifiabULty in principle', Tnxertinas of lb? 
Aristotelian Society, Vol. XXxIX. 

179 



It may be remarked that the same objection applfes to 
the proposal that we should take the possibility of falsifi- 
cation as our criterion. For, given any statement 4 S' and 
any observation-statement '0', '0' will be incompatible 
with the conjunction of 'S' and "if S then not 0*. We 
could indeed avoid the difficulty, in cither case, by leav- 
ing out the stipulation about the other premises. But as 
this would involve the exclusion of all hypotheticals 
from the class of empirical propositions, we should es- 
cape from making our criteria too liberal only at the cost 
of making them too stringent. 

Another difficulty which I overlooked in my original 
attempt to formulate the principle of verification is that 
most empirical propositions are in some degree vague. 
Thus, as I have remarked elsewhere, - what is required to 
verify a statement about a material thing is never the oc- 
currence of precisely this or precisely that sense-content, 
but only the occurrence of one or other of the sense- 
contents that fall within a fairly indefinite range. We do in- 
deed test any such statement by making observations which 
consist in the occurrence of particular sense-contents; 
tut, for arty test that we actually carry out, there is al- 
ways an indefinite number of other tests, differing to 
some extent in respect either of their conditions or their 
results, that would have served the same purpose. And 
this means that there is never any set of observation- 
statements of which it can truly be said that precisely they 
are entailed by any given statement about a materia! 
thing. 

Nevertheless, it is only by the occurrence of some sense- 
content, and consequently by the truth of some observa- 
tion-statement, that any statement about a material thing 
is actually verified; and from this it follows that every sig- 
nificant statement about a material thing can be reprcsen- 
6. The Foundations of Empirical Knowledge, pp, 240-41. 

180 



ted as entailing a disjunction of observation-statements, 
although the terms of this disjunction, being infinite, can 
not be enumerated in detail. Consequently, 1 do not think 
that we need fee troubled by the difficulty about vagueness. 
so long as it is understood that when we speak of the 'en- 
tailment" of observation-statements, what we are consider- 
ing to be deducitle from the premises in question is not 
any particular observation-statement, but only one or 
other of a set of such statements, what the defining 
characteristic of the set is that all its members refer to 
stnsc-contents that fall within a certain specifiable range. 

There remains the more serious objection that my cri- 
terion, as it stands, allows meaning to any indicative state- 
ment whatsoever. To meet this, 1 shall emend it as follows. 
I propose to say that a statement is directly verifiable if 
it is either itself an observation-statement, or is such that 
in, conjunction with one or more observation-statements 
it entails at least one observation-statement which is not 
deducible from these other premises alone; and I propose 
to say that a statement is indirectly verifiable if it satis- 
fies the following conditions: first, that in conjunction 
with certain other premises it entails one or more directly 
verifiable statements which axe not deducible from these 
other premises alone; and secondly, that these other 
premises do not include any statement that is not either 
analytic, or directly verifiable, or capable of being indepen- 
dently established as indirectly verifiable. And I can now 
reformulate the principle c-f verification as requiring of a 
literally meaningful statement, which is not analytic, that 
it should be either directly or indirectly verifiable, in the 
foregoing sense. 

It may be remarked that in giving my account of the 
conditions in which a statement is to be considered in- 
directly verifiable. I have explicitly put in the proviso that 
the 'other premises' may include analytic statements; and 

t*t 






my reason for doing this is that I intend in this way to 
allow for the case of scientific theories which are ex- 
pressed in terms that do not themselves designate any- 
thing observable. For while the statements that contain 

these terms may not appear to describe anything that any- 
one could ever observe, a 'dictionary' may be provided 
by means of which they can be transformed into state- 
ments that arc verifiable; and the statements which con- 
stitute the dictionary can be regarded as analytic. Were 
this not so, there would be nothing to choose between 
such scientific theories and those that 1 should dismiss 
as metaphysical; but I take it to be characteristic of the 

metaphysician, in my somewhat pejorative sense ©X the 

term, not only that his statements do not describe any- 
thing that is capable, even in principle, of being observed, 

but also that no dictionary js provided by means of whSca 

they can be transformed into statements lhat axe directly 
or indirectly verifiable. 

Metaphysical statements, in my sense of the term, are 
excluded also by the older empiricist principle that no 
statement is literally meaningful unless it describes what 
could be experienced, where the criterion of what could 
be experienced is that it should be something of the same 
kind as actually has been experienced/ But, apart from 
its lack of precision, this empiricist principle has, to my 
mind, the defect of imposing too harsh a condition upon 

7. cf. Bertrand Russell, 7he ttablews of Philosophy, p. 9r: 'Every 
proposition which we wo understand must be composed wholly of 
constitutents with which we ate acquainted.' And, if I understand 
him correctly, this is what Professor W. T. SUcc has in mind when 
he speaks of a 'Principle of Observable Kinds'. Vide his 'Positivism', 
Mind. i«H4' Stace arjpjcs that the principle of verification 'rests 
upon' the principle of observable kinds, but this is a snistakc. It is 
true that every statement that a allowed to be meaningful by the 
principle of observable lands is also allowed to be meaningful by 
the principle of verification : but the converse does not holeL 

r.82 



the form of scientific theories? for it would seem to imply 
that it was illegitimate to introduce any term that did not 
itself designate something observable. The principle of 
verification, on the other hand, is, as i have tried to show, 
more liberal in this respect, and in view of trie use that is 
actually made of scientific theories which the other would 
role out 1 think that the more liberal criterion is to be 
preferred. 

It has sometimes been assumed by my critics that I take 
die principle of verification to imply that no statement 
can be evidence for another unless it is a part of its mean- 
ing; but this is not the case. Thus, to make use of a simple 
illustration, the statement that I have blood on ray coat 
may, in certain circumstances, confirm the hypothesis that 
I have committed a murder, but it is not part of the mean- 
ing of the statement that i have committed a murder that 
I should have blood upon my coat, nor, as I understand it, 
does the principle of verification imply that it is. For one 
statement may be evidence for another, and still neither 
itself express a necessary condition of the truth of this 
other statement, nor belong to any set of statements which 
determines a range within which such a necessary condi- 
tion falls; and it is only in these cases that the principle of 
verification yields the conclusion that the one statement 
is part of the meaning of the other. Thus, from the fact 
that it is only by the making of some observation that 
any statement about a material thing can be directly veri- 
fied it follows, according to the principle of verification, 
that every such statement contains some observation- 
statement or other as part of its meaning, and it follows 
also that, although its generality may prevent any finite set 
of observation-statements from exhausting its meaning, it 
does not contain anything as part of its meaning that can- 
not be represented as an observation-statement; bait there 
may still be many observation-statements that are relevant 

183 



to its truth or falsehood without being part of its meaning 
at all. Again, a person who affirms the existence of a deity 
may try to support his contention by appealing to the facts 
of religious experience; but at does not follow from this 
that the factual meaning of his statement is wholly con- 
tained in the propositions by which these religious experi- 
ences are described- For there may be other empirical facts 
that he would also consider to be relevant; and it is possible 
that the descriptions of these other empirical facts can 
more properly be regarded as containing the factual mean- 
ing of his statement than the descriptions of the religious 
experiences. At the same time, if one accepts the principle 
of verification, one must hold that his statement does not 
have any other factual meaning than what is contained in 
at least some of the relevant empirical propositions; and 
that if it is so interpreted that no possible experience could 
go to verify it, it docs not have any factual meaning at 
all. 

In putting forward the principle of verification as a cri- 
terion of meaning, I do not overlook the fact that the word 
'meaning' is commonly used in a variety of senses, and I 
do not wish to deny that in some of these senses a state- 
ment may properly be said to be meaningful even though 
it is neither analytic nor empirically verifiable. I should, 
however, claim that there was at least one proper use of 
the word 'meaning' in which it would be incorrect to say 
that a statement was meaningful unless it satisfied the 
principle of verification: and I have, perhaps tenden- 
tiously, used the expression 'literal meaning' to distin- 
guish this use from the others, while applying the 
expression 'factual meaning* to the case of statements 
which satisfy my criterion without being analytic. Fur- 
thermore, I suggest that it is only if it is literally meaning- 
ful, in this sense, that a statement can properly be said to 
be either true or false. Thus, while I wish the principle of 

1S4 



verification itself to be regarded, not as an empirical hypo- 
thesis,* but as a definition, it is not supposed to be entirely 
arbitrary. It is indeed open to anyone to adopt a different 
criterion of meaning and so to produce an alternative de- 
finition which may very well correspond to one of the 
ways in, which the word 'meaning' is commonly used. 
And if a statement satisfied such a criterion, there is, no 
doubt, some proper use of the word 'understanding" in 
which it would be capable of being understood. Neverthe- 
less, I think that, unless it satisfied the principle of veri- 
fication, it would not be capable of being understood in 
the sense in which either scientific hypotheses or com- 
mon-sense statements are habitually understood* I confess., 
however, that it now seems to me unlikely that any meta- 
physician would yield to a claim of this kind; and al- 
though I should still defend the use of the criterion of 
Yerifiability as a methodological principle, 1 realize that 
for the effective elimination of metaphysics it needs to be 
supported by detailed analyses of particular metaphysical 
arguments. 

THE 'A PRIORI' 

In saying that the certainty of a priori propositions de- 
pends upon the fact that they are tautologies, I use the 
word 'tautology' in such a way that a proposition can be 
said to be a tautology if it is analytic; and | hold that a 
proposition is analytic if it is true solely in virtue of the 
meaning of its constituent symbols, and cannot therefore 
be either confirmed or refuted by any fact of experience. 
It has, indeed, been suggested 9 that my treatment of d 

8. Both Dr A, C. Ewing, 'Meanlnglessness'. Mind. 1937. PP- 347-64- 
and 5ta cc op. cit., lake it to be an -empirical hypothesis. 

$. e.g. by Pro£e550r C. D. Broad, 'Are Acre Synthetic a priori 

Truths ?\ Supplementary Proceedings of the Aristotelian Society, 
VoLXV. 

185 



priori propositions makes them into a sub-class of empire 
cal propositions. For I sometimes seem to imply that they 
describe the way in which certain symbols are -used, and 
it is undoubtedly an empirical fact that people use symbols 
m the ways that they do. This is not, however, the position 
that I wish to hold; nor do i think that I am committed to 
it. For although I say that the validity of a priori proposi- 
tions depends upon certain facts about verbal usage, I do 
not think that this is equivalent to saying that they de- 
scribe these facts in the SenSe in which empirical proposi- 
tions may describe the facts that verify them; and indeed I 
argue that they do not, in this sense-, describe any facts at 
all. At the same time I allow that the usefulness of a priori 
propositions is founded both on the empirical fact that 
certain symbols are used in the way that they arc and on 
the empirical fact that the symbols in question are success- 
fully applied to our experience; and 1 try in the fourth 
chapter of this book to show how this is so. 

Just as it is a mistake to identify a priori propositions 
with empirical propositions about language, so I now 
think that it is a mistake to say that they are themselves 
linguistic rules.™ For apart from the fact that they can pro- 
perly be said to be true, which linguistic rules cannot 
they are distinguished also by being necessary, whereas lin- 
guistic rules are arbitrary. At the same time, if they are 
necessary it is only because the relevant linguistic rules 
are presupposed. Thus, it is a contingent, empirical fact 
that the word 'earlier' is used in English to mean earlier, 
and it is an arbitrary, though convenient, rule of language 
that words that stand for temporal relations are to be used 
transitively; but, given this rule, the proposition that, if A 

io. This contradicts what I said in my contribution to a sympo- 
sium on 'Truth by Convention', Aitatysis. Vol. 4, Nos. 2 and 3; cf. 
also Norman Malcolm, 'Arc Necessary Propositions really Verbal', 
Wind. 1040, pp. i8$r-2oj. 

18$ 



fe earlier than B and B is earlier than C A is earlier than C 
becomes a necessary truth. Similarly, in Russell's and 
Whitehead's system of logic, it is a contingent, empirical 
fact that the sign V should hare, been given the meaning 
that it has, and the rules winch govern the use of this sign 
are conventions, which themselves 1 are neither true nor 
false; but, given these rules the a priori proposition 
*q* o 4> d q' is necessarily true. Being 4 priori, this pro- 
position gives no information in the ordinary sense in 
which, an empirical proposition may be said to give in- 
formation, nor does it itself prescribe how the logical 
constant V is to be used- What it does is to elucidate 
the proper use of this logical constant; and it is in this way 
that it is informative. 

An argument which has been "brought against the doc- 
trine that a priori propositions of the form 'p entaUs q. 1 are 
analytic is that it is possible for one proposition to entail 
another without containing it as part of its meaning; for 
it is assumed that this would not be possible if the analytic 
view of entailment were correct 11 But the answer to this 
Is that the question whether one proposition is part of the 
meaning of another is ambiguous. If you say, for example, 
as f think most of those who raise this objection would, 
that <i is not part of the meaning of p if it is possible 
to understand p without thinking of q, then clearly one 
proposition can entail another without containing it as 
part of its meaning; for it can hardly be maintained that 
anyone who considers a given Set of propositions must be 
immediately conscious of all that they entail. This is, how- 
«Yer, to make a. point with which I do not think that any 

ii. Vide A. C Ewing, 'The linguistic Theory of a priori Proposi- 
tions', Proceedings oi the Aristotelian Society, 1940; cf. also Pro- 
fessor G. £. Moore, *A Reply to My Critics*, The Thilosophy of G. £. 
Moore, pp. 575-6, and Professor E Nagel's review 01 The ThiJosophy 
Ol G-£-Moore,Mind, 1 jM£. p. 6$. 

187 



upholder of the analytic view of entailment would wish 
to disagree; for it is common ground that deductive rea- 
soning may lead to conclusions which are new in the sense 
that one had not previously apprehended them. But if this 
is admitted by those who say that propositions of the form 
'p entails q' are analytic, how can they also say that it p 
entails q the meaning of q is contained in that of p? The 
answer is that they arc using a criterion of q^snang, 
whether the verification principle or another, from which 
it follows that when one proposition entails another the 
meaning of the second is contained in that of the first. In 
other words, they determine the meaning of a proposition 
by considering what it entails; and this is, to my mind, a 
perfectly legitimate procedure." If this procedure is adop- 
ted the proposition that, if p entails q. the meaning of q 
is contained in that of p. itself becomes analytic; and it 
is therefore not to be refuted by any such psychological 
facts as those on which the critics of this view rely. At 
the same time, it may fairly be objected to it that it does 
not $vc us much information about the nature of entail- 
ment; for although it entitles us to say that the logical 
consequences of a proposition are, explicative of its mean- 
ing, this is only because the meaning of a proposition is 
understood to depend upon what it entails. 



PROPOSITIONS ABOUT THE PAST AND 
ABOUT OTHER MlNDS 

By saying of propositions about the past that they are 
'rules for the prediction of those "historical" experiences 
which are commonly said to verify them* I seem to imply 
that they can somehow be translated into propositions 
about present or future experiences. But this is certainly 

i ?., cf, Norman Malcolm, "The Nature of Entailment', Mind, imo, 
PP. S33-47- 

188 



incorrect- Statements about the past may be verifiable in 
the sense that when they are conjoined with other pre- 
mises of a suitable kind they may entail observation- 
statements which do not follow from these other premises 
alone; but I do not think that the truth of any observation- 
statements which refer to the present or the future is a 
necessary condition of the truth of any statement about 
the pasL This does not mean, however, that propositions 
referring to the past cannot be analysed in phenomenal 
terms; for they can be taken as implying that certain ob- 
servations would have occurred if certain conditions had 
been fulfilled. But the trouble is that these conditions never 
can be fulfilled; for they require of the observer that he 
should occupy a temporal position that ex hypothesi he 
does not. This difficulty, however, is not a peculiarity of 
propositions about the past; for it is true also of unful- 
filled conditionals about the present that their protases 
cannot in fact be satisfied, since they require of the ob- 
server that he should be occupying a different spatial 
position from That which he actually does. But, as I have 
remarked elsewhere, 19 just as it is a contingent fact that a 
person happens at a given moment to be occupying a par- 
ticular position in space, so is it a contingent fact that he 
happens to be living at a particular time. And from this I 
conclude that U On< is justified in saying that events which 
are remote in space are observable, in principle, the same 
may be Said of events which are situated in the past 

Concerning the experiences of others I confess that I am 
doubtful whether the account that is given in this book is 
correct; but I am not convinced that it is not. In another 
work, I have argued that, since it is a contingent fact that 
any particular experience belongs to the series of experi- 
ences which constitutes a given person, rather than to 

13. The Foundwions of Empirical Knowledge, p. 167: cff. also 
Professor G. Ryle. 'Unverifiability by Me', Analysis, Vol 4 No. u 

189 



another series which constitutes someone else, there is a 
sense In which, 'it is not logically inconceivable that I 
should have an experience that is in fact owned by some- 
one else'; and from this I inferred that the use of 'the argu- 
ment from analogy' might after all be justified. 1 * More 
recently, however, I have come to think that this reason- 
ing is very dubious. For while it is possible to imagine 
circumstances in which we might have found it conven- 
ient to say of two different persons that they owned the 

same experience, the fact is that, according to our present 
usage, it is a necessary proposition that they do not; and, 
since this is so, I am afraid that the argument from ana- 
logy remains open to the objections that are brought 
against it in this book. Consequently, J am inclined to re- 
vert to a 'behaviouristtc' interpretation of propositions 
about other people's experiences. But I own that it has 
an air of paradox which prevents me from befog wholly 
confident that it is mi?, 11 



THE EMOTIVE THEORY OF VALUES 

The emotive theory of values, which is developed in the 
sixth chapter of this book, has provoked a fair amount of 
criticism; but I find that this criticism has been directed 
more often against the positivistic principles on which 
the theory has been assumed to depend than against the 
theory itself." Now I do not deny that in putting forward 
this theory 3 was concerned with maintaining the general 
consistency of my position; but it is not the only ethical 

j-i, Thf Foundations of Empirical Knowledge, pp. i rf& 70. 

35* My confidence in it has beta somewhat increased by John 
Wisdom's interesting series of articles on "Other Minds V Mind, 
1940-43. But I am not sure that this is the effect that he intended 
them to produce. 

j& cf. 5ii W- DaYid Ross, The Foundaticn 0/ tihics, pp. 30-42. 

150 



theory that would "have satisfied this requirement, nor does 
it actually entail any of the non-ethical statements which 
form the remainder of ray argument. Consequently, even 
if it could be shown that these other statements were in- 
valid, this would not in itself refute the emotive analysis 
of ethical judgements; and in fact I believe this analysis 
to be valid on its own account. 

Having said this, I must acknowledge that the theory is 
here presented in a very summary way, and that it needs 
to be supported by a more detailed analysis of specimen 
ethical judgements than I make any attempt to give." 
Thus, among other things, I fail to bring out the point 
that the common objects of moral approval or disapproval 
are not particular actions so much as classes of actions; 
by which I mean that if an action is labelled right or 
wrong, or good or bad, as the case may "be, it is because it 
is thought to be an action of a certain type. And this point 
seems io me important, because I think that what seems to 
be an ethical judgement is very often a factual classifica- 
tion of an action as belonging to some class of actions "by 
which a certain moral attitude on the part of the speaker 
is habitually aroused. Thus, a man who is a convinced 
utilitarian may simply mean by calling an action right 
that it tends to promote* or more probably that it is the 
sort of action that tends to promote, the general happi- 
ness; and in that case the validity of his statement be- 
comes an empirical matter of fact Similarly, a man who 
bases his ethical upon his religious views may actually 

17. 1 understand this deficiency has been made good by C L. 
Stevenson in his book. Ethics and Language, but the book was pub- 
lished In America and I have not yet been able to obtain it. There is 
1 review of it by Austin Duncan-Jones In Mind. October 1945, and 
a good indication of Stevenson's tine of argument is to be found in 
Jus articles on "The Emotive Meaning of Ethical Terms', Mmd r 1937. 
'Ethical Judgements and AvoidibUity*, Mind. 1938, and 'Persuasive 
Definitioas-, Mind. 153a 

191 



mean by calling an action right or wrong that it is the sort 
of action that is enjoined or forbidden by some ecclesiasti- 
cal authority; and this also may he empirically verified- 
Now in these cases the form of words by which the fac- 
tual statement is expressed is the same as that which 
would be used to express a normative statement; and this 
may to some extent explain why statements which are 
recognized to be normative are nevertheless often thought 
to be factual. Moreover, a great many ethical statements 
contain, as a factual element, some description of the ac- 
tion, or the situation, to which the ethical term in ques- 
tion is being applied. But although there may be a number 
of cases in which this ethicaE term is itself to be under- 
stood descriptively, I do not think that this is always so. I 
think that there are many statements in which an ethical 
term is used in a purely normative way, and it as to state- 
ments of this kind that the emotive theory of ethics is in- 
tended to apply. 

The objection that if the emotive theory was correct it 
would be impossible for one person to contradict another 
on a question of value £s here met by the answer that what 
seem -to be disputes about questions of value are really 
disputes about questions of fact, I should, however, have 
made it clear that it docs not follow from this that two 
persons cannot significantly disagree about a question of 
value, or that it is idle for them to attempt to convince one 
another. For a consideration of any dispute about a matter 
of taste will show that there can be disagreement without 
formal contradiction, and that in order to alter another 
man's opinioas, in the sense of getting him to change his 
attitude, it is not necessary to contradict anything that 
he asserts. Thus, if one wishes to affect another person 
in such a way as to bring his sentiments on a given point 
into accordance with one's own, there are various ways 
in which one may proceed. One may, for example, call 

192 






his attention to certain facts that one supposes him to 
have overlooked; and, as 1 have already remarked, 
I "believe that much of what passes for ethical discussion 
is a proceeding of this type. It is, however, also possible 
to influence other people by a suitable choice of emotive 
language; and this is the practical justification for the 
use of normative expressions of value. At the same time, 
it must be admitted that if the other person persists in 
maintaining his contrary attitude, without however dis- 
puting any of the relevant facts, a point is reached at 
which the discussion can go no further. And in that case 
there is no sense In asking which of the conflicting views 
is true. For, since the expression of a value judgement is 
not a proposition, the question of truth or falsehood does 
does not here arise- 



THE NATURE OF PHILOSOPHICAL ANALYSIS 

In citing Bertrand Russell's theory of descriptions as a 
specimen of philosophical analysis, I unfortunately made 
a mistake in my exposition of the theory. For, having 
taken the familiaT example of 'The author of Waverley 
was Scotch', I said that it was equivalent to 'One person, 
and one person only, wrote Waverley, and that person was 
Scotch.' But., as Professor Stebbing pointed out in her re- 
view of this book* 'if the word "that" is used wfcrett- 
tially. then "that person was Scotch" is equivalent to the 
whole of the original', and if it is used demonstratively, 
then the defining expression 'is not a translation of the 
original', 11 The version sometimes given by Russell him- 
self* is that 'The author of Wcverley was Scotch' is 
equivalent to a conjunction of the three propositions "At 
least one person wrote Waverley'; 'At most one person 

18. Mind, t$36. P- 3S8- 

19. e.g. in his IatroduetUm to Mathematical Philosophy, pp. 172-80. 



wrote Waverley'; and 'Whoever wrote Wavertey was 
Scotch.' Professor Moore, however, lias remarked* that if 
the words 'whoever wrote Wavertey' are understood "in 
the most natural way", the first of these propositions is 
superfluous; for he argues that part of what would or- 
dinarily be meant by saying that whoever wrote Wavertey 
was Scotch is that somebody did write Wavertey. Accor- 
dingly, he suggests that the proposition which Russell in- 
tended to express by the words 'whoever wrote Wavertey 
was Scotch' is 'one which can be expressed more clearly 
by the words "There never was a person who wrote 
Wavertey but was not Scotch.'" And even so he does not 
think that the proposed translation is correct. For he ob~ 
facts that to say of someone that he is the author of a 
work does not entail saying that he wrote it, since if he 
had composed it without actually writing it down he 
could still properly be called its author. To this Russell 
has replied that it was 'the inevitable vagueness and am- 
biguity of any language used for every-day purposes' that 
led him to use an artificial symbolic language in Pr'mcipia 
Mathematica, and that it is in the definitions given in 
Principia Mathematka that the whole of his theory of de- 
scriptions consists." In saying this, however, he is. I think. 
Unjust to hitnseJf, For it seems to me that one of the great 
merits oJf his theory of descriptions is that it does throw 
light upon the use of a certain class of expressions in 
ordinary speech, and that this is a point of philosophical 
importance. For, by showing that expressions like 'the 
present King of France' do not function as names, the theory 
exposes the fallacy that has led philosophers to believe in 
'subsistent entities'. Thus, while it is unfortunate that the 

2a !u an article on 'Russell's Theory of Descriptions', The Pftifo- 
sophy of Bertrand R ussell, vide especially pp. 107-89. 

3i. 'Reply to Criticisms', The Poiitwopoy of Bertnwd Russell 
p. 690, 

*94 



example most frequently chosen to illustrate the theory 
should contain a minor inaccuracy. 1 do not think that 
this seriously affects Its value, even in its application to 
every-day language. For. as J point out in this book, the 
object of analysing The author of Waverfey was Scotch' 
is not just to obtain an accurate translation of this parti- 
cular sentence, hut to elucidate the use of a whole class of 
expressions, of which 'the author of Waverley 1 serves 
merely as a typical example. 

A more serious mistake than my misrendering of 'The 
author of Waverley was Scotch' was my assumption that 
philosophical analysis consisted mainly in the provision 
of 'definitions in use*- It is, indeed, true that what I de- 
scribe as philosophical analysis is very largely a matter of 
exhibiting the inter-relationship of different types of pro- 
positions;" but the cases in which this process actually 
yields a set of definitions are the exception rather than 
the rule. Thus the problem of showing how statements 
about material things are related to observation-state- 
ments, which is, in effect, the traditional problem of per- 
ception, might be thought to require for its solution that 
otic should indicate a method of translating statements 
about material things into observation-statements, and 
thereby furnish what could be regarded as a definition of 
a material thing. But, in fact, this is impossible; for. as 1 
have already remarked, no finite set of observation state- 
ments is ever equivalent to a statement about a material 
thing. What one can do, however, is to construct a schema 
which shows what sort of relations must obtain between 
sense-contents for it to be true, ia any given case, that a 
material thing exists: and while this process cannot, pro- 
perly speaking, be said to yield a definition, it does have 
the effect of showing how the one type of statement is 

22. C. Ryle. Pftf/osop-McflJ Arguments, Inaugural Lecture delivered 
before the: University of Otftwd. ip^f. 

195 



related to ttw other.* 1 Similarly, in the field of political 

philosophy, one will probably not be able to translate 
statements on the political level into statements atx>ut in- 
dividual persons; for although what is said about a State, 
for example, is to be verified only by the behaviour of cer- 
tain individuals, such a statement is usually indefinite in a 

way that prevents any particular set of statement; about 
the behaviour of individuals from being exactly equiva- 
lent to it. Nevertheless, here again it is possible to indicate 
what types of relations must obtain between individual 
persons for the political statements in question to be true: 
so that even if no actual definitions are obtained, the mean- 
ing of the political statements is appropriately clarified. 
In such cases as these one docs indeed arrive at some- 
thing that approaches a definition in use; but there are 
other cases ol philosophical analysis in which nothing 
even approaching a definition is either provided or sought. 
Thus, when Professor Moore suggests that to say that 'exis- 
tence is not a predicate' may be a way of saying that 
'there is soma very important difference between the way 
in which "exist" is used in such a sentence as "Tame 
tigers exist" and the way in which "growl" is used in 
'Tame tigers growl ""', he does not develop his point by 
giving rules for the translation of one set of sentences into 
Another. What he does is to remark that whereas it makes 
good sense to say 'All tame tigers growl' or 'Most tame 
timers growl' it would be nonsense to say 'All tame tigers 
exist' or 'Most tame tigers exist,'" Now this may seem a 

13. Vide The Foundations of Empirical Knowledge, pp. 245-^3; 
and R. B. Braithwaitc, 'Propositions aliout Material Objects', Pro- 
ceedinss 0/ the Aristotelian Society, Vol. XXXVHI. 

M- G. E. Mooie. *ls Existence a Predicate?', SappUmentary Pro- 
ceedings of the Aristotelian Society, 1956. 1 have made use o£ the 
same illustration, in my paper on 'Does Philosophy analyse Common 
Sense?', symposium with A. E. Duncan-Jones, Supplementcty Pro- 
ceedings 0/ the Aristotelian Society, 1937. 

196 



rather trivial point for hfm to make, but in fact it & philo- 
sophically jUuminating. For it is precisely the assumption 
Chat existence is a predicate that gives plausibility to 'the 
ontological argument'; and the ontological argument is 
supposed to demonstrate the existence of a God. Conse- 
quently Moore by pointing out a peculiarity in the use of 
the word 'exist' helps to protect us from a serious fallacy; 
so that his procedure, though different from that which 
Russell follows in his theory of descriptions, tends to 
achieve the same philosophical end." 

1 maintain in this hook that it is not within the province 
of philosophy to justify our scientific or common-sense 
beliefs; for their validity is an empirical matter. which 
cannot be settled by a priori means. At the same time, the 
question of what constitutes such a justification is philo- 
sophical, as the existence of 'the problem of induction* 
show?. Here again, what is required is not necessarily a 
definition. For although I believe that the problems con- 
nected with induction can be reduced to the question of 
what is meant by saying that one proposition is good evi- 
dence for another, E doubt if the way to answer this is to 
construct a formal definition of 'evidence'. What is 
chiefly wanted, ] think, is an analysis of scientific me- 
thod, and although it might be possible to express the re- 
sults of this analysis in the form of definitions, this would 
not be an achievement of primary Importance. And here I 
may add that the reduction of philosophy to analysis ttfed 
not be incompatible with the view that its function is to 
bring to light 'the presuppositions of science'. For if there 
are such presuppositions, they can no doubt he shown to 

25. 1 do not wish to imply that Moore himself was solely, or even 
primarily, concerned with refuting the ontologieal argument. But I 
think, that his reasoning does achieve this, though not this alone. 
Similarly Russell's 'theory of descriptions' has other uses besides 
relieving us of "subsistent entities'. 

197 



! 



be logically involved in the applications of scientific me- 
thod, or in ihe use of certain scientific terms, 

It used to be said by positivists of the Viennese school 
that the function of philosophy was not to put forward a 
special set of 'philosophical' propositions, but to make 
other propositions clear; and this statement has at least 
the merit of bringing out the point that philosophy is not 
a source of speculative truth. Nevertheless 1 now think 
that it is incorrect to say that there are no philosophical 
propositions. For, whether they are true or false, the pro- 
positions that are expressed in such a book as this do fall 
Into a special category; and since they are the sort of pro- 
positions that are asserted or denied by philosophers, 1 do 
not see why they should not be called philosophical. To 
say of them that they are, in some sense, about the usage 
of words, is, I believe, correct but also inadequate; for cer- 
tainly not every statement about the usage of words is 
philosophical." Thus, a lexicographer also seeks to give 
Information about the usage of words, but the philosopher 
differs from him in being concerned, as I have tried to in- 
dicate, not with the use of particular expressions but with 
classes of expressions: and whereas the propositions of the 
lexicographer are empirical, philosophical propositions. If 
they are true, are usually analytic.*' For the rest I can find 

zi. Vide "Does Philosophy analyse Common Sense?' and Duncan- 
Jones's paper on the same subject, Supplementary ?roce<dinss of 
the AiistQtetian Society, 193,7; cf. also John Wisdom, 'Metaphysics 
and Verification', Muid, 1193ft and 'Philosophy, Anxiety and Nq- 
vclty', Mind, 1944. 

V* 1 have put in the qualifying word "usually* because I think 
that some empirical propositions, such as those that occur In his- 
tories of philosophy, may be counted as philosophical. And! philo- 
sophers use empirical propositions as examples to serve philoso- 
phical ends. Bui, in so far as they are not merely historical, I think 
that the truths discoverable by philosophical methods arc analytic; 
At the same time I should add that the philosopher's business, as 



no better way of explaining tay conception of philosophy 
than by referring to examples; and one such, example ts 
the argument of this book. 

A. J. AYER 

Wadham College, Oxford 
January 1946 



Professor Ryle has pointed out to roe, is rather to 'solve puzzles* 
than to discover truths. 

199 



INDEX 



Absolute, the* 1 7 
Absolutism in ethics, IO&-Q 
./Esthetic criticism, function of, 

1 18-19 
^Esthetic Judgements, not 

objectively valid, uj 
Agjiosti-eisnv 121 
Altruism. 117 
Ambiguous symbols, defined. 

52-3 
Analogy, argument from, as 

applied to other minds. 

I37-S. 190 
Analysis, as the function of 

philosophy, 9. 10. 3*-7- 

involves no- mctaphysi-cal 

principles, 43 
nor empirical presuppositi&ns. 

44 
is concerned with linguistic 

usages. 44 
provides definitions in use, 49. 

its utility, 50-51:. 59. 61-2 
its logical character. 6 1-2 
Analytical propositions. 9. 171- 
2. 185-6 
defined* 72-4 
Kant's definition of. 7t~3 
their lack of factual content. 

their Independence of ex- 
perience. 72-4 

how they increase our know-* 
tedge. 74-S 

their power to surprise us. Sr- 

3 
liable to be mistaken by 
synthetic propositions. 96 
Ants- 73 



A priori propositions, 1&5-8 
as tautologies. 9, 14, 31, 71- 

83. a 19-^-0. 146-7 
cannot serve as 'first prin- 
ciples". 31 
Aristotelian logicians, 49 
Aristotle, primarily art analyst, 

42 
Atoms. 34. 148 

'Rasie' propositions. 177 
Being, as a metaphysical term, 

Bentham. J.. 4a 

Berkeley, George, his empiricEsm. 

carried further by Hume. 135, 

I54"5 
his analysis of the notion of .a 

material thing* }9~40, 

151-5 

his theism* 3$-40- 

his idealism. 1 .i 1 s 

his memalism. 157 
Berlin. L, 10, 179ft 
Black, M.» 79rt 
Bradley. R, 15. xyn 
Bralthwaitc. K. B.. i^ftn 
Broad, C D.. lH$n 

Capitalism. 85 

Carnap R., 10, 27/1. 451*. 46ft, 
8gn. I39n. 153* i67n 
uses a language in the analysts 
of itself. 63 
Casuistry. 117 
Categorical imperatives. 117 
Causation, defined. 41-2 
not a logical relation, 41-2. 
166 



200 



Characleristiea UnJwrfflufs, 

I^brute's desire for 16711 

Cog\Xa ergo sum, a Cartesian 
fallacy. 3.1 

Colour blindness. 141-a 

tommunicatlQn. possibility of. 

Consciousness. 140 
■Conservatism in sclenoe. 99 
Continuity, direct and indirect, 

defined, 56-7 
Contradiction, principle of 71-3 

Definition, explicit and in use, 

48-51 
Depth, as a property of visual 

and tactual sease-lklds, 57 
Descartes, R-. his method. 30- 

nlsmentalism. 155-6 
Descriptions, definite. Bertrand 
Russell's theory oC 49-52- 

193-5 

Diagrams, their use in geometry. 

78-9 
Domitian. 157 
Duncan-Iones. Austin, 19m. 

I96rt, 1980 

Economy, principle of. in scien- 
tific method. 96-7 

Egotism. 1 67 

Einstein. A.. 168 

Electrons. 34. 148 

Elements of logical constructions 
defined, 52-3 

Emotive utterances. 28. in 

Empirical propositions. See 
synthetic propositions. 

Empiricism, logical doctrines of, 

9, 64. 146-7 

psychological doctrines of. 64. 

148-50 
and necessary truths. 64-73. 
and rationalism, 66—7, 146- 

50 

and the self, 135-6 



Entailment denned- 48. 180-81 
Equivalence denned. 48-s 
Ethical judgements, if normative, 

neither true nor false, 107, 

109-12, 193 
their validity not a subject for 

argument, iio-ii. 113*- 

16, 192-3 
Ethical science, 11 7-1 8 
Ethical symbols, distinction 

between the normative and 

descriptive. 107-8 
Ethics, the different questions 

involved in. 105-6 
Euclidean and nco -Euclidean 

geometries. 69. ?8. 79 
Ewtag, A. G, 285*. i8y» 
Excluded middle, law of, 70, 76 
Existence, analysed. 150-56 

not an attribute, 26 
Experience. Ste Sense-experi- 
ence, 
Experiential propositions. 20. 

179 

Factual propositions defined. 20 

Faith, 124 

Feeling, expression and assertion 

of. 1 12-13 
Fictittousness not an attribate. 

26 

General propositions not con- 
clusively verifiable, 18-19, 

64-5 
Geometry, formal: Its proposi- 
tions analytic, 77-80 
and physical space, 77-8 
docs not necessarily require 
intuition, 79 
Ce&tait psychologists. 44. 169 
'Given*, the. in sense experience. 

91. 127-9. rSS-7 
God. his existence cannot bo 
demonstrated, x 19-20 
nor shown to be probable. 
119-26 



201 



God - ccntd 

not a matft-ematltian, Szn 
his place: In Berkeley's philus- 

Goya, as 

Hahn. Hm 8arr. i4«n 

Hamlet, 53. 165 

Heidegger, ftt. 27 and it 

HcrnpeL C. Sgn 

Hohbes. T„ 42 

Hume. !>.. his empiricism. 9 

his rejection of metaphysics, 
40 

his analysis of causation. 40- 
4-* 

Kb analysis of the self* 135-6* 

JS4-S 
h^piychqJogicfll views, 129 

his view of scientific method, 

149 
shows that no event intrin- 

st-caliy points to any other, 

31 
shows that no empirical 

proposition can be logically 

certain, 64-5. 95, E49. 166 
Hypotheses and empirical prop- 

oettUosp 177 
aot conclusively vertfl able, 

ftM COOtlusivdy confutable, 

their relation to exjwriertce, 
93-102, 176 

Idea, Locfce and Berkeley's usage 

of. J9 
Idealism and realism. 2 z-j. 
150^62 
metaphysical doctrine of, 22- 

3-I5& 
loglciil doctrines of, 24, 151-5 
empirical doctrlite of, 157-62 
Identity of different peopled 

experiences, 141-2 
Illusion, argument from, T56-7 



Incorrigible propositions. 177-S 
Induction, futility of attempting 

to justify, 34-s 
Internal ity of all properties, fal- 
laciously assumed by 
monlsts, 1 31-6 
Intuition as a method ttf arriving 
at beliefs, 14, 13!*. .148-51 
not a criterion <tf knowledge, 

io8-9p 124-6, 149-50 
not essential in geometry, 79 
not the basis of Descartes* 
method, 30 

Jehovah, rzz 
)uho& B. von, 88n 

Kant, Ei primarily an analyst, 43 
his condemnation or tran- 
scendental metaphysics, 

his account of necessary 

truths, 138 
hts definitions of analytic and 

synthetic judgements, 71—3 
his view of geometry. 77-8 
and arithmetic. So 
hta transcendental aesthetic, 

80 
his theory of morals, ri7 
his belief in God, 119 
hi? view of scientific tncOtod* 

»49 

On empiricism, 67 
sees that existence la nat an 
attribute. 2.5-6. 
Karnes. J. M- 34?! 

Langford. C. H., 63rt- 7611 
Language, the subject of philoso* 
ptiicul anulyfics. 44-77. 198 
misleads metaphysicians. 24- 

scientific mid emotive use of* 

28 
Its connection with logic, 74- 

5, 80^83 



202 



Laws of Nature* definitions or 
hypotheses. 30, 60. 93. 94- 

Laws of thought, Aristotelian., as 

tautologies, 76 
Ijraerowilz, M.» 172m I77n 
taibnit& 1670 
Lewis* C Im *3n, 7&"* *o 2ra 
limited independent variety, 

Kcynra' principle of* does 

not justify induction, 34 
Einguislk: propositions disguised 

in factual terminology, 45- 

7- I&4- 
rules, 186-7 

Locke, J., as an analyst. 38-9 

his misconception of matter, 

3?, 134- t39 

logic, co-nccmcd with tleLinittons 

and tl'.i^" consequences, and 

not with empirical matters 

of fact. g. 44, 66-71. 76 

its truths are analytic. 71 

comprehends philosophy. 44 

and possibly mathematics, 

77-9 

Its ability to surprise us. S 1-3 
Logical constructions defined, 
52-3. 130-31 

not fictitious objects, 53-4 
Lofitstic. 62 

Mace, C. A.. 28H 
Maeh. E.. 129. 148 
Malcolm. Norman, i86n. i8Sn 
Marxists. 85 

Material things as logical con- 
structions out or sense-con- 

tenb. 39.45-6.53-9. t53- 
4 
may exist unpercelved. 159- 
61 

MatJi ematlcs, consists, like logiiCi 
of analytic; propositions. -5, 

67-71 

inducible to logic?, 77 

its ability to surprise us, 81-1 



Matter and mind, 130-33, 155 

May Queens, 74-5 
Meaning, and principle or ver- 
ification, 171*2 
the word used in a variety of 

senses* 184-5 
an ambiguous wrai, 59-61 
Memory, 134- 135 
Meager, K„ 76H 
Metaphysicians not necessarily 
mystics. 27-9 
their statements not verifiable* 

Metaphysics, defined, 23.-4 
examples ol 21-7. 31-2. 85. 

120. 134. 138-9. 150. 

1 6 1-2 
not literally significant g-XQ< 

15729-/85 
how it arises, r J. 25~7" 2 9 
distinguished from philosophy, 

36-8. 43- 44-5- 64 
its aesthetic value. 27-9 
Mill* J.. S.i a follower of Hunve> 

42 
his conception &f a material 

thing. 154 

on logic and mathematics. 67- 

8 

Mind* activity of, 149-50 

and mutter, 130-33. iy$-§ 

Montam, metaphysical doctrine 

or 22, 161-2 

the outcome of logical error. 

16 1-5 
and pluralism, 31-2* 161-7 
and causation, 165-7 
Moore, G- Sh ia I53B. 187H. 

his defence of common sense 

38 

his argument against subjec- 
tivism in ethics, IIJ-T6 
on reality* 15& 
Moral judgements. See Ethical 

judgements. 
Mysticism, 29. 124-6 



i03 



MageL E., i&jn 

Nature oi a thing, the. an 
ambiguous expression. 

Necessary connection not ex- 
emplified by synthetic 

proppsatipns, *J>^— § 
N&C££Siixy [>L-i'[ i :K-ihi':i ■;. Spf ft 

priori propositions. 
Neuuth, O., 89a rfi^rt 
Nothing not the 11 ame of a thing. 

27 

Numbers, natural, reducible to 
classes?, 46. 77 

OteervaUon-sUtcmenta, 1 ?y- 

81 
Ostensive proposition* 89-91 
Other minds, our knowledge of. 

Pita t an ambiguous term, 157 

Particulars, 45-6 

Past, our knowledge of the, 102- 

3 

Perception, problem of, 36- 1-69 

ils solution, 52-9 
Personal identity, 1 55-6 
Phenomenalism, in 

applied lo material things. 39- 
40, 52~$ 

Applied to oneself* 133-7, rs4 
applied to other minds, E38- 

PhUoiophy, 9 AqNLrtmetrt of 

logic, 9, 44 
its analytic character, 36-7. 

193-8 
provides definitions, 48-9* 

393^8 
its relation to science. 32. 44, 

167-70 

distinguished from metaphys* 
ics, 36-8,43'44-S- H 

not a search For first principles, 
29-31 : 



not speculative 3.2-3 

its history. 37-S- 4-*~3- 1+4 
its future, 170 
Plato primarily an analyst 42 
Measure- 157 

Pluralism, metaphysical doctrine 
of, 21-2 
and monfcai* 161-7 
Poincar£» H» 78a 94a 98 
his objection to- the view that 
mathematics is taueotogou?, 
S1-2 
Popper. K-. r<jtt 
Positivism , 147-9 
Price, H. R. 57ft. I20n 
Probability. 100-103 

defined, roo 
Propositions, use of the word, 
172-6 
defined. 3 s 
not to be regarded as real 

entities. zj % 85 
cannot negate themselves. 
30-31 

Putative propositions, zjz 

Questions, genuine and fiction, 
16-J7 

Ramsey, F. P.. 63W. 8711 
Rationalism, logical doctrines oC 
66.67. U&-7 
metaphysical doctrine oC 

146-7 
end empiricism, 66-7* r<t&- 

50 
and scientific method, 149-50 
atid wnmtiont 129-30 

and tb* «lt 135 

Rationality defined 35, inj- 2 

Realism, logiral doctrine of. 23, 
150-51 
metaphysical doctrine of. 22- 

3. "50 
empirical doctrine of. 159-61- 
and idealism, 22-3, 150-61 
Reality analysed. 22-3. 150-56 



204 



Real qualities of things. 58 
Rcs.stm, truths of, do not refer to 
matters of fact, 65-6, M^~7 
Ktlu lions, 4*j~^ 

symmetrical and transitive. 
defined, 57 
Relative product. 56 

defined. s6ji 
* Religion and science, 1 2 1 -3. Sec 
d>V Thctefll, 

Religious experience, i±;~6 
Resembl-an-cc, direct and Indirect. 

defined. 55-6 
Robots, is 9-40 
Ross, SirW. David. 19m? 
RusscL 11 A. iv._ 4sn» 94^, iS2n 

lots system of logic, 187 

his theory of definite descrip- 
tions, 49-55. 193-7 

hts prepositional calculus. 76 

on mathematics. 77 

on the structure of language* 

63 
Ttyle. G.. !*>• 85m 189*?, 1 9-5*1 

Schlick. M-. vo. 1 711. l8n, 88n 
Schools of philosophy, unwar- 
ranted, ro. 144 
Science and philosophy, 32-3. 
44. 167-70 
and religion, 1 23 

towers whole field of Juiow- 

tedge, 52 
as a method of prediction- 97- 

J03 
its unity, 168 
Scientific procedure cannot be 

justified rt priori 34-5 
ifetf, th-c, analysis of, I33"7» 

'54-5 
Self-consciousness and self- 

Identity, r34, 135 
Self'Coatslsieacy, 33. 35, 75. 94. 

98.3:16 
Sensation not analysabtc into 

subject Act, and object, I i«J, 

Mf-4 



Sense-cootents, actual and pos- 
sible, 56 
defined* 39, 149-39 
existence of, 130-31, 153 
neither mental nor physical* 

131 
subjectivity of, 133-4 
their relationship with 
material things, 33, 45-6* 

$&*9* 153*4 
Se*i«-ejip6riencfi t 9, I4~*5» si. 

177-8 

determines the validity of 
synthetic proportions. 33. 
36. 64-5. 92-103. 167 
and scnsc-contcnta. 129-31 
and the self, 133-7 
Sens*-fteltk. 45. 56 
Sens^-hlst&Ttra. 133-4. 140-41 
Sentence an ambiguous word* 

173 

JeUuition of 171-4 

ex p ressioa of a statement » 
T74-5 

literal meaning, l 71 f( 5ffl 

Shakespeare.. 165 

Simultaneity, 168 

Solipsism. 137-41 

SouK the. iu. 122 

Stacc, W*i 159/1, 1 8^rr l ifi^n 

SUte, the English. 53 

Statement a new technical term, 
1 74 *t SM 
definition of. 174-5 
normative and factual. 192 
vcrifi a b Ic .statement defined , 
179, 181 

Stebbittfr L £., 137/1* 14m, 

Stevenson, c L,, 15 1« 
Structure and content 141a 
Subjectivism In ethics, 106 
objections to. 106-7. 112-14. 
"93 
Substance, a metaphysical term, 
ii, 14-6,56, 134 

Substantival figtf. ttttbphy&iC&t 



205 



character of the. 129. 134- 

5 
Survival 122, r.56 
Syllogism, principle of the. 68 
Symbols and tfgns* 51-3* i8fi-8 
Synonymity de&aed. 48 
Synthetic propositions defined, 

n-& 176-7 
Kant's definition oT, ?r— 3 
their validity, 87-103. 124-5 

Tautologies* See Analytic pro- 
positions. 

Theism as a form of metaphysics, 
ei 9— z6 

Transcendent reality, denial of 
possibility of. 1 3-1:5. 21. 
146 

Truth, nature of*, 84-7 
theories of, 84* 86-7 

Type, identity of» as applied to 
sentences, 51 
and to symbols. 51 

Understanding, possibility of 
mutual. 141*3 
and analysis. 50 

Vnicornsi afi, 158 

Uniformity of Nature, principle of 
the. cannot justify Induc- 
tion. 34-5 



Unlmsals, 27, 45-6 
Utilitarianism. 106-7 
oblections to, 107-8 

Value* judgements of. See Ethical 

and Aesthetic judgements* 
Values, emotive theory of, 190- 

VcrifiabMiJy 8$ a criterion of sig- 
nificance. 9. 1&-20 23— 4. 
125-6. X47-9- 171-85 
practical and In principle, 16- 

17 
strong and weak, e8, X76-9 
Verification never conclusive, 
18, 93. 146-7. 177-9 
Che principle of, 171-85 
Viennese Circle, the. 10 

Waiscnann. P., i8n 

Wavcrky, the author of. 50, 61, 

X93-5 
Whitehead, A. N„ 62, 63ft 76, 

187 
Whole, organic, defined. 41-4 

Wallis. I R. M-.rr 

Wittgenstein* L, % -9* 63 n 

on the impossibility of (Inawtag 
a limit to thinking, 15 

on logical necessity, 80 
Wisdom. John, igow^ 198H 



206 



PUBLISHED WHEN A. J. AVER WAS 
TWENTY-FIVE. LANGUAGE, TRUTH AND 
LOGIC SWEPT AWAY THE COBWEBS AND 
REVJTALIZED BRITISH PHILOSOPHY. 



Thors are two kinds of meaningful 
statement; analytic statements (as in 
mathematics), which are true by definition; 
and statements that can be verified by 
experience. Bui if that is so, a very great deal 
of traditional philosophy, including ethics, 
aesthetics and metaphysics — and also 
theology - is concerned with statements 
that are literally nonsensical... That 
extraordinary conclusion is at the heart of 
this epoch-making book, the classic 
manifesto of Logical Positivism. In 1936 it 
was like a breath of fresh air; over half a 
century later its power to shock remains 

undiminished. 







A PELICAN BOOK 
Philosopliy 

U.K. M.IS 
AUSI. 813.99 

(ucamnBDilBd) 
HA *15,95 
(IreI. GST) 
CAN. S3.35 



ISBfl 0-14-021200-0 



SO 



I- 






91 



001 



